7791989
Bion_Barnett
nationality  United StatesBion Hall Barnett (October 7, 1857 &ndash; October 30, 1958) was an American banker. In 1877 he co-founded Bank, known as Floridas Bank, the largest in the state of Florida at the time of its acquisition by NationsBank in 1997.(Early yearsHe was born in Kansas, the son of William Boyd Barnett and the former Sarah Jane Blue. (Miller, Joseph E.: Headstone: William Boyd Barnett (18241903) Jacksonville Observer, July 26, 2009)His father was a merchant and a banker in northeast Kansas. Bion was the younger of two children who lived to adulthood. His older brother Will was five years older than he, and moved from Kansas to Jacksonville, Florida to start a furniture business in 1874, just as Bion enrolled at the of Kansas. Will spoke highly of Floridas moderate winter, so the following year, his parents journeyed to Jacksonville to visit their oldest son. Sarah Barnett suffered from neuralgia, but her health improved during their time in Florida, so the Barnetts returned to Kansas, liquidated their assets, and relocated to Jacksonville in March, 1877. Bion, who was a college senior, withdrew from school to join his parents three months before graduation.(Ginzl, David J.: Barnett: The Story of Floridas Bank ISBN 1879852721, University of Tampa Press, 2001)Bank of JacksonvilleOn May 7, 1877, Barnett opened the Bank of Jacksonville on the corner of Main and Forsyth with $43,000 in capital. William was president, Bion acted as bookkeeper, and one other person was hired as teller/clerk. Most Florida banks at the time were private and unregulated. In spite of being a newcomer and a Yankee, Barnett and the new institution slowly gained the peoples trust, but at the end of their first year, and deposits only amounted to $11,000. Undeterred, William invited Bion to be partner.(Ginzl, David: The Last Days of Barnett, Jacksonville Magazine, October 1998)FateA conversation between Bion Barnett and Henry LEngle changed the banks fortunes. LEngle, the Duval County Tax Collector, was annoyed because the bank holding the countys funds charged $6.25 for each transfer to New York City banks. Bion offered to waive the fee if Duval County deposited their funds in the Bank of Jacksonville. LEngle agreed, and the BoJ began to prosper. Within a year, LEngle was appointed Treasurer for the State of Florida, and the states accounts were transferred to BoJ. Within a few years, operating capital exceeded $150,000, and in 1888,(BIOGRAPHICAL / HISTORICAL NOTE University of North Florida, Carpenter Library, BARNETT BANKS COLLECTION) the Barnetts applied for and received a National Charter, pursuant to the Bank Act. This allowed them to become the National Bank of Jacksonville. The institutions deposits exceeded $1 million in 1893.( Floridas first Burroughs Adding Machine was installed at the bank during this time.(ExperienceAround 1890, Bion invested $3,000 in a phosphate mining enterprise that promised a return of $100,000 in three months time. When he lost the entire amount, he never again speculated, and applied that same principle at Barnett Bank. He was fond of telling people, It is not the things you dont know that get you in trouble. It is the things you think you know for sure that get you in trouble.(On Barnett Banks 50th anniversary in 1927, Bion repeated his fathers Five Rules of Business: 1. Follow the Golden Rule. You cannot go wrong treating the other man as you would be treated. 2. Give a man 50 cents if you can make a dollar out of him. In other words, be liberal in your dealings but always have a net profit. Do not do business at a loss. 3. If a young man is of good habitshonest, capable, saving, giving close attention to his business and making progress but lacking in capitalhelp him. The young man of today is the businessman of tomorrow. 4. Never make a promise you cannot and do not fulfill. Investigate carefully before granting a line of credit; once granted, there being no adverse change in your clients financial condition, fulfill your promise. Your word must be as good as your bond. 5. Watch your expense account and your losses; your profits will take care of themselves.(20th CenturyThe Fire of 1901 destroyed most of the city, and the National Bank of Jacksonville was the only bank still standing. When Bions father died on October 21, 1903, Bion became president and resolved to rename the institution in his fathers honor. The bank was rechartered as the Barnett National Bank of Jacksonville in 1908.((For their 50th anniversary, the bank built and moved into the 18-story National Bank Building, the tallest structure in Jacksonville from 1926 to 1954. Bion Barnett commented that the family-owned institution had endured epidemics, fire, freezes, and financial panics.(Dougal, April S.: Barnett Bank Answers.com)DepressionJust two years later, the bank experienced the Depression and Barnett tried unsuccessfully to merge with National Bank. Baker, Fentress & Company owned Consolidated Naval Stores in Jacksonville and purchased a sizable quantity of Barnett stock. The infusion of capital left the bank stronger, but ended complete family control of the institution.(  A bank holding company was begun after the stock market crash in 1929, and Barnett National Securities Corporation purchased and reopened several failed banks. The day before a bank holiday on March 5, 1933, Barnett expected a run. To prevent this, Bion directed the banks personnel to pull all small denomination bills from the vault, and leave the $50s, $100s, $500s and $1,000 bills. Tellers were instructed to slowly count each withdrawal. Those at the end of the line saw their friends and neighbors leave the bank carrying large stacks of bills, which prompted many customers to regain confidence and leave without their money.(   The bank continued to grow with the acquisition of many more Florida banks over the next two decades.(PersonalBarnett married Carolina Hallowes LEngle on April 8, 1880(Foley, Bill: Bank rooted in citys past, present Florida Times-Union, September 14, 1997) and the union produced four children: Madeline, William LEngle, Bion Hall, Jr., and Donald Murray.(Florida Historical Society: Barnett, Bion H. Makers of America Volume I, pages 158 - 163)  Barnett kept a home in France, and stayed there for extended visits. He also enjoyed golfing in Scotland.(A Brief History Barnett Bank Alumni website) He was the grandfather of author LEngle.Public serviceBeginning in the late 1800s, Jacksonvilles Board of Bond Trustees controlled most government operations, including the municipal electric plant, the city water and sewer departments, the fire and police departments, and hired all city employees except elected officials. Barnett was a member or chairman of the board from October 1896 to March 1911 when he resigned.((Trustees of the Board Annual report of the Board of Trustees for the Waterworks and Improvement Bonds of the city of Jacksonville, Florida, 1896)He was a prominent Mason; treasurer of Damascus Commandry, Templar; a member of the Seminole Club, the Yacht Club, the Florida Country Club and the and Protective Order of Elks.(RetirementBarnett retired from the board of Barnett Bank with 75 years of service in 1952 at the age of 94 and was named honorary chairman. Every evening thereafter, a courier delivered the banks daily business report, which he studied while sipping a bourbon, followed by a cigar. Bion died in 1958 at age 101.((Ginzl, David: A Brief History of the Barnett Bank Florida State University Barnett Bank Scholarship, 2007)References
7807861
Mack_Titan
The Mack Titan is a heavy duty truck produced by Trucks. There are two different variants of the Titan, one for the Australian market, that was first introduced in 1995 aimed at the heavy train operators of Australia, and a 2008 model that was introduced in America. The Titan can haul loads up to 200 tonnes GCM and comes with many heavy duty options that are not usually found on highway trucks.Australian variant*A raised cab and taller hood allows for larger radiators to cool the engine more quickly in the hot Australian climates.*Heavy duty double and triple frame rails handle the high loads and stress of driving on unpaved dirt roads. *Rear axles offered include tri-drive options and planetary hub reduction axles from Trucks. *Air brake system has high flow air compressor and large air tanks to provide air for 2 or more trailers and the air starter (if fitted).*Integrated vertical air intake snorkels keep dust and dirt out of the filters prolonging their life.*High power engines from Cummins (ISX & Signature) and Caterpillar (C-16) provide the necessary power. Up until 2000/2001, the Mack 16.4 litre E9 V8 was offered at 455 kW (610 hp) and 2780 Nm (2050 ftlbf) of torque.*The Mack 18 speed transmission is standard with an Eaton 18 speed option. Eaton two and four speed auxiliary transmissions are also available to provide extra gears and an optional Power Tower.United StatesIn March 2008, Titan was introduced in Bulldog magazine.(Mack to Launch its Biggest Model -- TITAN: Bulldog. - 2008-Volume 1. - p.9. - (Adobe Acrobat *.PDF document). - Retrieved: 2008-06-02) The target markets are the heavy-haul applications of: construction, logging, mining, oil field, and heavy equipment hauling. A Heavy Duty model uses the 16-liter big-block MP10, the largest ever 6-cylinder engine from Mack, with 515, 565, and  models. The 605 has a torque rating of . at 1,200 RPMs.(Product Brochure: Titan. - Mack Trucks. - (Adobe Acrobat *.PDF document). - Retrieved: 2008-06-02) It will replace the now retired CL model which served as Macks big bore truck which was powered by the Cummins ISX. It will feature the MP10 which is Macks version of the Volvo D16C.(Mack Titan review Retrieved:  2009-03-01)See also*Trucks*of Mack Trucks ProductsReferencesExternal links* Australia:**Mack Titan Homepage -  Mack Trucks Australia**BigMackTrucks.com Titan Info* United States:**Titan series - Mack Trucks**Titan Product Brochure - Mack Trucks - (Adobe Acrobat *.PDF document)
7820085
Kumya
 divs  1 p, 3 workers districts, 55 riKumya is a county in Hamgyong province, Korea.  It borders the of Japan (East Sea of Korea) to the east. Physical featuresTo the west, there are high mountains but the eastern portion of the county is flat. The highest peak is Chongamsan ().  The chief river is the Ryonghung.  Several islands are situated around the Bay ().  Forestland makes up about 30% of the countys area.EconomyAgriculture and fisheryThe chief form of agriculture in the county is rice cultivation. In addition, maize, soybeans, and wheat are produced; there are also orchards. There are no ports, although some fishing is done along the coast. Mining and manufacturingMachine industry has been well-developed in the region. There are also mines exploiting the local deposits of lignite, graphite, and gold.  TransportThe county is served by rail and road. Kumya Station is on the Line railroad. The road system is well-developed, thanks to the level terrain.See also*of North Korea*divisions of North KoreaExternal links*ko:ja:no:Kumyazh:
7826380
Planets_of_The_Saga_of_Seven_Suns
This article describes fictional Planets featured in The of Seven Suns, a series of science fiction novels written by J. Anderson. To see the Main Page of the series click here: Main PageTerran Hanseatic League*Earth - The Capital of the Hanseatic League, Earth is the centre of Human culture and economy.*Mars - Mars is controlled by the Earth Defence Forces, and used as their primary base for administration and training purposes.*Relleker - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League mainly known as a resort world. Due to its reliance on imports the residents of Relleker were hard hit when ekti supplies dwindled. Therefore the planetary governor of Relleker - Jane Pekar - was loath to lend aid to Davlin Lotze when he arrived requesting help in rescuing the citizens of Crenna and spend any of Rellekers vital resources in the process. When the Voracious Curiosity and the Blind Faith returned to Relleker with the rescued humans from Crenna, Relleker grudgingly gave the refugees sanctuary for a short time. Though when the last of them left with Rlinda Kett, Relleker suffered grave misfortune as it became the site of a Hydrogue attack which wiped out the human settlement, and then the setting of a Klikiss subhive battle.*Ramah - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League mainly known as an Islamic religious haven.*Dremen - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League known for its dismal climate. However, the world had enough usefulness in the form of growing crops, though not in great abundance. Although a plan was forwarded to use orbital mirrors to warm the surface of the world, it was dismissed as impractical.*Yreka - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League, Yreka was the site of a trap engineered by General Lanyan to catch the Roamer pirate Rand Sorengaard and his gang. The planet was later the site of a blockade by the Earth Defence Forces after it was discovered that the Yrekans had been hoarding ekti. The blockade ended when remoras struck food stores and fields of cereal crops, thus giving the Yrekans no choice but to give up their stored fuel. Due to their bitterness at the Terran Hanseatic League for stealing their cache of fuel, the Yrekan governor Padme agreed to set up a black market were the colony could trade covertly with the Roamers. This proved to be beneficial not only for the denizens of Yreka, but also nearby planets (who had been abandoned by the Hansa following the Soldier compy revolt) who desperately needed food and ekti supplies.*Boones Crossing - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League that was attacked by the hydrogues due to its forested surface while the Hydrogues were searching for the verdani worldforest.*Corvus Landing - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League and the site of Beneto Therons death.*New Portugal - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League, New Portugal is known for its production of wine.*Palisade - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League.*Usk - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League that was made an example of after it broke away.*Paris 3 - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League.*Cotopaxi - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League.*Rhejak - An ocean world, famed for the native algae that is an essential ingredient in anti-ageing treatments.*Crenna - A member world of the Terran Hanseatic League. Crenna was formerly an Ildiran planet on the very edge of the Ildiran Empire. The splinter colony thrived happily until a disease spread amongst the colonists claiming many Ildiran lives, including the planets Designate. The disease renders victims blind; a nightmarish condition to Ildirans who are essentially afraid of the dark, eventually driving them mad to the point of death. Adar Korinh evacuated the remaining colonists, as the population was unable to sustain thism. Because the blindness plague only affected Ildirans, Crenna quickly became a new Hansa colony. The Hansa used Davlin Lotze - under the guise of a colonist starting a new life - to covertly search existing Ildiran buildings and items in an attempt to find out more about their Ildiran neighbours, although ultimately yielded nothing. Later, Crenna was the site of an outbreak of non-lethal orange spot, which was not related to the earlier Ildiran disease. Crenna was eventually rendered uninhabitable when the systems star was extinguished by hydrogue activities.*Oncier - A gas giant with four large moons. It was selected as the world on which the Klikiss torch was tested in hopes of transforming it into a star and making its moons habitable. After the torch was deployed, an unknown craft - piloted by a race of elemental beings later calling themselves Hydrogues - attacked and destroyed the four moons as well as the nearby Hansa research station. Later a huge battle raged between the Hydrouges and Faeros, eventually extinguishing the new star. The four moons of Oncier were named George, Jack, Christopher and Ben and were pre-emptively named as colony worlds of the Terran Hanseatic League.Theron*Theroc - Though a human-populated world, Theroc is a sovereign world not part of the Hanseatic League. Theroc boasts lush vegetation and a variety of large insect animal life. The planet occasionally exported its foods and fibres as luxury items to other planets. However, trade rapidly diminished as the hydrogue war flared. Theroc is the world most heavily populated by the verdani, or Worldforest, and is the cultural and spiritual home of the Green priests. Theroc is ruled as an independent state by its Father and Mother, and usually takes a neutral political stance. The planet and the Worldforest was greatly wounded by an attack by the hydrogues, who were searching forest-covered planets in hopes of exterminating their ancient enemy. The verdani were spared from utter extinction by the timely intervention of the faeros (who arguably made the situation worse), and the native Therons spent many years in a salvage operation, and later with the help of the Roamer clans. Theroc later became the headquarters of King Peters ConfederationIldiran Empire*Ildira - The Capital of the Ildiran Empire, heavily populated primarily due to the fear of isolation. Ildira is in a binary system, however its unusually close proximity to two other star systems, results in seven individual suns being clearly visible with a high degree of magnitude in the Ildiran sky, as a result the planet experiences no night.*Dobro - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the second born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. The most notable feature of Dobro is its human population. The humans from the generation ship Burton were taken to Dobro by Ildirans, and initially both species co-existed on the planet in peace. However, after a disturbance on the planet that killed several people the Ildirans imprisoned the humans to be used for their breeding experiments, with the aim of using human DNA to produce hybrid offspring with telepathic abilities superior to that of an average Ildiran. These experiments have been kept secret from all humans.*Hyrillka - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the third born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. Hyrillka is located in the Horizon Cluster. It is notable for being the centre of production of the potent stimulant drug Shiing, which has a disruptive effect on an Ildirans connection to the telepathic web of thism. Hyrillkas populace suffered greatly at the hands of the hydrogues, and again when Designate Rusah attempted to rebel against Mage-Imperator Jorah. The resulting warfare over the planet caused much collateral damage. When a clean-up operation began, led by the young, newly appointed Designate Ridekh, the planet was endangered again by a faeros-hydrogue battle at the systems star. The faeros won the battle, thus sparing the system, but Hyrillka was deemed unsafe for habitation.*Colusa - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the fourth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Scotia - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the fifth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Alturas - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the sixth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. Alturas was the third planet to be targeted by the false Imperator Rusah for induction into his thism.*Galt - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the seventh born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Kamin - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the eighth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Shonor - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the ninth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. During the insurrection of the false Imperator Rusah, Shonor was the fourth world targeted by the Ildiran, and followed Alturas.*Heald - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the tenth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Vondor Qe - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire, its Designate is traditionally the eleventh born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator.*Hrel-oro - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire; its Designate is traditionally the twelfth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. Hrel-oro is a dry and warm planet with very few vegetation though the world is rich in minerals and is mined by the Ildirans for desirable metals. Due to the arid climate, it is populated mainly by members of the scaly kith. Power is supplied to Ildiran settlements by solar-power stations and wind turbines.*Dzelluria - A splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire; its Designate is traditionally the thirteenth born noble son of the ruling Mage-Imperator. During Rusahs insurrection against Mage-Imperator Jorah, the false Imperator travelled to Dzelluria with his captured warliners to absorb the planets population into his thism network. Although the Designate refused to cooperate with Rusah, the planet was taken by force and Rusah killed the Designate, coercing the Designate-in-waiting to join him.*Maratha - A planet used as a resort world by the Ildiran Empire with a splinter colony located permanently at the Maratha Prime complex. Maratha has an extremely long day/night cycle, with the day cycle comparable to that of Ildira, and is therefore prized by the Ildiran Empire. A second complex, Maratha Secda, was being constructed by commissioned Klikiss robots on the other side of the planet so that the visiting population can utilise the resort world throughout the year. When the hibernating hive of Klikiss robots buried deep below the surface were awakened, both complexes were destroyed and/or disassembled to build ships and weapons. They were later wiped out by the Ildiran Solar Navy and the original Klikiss race.*Comptor - A forested planet and is home to a splinter colony of the Ildiran Empire. A former Designate of Comptor, the favourite of the then Mage-Imperator, is remembered in the Saga of the Seven Suns due to his death in a forest fire on the planet.*Orryx - A former colony world of the Ildiran Empire that was virtually forgotten after its fall. Orryx was, according to Ildiran apocrypha, the first Ildiran world to be vanquished by the Shana Rei who covered the entire world and the septa of warliners that was sent to defend it in a blanket of darkness, killing the Ildirans.Roamer*Rendezvous - Although not an actual planet, Rendezvous is a connected collection of structures and hollowed asteroids in the Meyer system and is the Roamer central seat of government. Rendezvous was started when the generation ship Kanaka stopped in the Meyer system to collect vital resources required to continue on their journey, but some of the colonists decided to remain in the system. Rendezvous served as the Roamer seat of government until it was attacked and destroyed in a raid by the Earth Defence Forces.*Osquivel - A gas giant occupied by hydrogues; its rings are the site of a Roamer starship manufacturing site managed by Del Kellum. These shipyards produced vessels such as the Erphano skymine and were for a long while safe from discovery by the Terran Hanseatic League. They were disguised when the Roamers were notified that the Earth Defence Forces would be sending a battle group to Osquivel after Robb Brindle traced the hydrogue warglobes that attacked Boones Crossing back to the gas giant. In the battle between the Earth Defence Forces and hydrogues at Osquivel, the humans were soundly beaten and retreated from the planet. Roamers from the Osquivel shipyards managed to recover survivors from the wrecks of Earth Defence Forces ships after the battle, and were subsequently barred from leaving the facility to return to Earth. A complete hydrogue sphere/warship was also found at Osquivel and Kotto Okiah was pulled out from Jonah 12 to study the find. The hydrogue sphere was moved further away from Kellums shipyards after it expelled high-pressure atmosphere when accidentally opened, sending it careening around. Some time after the battle against the hydrogues at Osquivel, families of the casualties of the battle journeyed to the planet to witness the destruction and construct a memorial. However, the group arrived at the gas giant amid the chaos of a Soldier compy rebellion - engineered by Kiro Yamane - against the Roamers at the shipyards.*Plumas - An ice-bound planet where Roamer operated water mines are located. Run by the Tamblyn clan, the main settlement on Plumas was deep under the icy surface in caverns lit by artificial suns. The underground lake around which the Roamer settlement on Plumas was built was populated by blood red nematodes. After the death of Bram Tamblyn, the Plumas water mines were inherited by Jess Tamblyn although he left it in the hands of his experienced uncles. Under the administration of the Tamblyn brothers, Plumas served as the base for a short-lived pirating endeavour that started and ended with the capture of traders Rlinda Kett and Robert Branson. Much of the colonys subterranean grottos were destroyed by a possessed Karla Tamblyn - who was infused with the energy of a tainted Wental - and the world was abandoned soon after.*Braddox - A mentioned planet that is occupied by a Roamer clan.*Constantine III - A Stormy primordial planet; site of a Roamer facility that extracted certain raw materials, such as long chain molecules (which are difficult to synthesize), from its thick atmosphere.*Forreys Folly - A briefly mentioned planet occupied by a Roamer clan.*Hurricane Depot - A facility used by the Roamers consisting of an artificially constructed station located at the centre of a pair of orbiting planetoids. During its management by Roberto Clarin, the Hurricane Depots artificial complex was destroyed in a raid by the Earth Defence Forces.*Isperos - A planet that orbited close to its systems sun and was rich in precious minerals. The Roamer Kotto Okiah planned to build a settlement on the planet in the hopes of mining the minerals, and travelled with Jess Tamblyn to inspect the planet. Kottos plans were later approved by the Roamer Speaker Jhy Okiah, and a Roamer settlement was built on Isperos, complete with a railgun launcher that sent bricks of material far out into safer zones of space for pickup by Roamer ships. After a meteor passed close to the planet and misaligned the railgun, causing a number of subsequent problems that compromised the safety of the facility and its inhabitants, the Roamers were forced to abandon the settlement.*Jonah 12 - An incredibly cold planet and the location of a Roamer colony designed by Kotto Okiah after the unfortunate demise of the mining facility on Isperos. Roamers on the planet mined the gases frozen on its surface for use in Roamer industry. The facility was later destroyed when the colonists inadvertently uncovered numerous Klikiss robots hibernating deep within the ice. The robots swiftly attacked the Roamer base and levelled it with ease. Only Nikko Chan Tylor and wounded Cesca Peroni escaped the base alive.*Sunshine - A photon-bathed planetoid settlement run by the Tomara clan. The settlement consisted of subterranean warrens for habitation whose energy demands were provided by solar collectors. Work was done on the planetoids surface by the inhabitants only by night.*Golgen - A gas giant occupied by the hydrogues and the site where they were first encountered by humans when they destroyed the Roamer skymine Blue Sky Mine - owned by Ross Tamblyn. After the death of Ross, his brother Jess Tamblyn staged an attack against Golgen by sending asteroids along carefully calculated decaying orbits from the systems Oort cloud to collide with the gas giant. Golgen was later rendered safe for skymining again when Jess Tamblyn unleashed wentals into its atmosphere, preventing the hydrogues from ever returning (they were presumably driven away by the bombardment of asteroids).*Ptoro - A gas giant occupied by the hydrogues, and previously the site of a Roamer skymine owned by the Tylar clan before the hydrogues ultimatum, after which it was pulled from service. Later, Ptoro was the site of the first offensive use of the Klikiss Torch by the Earth Defence Forces. Crim Tylar describes it as cold, windy, bleak.*Glyx - A gas giant mined by the original Ildiran skymines. Some time after the Ildirans passed over skymining to Roamers, the facility at Glyx was managed by Berndt Okiah.*Erphano - A gas giant occupied by hydrogues and was the site of a Roamer skymine managed by Berndt Okiah. This skymine was one of the earliest to be destroyed by the hydrogues.*Welyr - A gas giant occupied by hydrogues and was the site of a Roamer skymine managed by Shareen Pasternak. This skymine was one of the earliest to be destroyed by the hydrogues. Welyr was also the site of a Roamer blitzkrieg raid that took place five years after the destruction of the Roamer skymine and a bombing run performed by Del Kellum which seeded the atmosphere of the gas giant with wental.*Franconia - A gas giant and site of a Roamer skymine managed by Boris Goff which was probably withdrawn after the hydrogue ultimatum. This gas giant suffered from moon-sized hurricanes.*Haphine - A gas giant occupied by hydrogues and was the site of an Ildiran skymine that was one of the first two leased to the Roamers. This skymine was the fourth Roamer skymine to be destroyed by the hydrogues. Haphine was also the site of a wental-hydrogue battle after the atmosphere of the gas giant was doused in a bombing run led by Cesca Peroni.KlikissThe Klikiss race was thought to be extinct and many Klikiss worlds were settled by colonists from the Terran Hanseatic League after the transgate network was reactivated.*Llaro - The ancient capital of the Klikiss race. Its not exactly the garden spot of the galaxy, EA, but at least it isnt a hellhole. - Tamblyn to EA on arrival at Llaro. The ruins of the Klikiss city were discovered by planet prospector Madeleine Robinson and her sons. After the Klikiss transportal network was reactivated by humans, Llaro was one of the worlds picked for colonisation and it was also the site where Roamer prisoners of war were detained after capture.*Corribus - The world where it was thought the Klikiss race were finally exterminated by an unknown foe and where Margaret and Louis Colicos discovered the Klikiss Torch. It was later repopulated by humans after it was rediscovered by Hud Steinman (through the use of a Klikiss transportal). The colony was attacked by Hansa warships, in the command of the Klikiss robots, who scourged the planet of all humans aside from Hud Steinman and Orli Covitz.*Happiness - A neo-amish world on which prince Daniel was dumped on by King Peter on which he was killed by the klikiss.*Hifur -  A klikiss world regained by klikiss before being destroyed by klikiss robots.*Rajapar - A klikiss world retained by an independent breedex.*Rheindic Co - The world where the first Klikiss Transportal was reactivated by Louis Colicos and the hub of the Hansa colonisation effort. Also the site of Louis Colicoss death and DDs abduction by Klikiss robots.*Pym - A desiccated world that was once inhabited by the Klikiss. Described to have huge salt lakes and mineral deposits. General Lanyan leads an expedition to Pym rescuing its inhabitants, and he later returned to eradicate the Klikiss there and was killed.*Scholld - A klikiss world that destroyed a small part of the klikiss robot fleet.*Szurael - A Klikiss world first explored by Dalvin Lotze but deemed unfit for human habitation due to its large predators and acrid air. It was used by the Klikiss robots as a base of operations for their war against humanity.*Wollamor - A world settled in the colonization initiative the humans were killed by klikiss robots many of which were killed when the Llaro breedex  invaded who were in turn killed by planetary bombardment by Sirix and his soldier compies.*Xalezar - A world settled by humans in the colonization initiative not yet found by klikiss.*Zed Khell - A klikiss world that was not settled on in the colonization initiative and quickly regained by the klikiss.Other*Iawa - Ildirans transported the human colonists from the generation ship Kanaka here. However, after becoming accustomed to a different way of life onboard the Kanaka and their cereal crops suffering from an awful blight, the colonists left Iawa to reunite with the community that had been left to form Rendezvous.*Dularix - A uninhabited forested world that was attacked by the hydrogues when the gas giant dwellers were searching for the remnants of the verdani.*Oncier A gas giant at which the Klikiss torch was tested. Unbeknownst to the humans this invoked the wrath of the hydrogues.
7837588
Frank_Lampl
Sir Frank William Lampl (6 April 1926 (The Independent, Obituary, 15 April 2011 ) &ndash; 23 March 2011)(http://www.debretts.com/people/biographies/browse/l/1085/Frank+William.aspx)(http://www.building.co.uk/news/contractors/construction-industry-giant-sir-frank-lampl-dies-aged-84/5015515.article) was Life President of Lend Lease, the leading global construction management company that he created from the British building firm Bovis during a 15-year period as Chairman and CEO.CareerThe son of a prominent Czechoslavakian lawyer, he spent his teenage years as a prisoner in the Auschwitz and Dachau Nazi camps, and his first construction job was as a slave labourer on an underground BMW factory outside Munich. After War II, Frank Lampl resumed his studies in Brno and inherited property from his murdered family. But after the communist takeover he was denounced as a bourgeois undesirable and sentenced to imprisonment in the uranium mines of Jachymov. He married Blanka Kratochvilova, and they had one son.Frank Lampl benefited from a general amnesty on Stalins birthday and was released in 1953 on condition that he take up work in either mining or construction. Having tired of mining he returned to construction.  By 1963 he was managing director of the Pozemni Stavby Zavod Opava state construction company and won a place at Brno University. Unwilling to be caught by a third oppressive regime when the Russian tanks rolled into Prague in 1968 Frank Lampl and his wife left with one suitcase to visit their son Thomas who was studying at University in England.They never returned and at the age of 42 Sir Frank began his career in construction again. He joined the British building firm Bovis in 1971(End of 30-year era as Sir Frank Lampl retires Building, 2001) and by 1975 led Boviss first foray overseas enjoying particular success in the then booming East. In 1978 Sir Frank became chief executive of Bovis International and further contract successes followed, an achievement crowned by the Queens Award for Exports in 1984 and 1986. Bovis had been a division of the diversified transport and shipping company P&O since 1974, and in 1985 Frank Lampl joined the P&O main board in his capacity as Chairman of Bovis Construction.(Bovis became a name synonymous with the Bang building boom of London in the 1980s and the companys introduction of US construction management skills facilitated rapid completion of the most complicated projects. The biggest was Wharf with the tallest building in Europe. At the same time Sir Frank realised that Bovis needed to diversify internationally if the company was to survive after the boom was over. By 1990 Bovis had completed three substantial acquisitions in the US and in 1991 was able to win the Olympic Games construction management contract. There was also a highly successful series of acquisitions on the continent of Europe bringing major projects and Bovis also won EuroDisney outside Paris, finished in 1992,(Outdoor Theatre: A spectacle in Progress Daily Press, 11 May 2005) and a huge shopping centre under Square in Moscow.Additionally Sir Frank set up an operation in his former home town Brno and Bovis participated in several major Czech developments. And the Asian expansion of Bovis resulted in some notable wins, particularly the Towers in Lumpur, then the tallest building in the world.In 1999 Sir Frank oversaw the successful sale of Bovis to the Australian retail real estate group Lease and then announced his retirement at the start of the new Millennium. However, he remained Life President of Bovis Lend Lease and travelled extensively to see Bovis projects around the world.Sir Frank was well known in Israel and lived with his 2nd wife artist Wendy, dividing his time between his home in Wiltshire, Londons striking new Chelsea Bridge Wharf development and Washington. He was knighted in the 1990 New Years Honours and was an ex-chancellor of University as well as a holder of numerous honorary degrees.ReferencesFurther reading* Building Relationships, The History of Bovis 1885-2000, Peter Cooper, Cassell & Co (2000) ISBN 978-0-297-82533-3External links* Obituary in The Independent* Obituary in The TelegraphLampl
7846505
List_of_Dune_ships
The following are fictional spaceships, vehicles, and other vessels created by Herbert in the Dune universe. Several of the ships, however, were created by Lynch for his 1984 film Dune.Ships from the original novel DuneCarryallA flying wing (commonly Wing), the aerial workhorse of Arrakis, used to transport large spice mining, hunting, and refining equipment. In the 1984 movie of Dune, a Carryall handled four spice mining teams, and would fly two spice Harvesters at a time.CrushersMilitary space vessels composed of many smaller vessels locked together and designed to fall on an enemy position, crushing it.Dump BoxesThe general term for any cargo container of irregular shape and equipped with ablation surfaces and suspensor-damping system. They are used to dump material from space onto a planets surface.FrigateLargest spaceship that can be grounded on a planet and taken off in one piece.Harvester or Harvester FactoryA large (often 120 meters by 40 meters) spice mining machine commonly employed on rich, uncontaminated melange blows (often called a Crawler because of a bug-like body on independent tracks).HeighlinerMajor human transport and cargo container of the Guilds transportation system.HutmentA nine-leveled tent of interlocking metal leaves that reached out in a thousand-meter circle and could be attached to the base of a Starship Lighter. The Huntment brought to Arrakis by Emperor Shaddam Corrino IV housed five legions of Sardaukar.MonitorA ten-section space warcraft mounting heavy armor and shield protection. It is designed to be separated into its component sections for lift-off after planet-fall.OrnithopterCommonly referred to as thopters. Any aircraft capable of sustained wing-beat flight in the manner of birds and insects. In the 1984 movie, the Thopters were seen as jet-propelled ships, while in the 2000 miniseries, the Thopters had moving wings, but were still not as Herbert had described.SandcrawlerGeneral term for machinery designed to operate on the Arrakis surface in hunting and collecting melange.Spice Factory:See SandcrawlerSpice-LighterA small ship used on Arrakis to transport the spice; a Lighter in general is simply a small transport ship.Spotter ControlThe lighter Ornithopter in a spice-hunting group charged with control of watch and protection, looking out for wormsign.Starship LighterThe royal spaceship the Emperor Shaddam IV used to lead his entourage of Sardaukar onto Arrakis.Troop CarrierAny Guild ship designed specifically for transport of troops between planets. A carrier could carry 300 Imperial Sardaukar.Ships from other novels in the seriesNo-ShipA no-chamber designed into a spaceship. It was undetectable by users of prescience such as Spacing Guild Navigators.Ships from the 1984 filmGuild TransportA large blue-colored and oval-shaped ship. Atreides used a fleet of these ships for their journey from Caladan to Arrakis.Harkonnen Drop-ShipA long black ship that the Third-Stage Navigator used to travel to Kaitain.
7850725
Tagore_family
The Tagore family, with over three hundred years of history,(Deb, Chitra, pp 64-65.) has been one of the leading families of Kolkata, and is regarded as a key influence during the Renaissance.( The family has produced several persons who have contributed substantially in the fields of business, social and religious reformation, literature, art and music.(()BackgroundEuropeans started coming to Bengal in the 17th century.(Sengupta, Nitish, pp 119-126) The of Plassey in 1757 resulted in the deposition of the last independent Nawab of Bengal and the British (British East India Company) became the main ruling force in Bengal.The Bengal renaissance of the 19th century was a remarkable period of societal transformation in which whole range of creative activities  literary, cultural, social and economic- flourished(Sengupta, Nitish, pp 209-216) The Bengal Renaissance was the culmination of the process of emergence of the cultural characteristics of the Bengali people that had started in the age of Hussein Shah (14931519).(History of Bengali-speaking People by Nitish Sengupta, p 210, 212-213.) This spread over covering around three centuries had a tremendous impact on Bengali society. Incidentally that coincided with the rise of the Tagore family. The Tagore family attained prominence during this period through its unusual social positioning between Indian and European influences.To quote Chitra Deb,(Chitra Deb is a writer on social and historical subjects. She is attached to Bazar Patrika  and has made enormous contribution in the field of study of the Tagores.) Though the cultural role of the Thakurs has received the greatest attention by far, their importance on final assessment is a composite one: commercial and political as well as literary and musical. They played a collective role in every patriotic movement of their times: Mitras Mela, the Congress and the National Conference, the Rakhi Festival of 1905, and the Nationalist Movement generally. The story of the Thakurs is inseparable from the story of Calcutta, Bengal and India.OriginsThe family earlier held the title (surname) of Kushari, and hailed from District, now in Bangladesh. Two of the Kusharis, Panchanan and Sukdeb, settled in Gobindapur, one of the villages that developed into the city of Kolkata, and engaged in stevedoring business. Being Brahmins, the neighbours called them Thakurmashai, or holy sir. After the British gained control of the country, Thakur became their family name. In English, it was Anglicized to Tagore, with some variations in spelling within the family. They were Brahmins, a sort of outcaste in orthodox  Hindu society due to the conversion of three historical relatives to Islam.Darpanarayan Tagore (1731-1791), the first person in the family to gain prominence, earned major revenues through money-lending while spent as abundantly as he earned. When he quarrelled with his brother Nilmani Tagore over family matters the latter shifted out of the family household and settled in Mechuabazar, which later came to be known as Jorasanko. Subsequently, several other branches of the family settled in Pathuriaghata, Kailahata and Chorbagan, all neighbourhoods of the fledgling metropolis, particularly when Gobindapur was razed by the British for the construction of the new Fort William.(Deb, Chitra, p 64.)The Pathuriaghata familyGopimohan Tagore (17601819) was well known for his wealth and in 1822, made what may be the largest ever gift of gold to the Kali temple at Kalighat.(Dutta, Kalyani, Kalighat, in Calcutta, the Living City, Vol I, edited by Sukanta Chaudhuri, p 25, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-563696-1.) He was one of the founders of Hindu College, the institution that initiated western education in the country. He knew English, French, Portuguese, Sanskrit, Persian and Urdu, apart from Bengali.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 141)Coomar Tagore, (18011868), son of Gopimohan Tagore, was one of the leaders of the Landholders Society  and later the president of the Indian Association, the earliest organisations of Indians in the country. He had started as government lawyer but later turned his attention to family matters. Apart from being a director of Hindu College, he was involved with the activities of several institutions. Tagore Law lectures are organised by Calcutta University on the strength of donations he made. He was founder of the first local theatre  the Hindu theatre.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 313) He was the first Indian to be appointed to the Viceregal Legislative Council.(Cotton, H.E.A., Calcutta Old and New, 1909/1980, pp344-345, General Printers and Publishers Pvt. Ltd.)Tagore (18261890), son of Prasanna Coomar Tagore, converted to Christianity and married Kamalmani daughter of Mohan Banerjee. He was disowned by his father and disinherited. He went to England and qualified for the bar from Lincolns Inn. He became the first Indian to become a barrister. For sometime he taught Hindu Law and Bengali at the University of London.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 184, 313)Tagore (18311908), son of Harakumar Tagore, inherited the Pathuriaghata branch wealth. He contributed substantially to the development of theatre in Kolkata and was himself a keen actor. He inspired Madhusudan Dutt to write Tilottamasambhab Kabya and published it at his cost. In 1865, he established the Banganatyalaya at Pathuriaghata. He was keen in music also and patronised musicians. With his active support one of them, Kshetra Mohan Goswami, introduced the concept of orchestra in to Indian music for the first time in this country. He was president of the British Indian Association and was the first Indian to be member of the Royal Photographic Society.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 433)Tagore (18011877) and Jatindramohan were major patrons of European art. Their palatial home, the Tagore Castle(It was so named because it was built like a castle. It was one of the landmarks of old Kolkata, off old Chitpore.)  at Pathuriaghta had a major collection of European painters. Subsequently, members of the family took to oil-painting. Shoutindramohan Tagore (186598) was one of the first Indians to have studied at the Royal Academy.(Guha Thakurta, Tapati, Art in Old Calcutta, the Melting Pot of Western Styles, in Calcutta, the Living City, Vol I, edited by Sukanta Chaudhuri, pp 148-151, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-563696-1.) Shourindramohan Tagore (180-1914), son of Harakumar Tagore, was a great musician who was awarded the doctor of music titles by Philadelphia University in 1875 and by Oxford University in 1896. He was proficient in both Indian and Western music. He founded the Banga Sangeet Vidyalaya in 1871 and the Bengal Academy of Music in 1881. He was honoured by the Shah of Iran with the Nabab Shahzada title. The British government made him Knight Bachelor of the United Kingdom. He was also a playwright and Justice of the Peace. He was also a leading philanthropist of his time.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 532)The Jorasanko familyBusiness wealthTagore (17941846) was the man who ushered the family into its special role in Bengali history and culture. He was son of Nilmani Tagores second son, Rammani Tagore, but was adopted by the childless elder son, Ramlochan Tagore. He not only inherited the great wealth of the Jorasanko(Jorasanko is so called because of the two (jora) wooden or bamboo bridges (sanko) that spanned a small stream at this point. The celebrated seat of the Tagore family, it was also home of the Sinhas(including Kaliprasanna Sinha), the Pals (including Krishnadas Pal), and the families of Dewan Banarasi Ghosh and Chandramohan Chatterji. The area thus became the cradle of Bengal Renaissance, says Nair, P. Thankappan in The growth and Development of Old Calcutta in Calcutta, the Living City, Vol I, edited by Sukanta Chaudhuri, p 17, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-563696-1.) family but also built up an extensive business empire even while he worked as sheristadar, the highest position then open to Indians. He was a luxury loving prodigal.(Deb, Chitra, p 65.) His manners led his European friends to call him Prince.( He was a friend of Raja Rammohun Roy and played a leading role in the social development of the country.( He was a shareholder of Macintosh & Co, a director of the Commercial Bank, founder of the Union Bank, director of several insurance companies, established Carr & Tagore Co. and engaged in coal mining (pioneering work), silk and indigo trade, shipping and sugar manufacture. He established himself as an industrialist and one of the leading rich men in the society of his time.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 223)  He was the second person amongst the educated Indians, after Raja Rammohun Roy to sail to England in 1842, with two persons accompanying him, ignoring the prohibition of the pandits.(Sastri, Sivanath, p99.) Rabindranath Tagores creative multiplicity or Debendranath Tagores spiritual pursuits were, to a considerable extent, made possible because of the foundations of leisure provided by Dwarakanath Tagores wealth.(Sengupta, Nitish, p 258)Spiritual pursuitsAfter Dwarkanath Tagore, the leadership of the family passed on to Tagore(18071905) and Girindranath Tagore, the two sons of Dwarkanath Tagore. Debendranath Tagore founded the Brahmo religion and also started its journal Patrika. His children continued in the Brahmo Samaj. Girindranath Tagore also joined the Brahmo Samaj but his children, Ganendra and Gunendra, did not. Gunendras sons, Gaganendra, Samarendra and Abanindra branched out but retained cordial relationship with the Jorasanko family.(Debendranath Tagore took over the reins of the Brahmo Samaj in 1843 and not only resurrected it but also enriched it in many ways. It became the inspirtaion for the Bengal Renaissance.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 219)  It was he who gave the Brahmo movement the trappings of a separate faith and introduced its own unique rituals. The Brahmo Samaj cast a very wide-ranging influence on its parent Hindu society, much wider than its limited membership would ostensibly permit.(Sengupta, Nitish, p 242)Creative outpouringsSeveral of Debendranath Tagores children were brilliant. Tagore (18401926) was a great scholar, poet and music composer. He wrote extensively in the newspapers and magazines of the day on literature, philosophy and religion. He was editor of Bharati and Patrika. A pioneer in Bengali shorthand, he was one of organisers of the Mela(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, p 225)Tagore, (18421923), was the first Indian to join the Civil Service.in 1864. Earlier, he and his brother Ganendranath were among the first students to pass the Entrance Examination of Calcutta University in 1857. Even while serving in an adminsistrative job, he was a prolific writer, poet and song composer. Many of his nationalist songs are still sung. He was editor of Tattwabodhini Patrika and took an active interest in the Hindu Mela. He encourage his wife, Gyanadanandini Debi, to adopt western ideas and for that purpose took her to a governors party and also to England, something unthinkable in those days.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 554-555) Debendranaths third son Hemendranath was a strict disciplinarian who was entrusted with the responsibility of looking after the education of his younger brothers as well as administrating the large family estates.Like most of Debendranaths children, he had varied interests in different fields.On one hand he composed a number of Bromhosangeets and on the other,wrote articles on physical science which he planned to compile and edit into a text book for school students.If his untimely death had not prevented him from completing the project,this would certainly have been the first science text book to be written in Bengali.He was known for his physical strength and wrestling skills. Exceptionally for the times,he insisted on a formal education for his daughters.He not only put them through school but trained them in music, arts and European languages such as French and German.It was another mark of his forward looking mentality that he actively sought out eligible grooms from different provinces of India for his daughters and married them off in places as far away as UP and Assam.Tagore (18491925) was a scholar, artist, music composer and theatre personality. He knew several languages  Bengali, Sanskrit, English, Bengali, Marathi and Persian. In 1924, he translated Gita Rahasya of Bal Gangadhar Tilak into Bengali. He also translated several other books. He wrote several plays, and directed and acted in them. He composed songs that are still available in CDs. Around 2,000 of his paintings are in possession of Rabindra Bharati. A selection of his paintings were published in London in 1914, at the instance of Rothenstein.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 184-185)Tagore (18611941) his youngest son, was the first Asian to win a Prize, and was exceptionally talented and the most famous in the family. Rabindrinath is best remembered in history for writing what became the anthems of the nations of India and Bangladesh and for coining the title Mahatma for Indian nationalist leader Gandhi.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 454-455.)Amongst his daughters Devi (18551932) was a gifted writer, editor, song-composer and social worker. She was editor of Bharati, a remarkabale performance in an age when very few girls went to school. She also edited a childrens magazine Balak. Sakhi Samiti was developed by her as means for upliftment of women. Her husband Janakinath Ghosal was one of the founders of the Indian National Congress. As a result she also participated in his nationalistic activities. She was the author of several books.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 609-610.)The artistsAfter Rabindranath, the most notable in the Jorasanko family were Tagore  (18671938), Tagore (18711951), and Sunayani (18751962). They made an immense contribution to Indian art.(Deb, Chitra, p) Even earlier, Abanindranath Tagores grand father and father, Gindranath (18201854), Gunendranath (184781), and subsequently Abaindranath Tagores cousin, Hitendranath Tagore (18671908) and his nephew Jaminiprakash Ganguli, were all gifted and prolific painters, specialising in a genre of dusky landscapes and romantic studies of peasant life.Gaganendranath was a pioneer in many ways  in adopting Indian styles of painting after training in western art, and then absorbing Japanese styles.(Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali, pp 124-125.) However, it was his brother Abanindranath who inaugurated what became known as the Bengal school or Neo-Oriental school. Its influence spread across the country while it incorporated various strains of South Asian influence.(Mitra, Tapan, Art and Artists in Twentieth Century Calcutta, in Calcutta, the Living City, Vol I, edited by Sukanta Chaudhuri, p 261-62, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-563696-1.)The younger generationThe younger generation also contributed substantially. Dwijendranaths second son Sudhindranath (18691929) was a renowned author. His son Soumyendranath (190174) was well-known as a leftist politician. Satyendranaths son Surendranath (18721940) also had political links. His daughter Indira (18731960) distinguished herself in literature, music and womens movement. She married Chowdhury, a distinguished scholar and writer. The list does not end here. All of them had enormous talent and were brought up in an ideal environment of literary debates and discussions, musical compositions, painting, and theatrical performances. Tagore, a well-known Mumbai actress, connected with Tagore on both sides, in an interview stated that her mothers mother, Latika Tagore was the grand daughter of Rabindranath Tagores brother, Hijendranath sic.(Sharmila Tagore interview)Pranati Tagore is a renowned and eminent elocutionist, news reader and bengali actor. She is married to Satyendranath Tagores family branch.The family environmentThe environment at Jorasanko was filled with literature, music, painting and theatre. They had their own education system. In the earlier days, the women did not go to school but they were all educated at home. Swarnakumari Debi has recalled how in her early days the governess would write something on a slate which the girls then had to copy. When Debedranath discovered this, he at once stopped such a mindless and mechanical method and brought in a better teacher, Ajodhyanath Pakrashi  a male outsider in the womens quarters... Some of the sons like Ganendra, Gunendra and Jyoitrindra set up their own private theatre. To start with men played in the role of women, but over a period of time even the women joined.(Jorasanko and the Thakur Family by Chitra Deb in Calcutta, the Living City, edited by Sukanta Chaudhuri, Vol I, page 66) The environment in the family played a major role in the development of its members. Even Rabindranath Tagore who went to win the Nobel Prize in literature had very little formal education.(Please see of Rabindranath Tagore (1861-1901))Being somewhat conservative, Debendranath Tagore had put in many restrictions about members of the family participating in certain types of activities outside the house. Therefore, they brought the outside world into their house and the entire family, including the women participated. Two small examples will illustrate the environment: :A baiji named Saraswatibai, renowned for her singing, had come from Kashi. We wanted to listen to her singing. She charged six hundred rupees for a single nights performance. We sent Shyamsundar, Go and bargain, see what you can manage. Shyamsundar went and could fix her up for three hundred rupees. He came back and said, Three hundred rupees and two bottles of brandy. On hearing about the brandy we were taken aback, mummy could object. Shyamsundar said, She cannot sing without taking brandy. Everything was ready. Saraswati entered the gathering. She was demure, round nosed, nothing great. Natore said, Abanda, what have you done? Just thrown away three hundred rupees. She was going to sing two songs. Natore was ready to accompany her on the mridangam. As the clock struck ten she started singing. One song and it was eleven at night. Natore was paralysed with the mridnagam in his laps. The wonderful voice of Saraswati reverberated around that dance-hall. How wonderfully she had tuned her voice. Some of us with pillows in our laps, others with hands close to our hearts, we were all wonderstruck. The gathering was won over with just one song. Everyone was still immersed in the song, when Saraswati said, Aur kuch farmaiye. (present your wish). After listening to her, no one dared to put anything forward. Then I told Shyamsundar, Ask her to sing a bhajan. We have heard that bhajans of Kashi are very famous. She sang a bhajan known to all, Ao to Brajachandalal... (Come oh, Lord!) Everybody was dumbfounded...:... The atarwala (scent seller) had come, we used to call him Gabriel Saheb, a genuine Jew. It was as if Shylock from Shakespeares Merchant of Venice had come alive and travelled all the way from Istambul to sell atar (scent) on the southern veranda of the Jorasanko house... so many types of people came and so much happened...(Tagore, Abanindranath and Chanda, Rani, pp 72, 75-76.) Although the Jorasanko branch of the family had close links with Shilaidaha, in District, now in Bangladesh and Santiniketan, where Rabindranath developed Viswa Bharati,(visva-bharati) their roots were in the Jorasanko house. It was popular as Thakur Bari of the Tagores and now houses the Bharati University.References* Deb, Chitra, Jorasanko and the Thakur Family, in Calcutta, the Living City, Vol I, edited by Chaudhuri, pp 6467, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-563696-1 * * Sengupta, Nitish, History of the Bengali-speaking People, 2001/2002, UBS Publishers Distributors Pvt. Ltd., ISBN 81-7476-355-4 * Sengupta, Subodh Chandra and Bose, Anjali (editors), (1976/1998), Sansad Bangali Charitabhidhan (Biographical dictionary) Vol I, in Bengali, Sahitya Sansad ISBN 81-85626-65-0* Devi Choudhurani, Indira, Smritisamput Vol I (1997/2000), in Bengali, Rabindra Bhaban, Viswa Bharati.* Tagore, Abanindranath and Chanda, Rani, Jorasankor Dhare (By the side of Jorasanko) in Bengali,(1944/2003), Viswabaharati Publications Division.* Sastri, Sivanath, Ramtanu Lahiri O Tatkalin Banga Samaj in Bengali, (1903/2001), New Age Publishers Pvt. Ltd.Notes* Tagore family genealogy UniversityExternal links* Rabindra Bharati Museum, Kolkata - family chronology* Calcuttaweb - family tree* Hindu School,Kolkata
7855351
Taxation_in_Iran
Taxation in Iran generates particular unease among foreign firms because they appear to be arbitrarily enforced(Economist Intelligence Unit)  tax bills are initially based on assumed earnings calculated by the Finance and Economy Ministry according to the size of the company and the sector in which it operates. Factors such as the quality and location of a companys offices are also widely believed to have an impact on tax assessment. The year begins on March 21 and ends on March 20 of the next year. All foreign investors doing business in Iran or deriving income from sources in Iran are subject to taxation. Depending on the type of activity the foreign investor is engaged in, various taxes and exemptions are applicable, including tax, tax, tax, etc.(http://www.doingbusiness.org/ExploreTopics/PayingTaxes/Details.aspx?economyid91) The Ministry of Finance and Economic Affairs is the government agency authorized to levy and collect taxes. There are virtually millions of people who do not pay taxes in Iran and hence operate outside the formal economy.(Ahmadinejads Achilles Heel: The Iranian Economy) As part of the Economic Reform Plan, the government has proposed tax increases on traders in gold, steel, fabrics and other sectors, prompting several work stoppages by merchants.()An estimated 50 percent of Irans GDP was exempt from taxes in FY 2004.(http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/pdf/CS_Iran.pdf) In 2008, about 55% of the governments budget came from oil and natural gas revenues, the rest from taxes and fees.(Iran: Crude price pegged at dlrs 39.6 a barrel under next years budget Retrieved 30 January 2008) The economy is also important.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ir.html)Income taxThere are five categories of income earned by individuals. Each category is taxed separately and has its own computational rules.*Salaries (see below);*Income from professions, trades, and miscellaneous sources; (see here)*Incidental or windfall earnings; (see here)*Real estate income (see under Real estate tax section below)*Income derived from agriculture (see under Tax exemptions section below)For taxable income consisting of salary and benefits, employers are required to make the necessary tax deductions from their employees payroll and submit them to the tax authorities. However, when calculating taxable income, exemptions and deductions are allowed. As of 2009, only government employees were paying their fair share of income taxes.(http://www.atimes.com/atimes/Middle_East/JH26Ak02.html)Individuals of Iranian nationality resident in Iran are subject to tax on all their income whether earned in Iran or abroad. Foreign nationals working in Iran are also subject to the same income tax based on their salary. Non-resident individuals are liable to pay tax only on their Iranian-sourced income. Foreign employees cannot obtain an visa from Iran unless they provide proof that they have paid their due taxes, and since they need to obtain an exit permit when their presence in Iran is based on a work permit, the government can easily enforce this rule. The government assumes a certain salary for employees depending on their position and country of origin. The assumed minimum monthly salaries in 2004 range from US$2,500 for unskilled European workers to US$7,000 for European directors.Islamic taxesIn addition to these mandatory taxes, taxes are collected on a voluntary basis. These include an individuals income tax (Arabic khums, one-fifth); an alms-tax (zakat), which has a variable rate and benefits charitable causes; and a land tax (kharaj), the rate of which is based on the principle of one-tenth (ushr) of the value of crops, unless the land is tax-exempt.Real estate taxRental income is subject to real estate income tax in Iran. A fixed deduction of 25% of the gross income is extended to all taxpayers to account for income-generating expenses. The net income, which is 75% of the gross rent, is then subject to the same rates as in the above table (max. 35%). Rental income is exempted from real estate tax if the property is a residential property leased as such and measures up to 150 sq. m. if it is located in Tehran (up to 200 sq. m. if it is located in other parts of the country).(In Iran the transfer of land, not the land itself, is subject to taxation. Transfer of properties: 5% of the transaction value (15% for new buildings).(Capital gains taxAs of 2009, Iran has no gains tax on the sale of estate assets. However, a capital gain tax will be introduced with the implementation of the 2010 economic reform plan.(http://www.atimes.com/atimes/Middle_East/JH26Ak01.html)(http://www.turquoisepartners.com/iraninvestment/IIM-AprMay09.pdf)Capital marketsAs of July 2010, taxes on TSE transactions are as follows:*dividend: none (22.5% at source from Company).(Tehran Stock Exchange: FACT BOOK. Retrieved July 31, 2010)*Share transfers: the Tax Amendment has changed the regulations regarding calculation of tax on transfer of shares and their rights in Iranian corporate entities.**In the case of shares listed on the Tehran Stock Exchange (TSE) the tax on transfer of such shares and other rights is 0.5 per cent of the sales price.()**In the case of transfer of the shares and their rights to other corporate entities (i.e. those not listed on the TSE) a flat rate of four per cent of value of the shares and rights transferred applies. No other taxes will be charged. The Amendment has removed the requirement to value the shares in this category.(Exemptions*gain: no tax (bonds or equities).((http://www.feas.org/Member.cfm?MemberID21)*income: no tax.(*Participation papers: Profit and awards accrued are tax exempt.(http://www.irantradelaw.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/03/Irans-Foreign-Trade-Regime-Report.pdf)*Listed companies: 10% tax exemption, companies holding 20% free loat shares are provided 20% tax exemption.(*Foreign investors: Foreign investors in TSE are tax-exempt.()Inheritance taxInheritance taxes are levied at progressive rates depending on the relationship between the deceased and the heir.*Category I: (first degree heirs) parents, spouse, children, grandchildren*Category II: (second degree heirs) grandparents, siblings, nieces, nephews*Category III: (third degree heirs) uncles, aunts, children of uncles and auntsA deduction allowance of IRR30 million (US$3,230) is extended to each first degree heir. First degree heirs who are below 20 years of age or are incapacitated are entitled to the maximum deduction allowance of IRR50 million (US$5,383).The inheritance tax rates are as follows:(http://www.globalpropertyguide.com/Middle-East/Iran/Inheritance)Corporate profit taxA new flat rate corporation tax of 25 per cent payable on the profits of corporate commercial entities has been introduced. This rate replaces the old corporation tax of 10 per cent and progressive rates of income tax (12-54 per cent) on reserves and distributable income. Apart from the 25 per cent corporation tax and the 0.3 per cent Chamber of Commerce tax no more taxes will be payable by the corporate entity or the shareholders.(http://www.austrade.gov.au/australia/layout/0,,0_S2-1_CLNTXID0019-2_-3_PWB1151550-4_doingbusiness-5_-6_-7_,00.html#taxation)The new rate of corporation tax will also apply to venture corporate entities registered in Iran. The incidence will therefore be on the corporate entity and not on the shareholder. The calculation of the tax has been simplified.All contracting work performed by foreign contractors, whether or not the company is registered in Iran, is taxed. For contracts signed before March 21, 2003, gross taxable income is calculated as gross contract receipts less the cost of imported material. Income is then taxed at 12% of gross taxable income less contract retention. For contracts signed after March 21, 2003, taxable income is the gross contract receipts less contract expenses. Income is taxed at 25 per cent less 5 per cent taxes withheld at source.Taxation of foreign companiesGenerally speaking, Iran has two types of laws concerning foreign companies. The first are laws that address issues concerning foreign companies directly such as the Foreign Investment Promotion and Protection Act (FIPPA) and the second are general laws of which certain articles or by-laws address foreign companies, for instance the Taxation Law and the Labor Law. The Tax Act had divided the source of income earned by foreign companies either direct or through their branches in Iran into three main categories (http://www.iran-export.com/invcli/taxation.htm):*Income earned in Iran by way of contracting operations*Income earned from Iran by way of royalties and licensing fees*Other activities - trading operations, etc.The Amendment has introduced certain changes in the tax treatment of the above activities.Foreign legal entities must pay taxes on all taxable income earned through investments in mainland Iran or from direct or indirect (through agents, branch offices, etc.) activities in mainland Iran, at the flat rate of 25% as mentioned in Article 47 of the Amendment law.(http://www.taxarticles.info/2009/06/iran-tax-system-at-a-glance/)Income from royalty and licensing fees received from industrial and mining companies, government ministries and municipalities, and income from film-screening rights are subject to a deemed taxable coefficient on income of 20 per cent. All other income from royalties and licences from foreign companies is subject to a deemed taxable coefficient on income of 30 per cent. The coefficients are based on the standard corporate tax rate of 25 per cent, so that the tax rate is either 5 per cent or 7.5 per cent.(The Amendment has removed the confusion surrounding technical assistance contracting by including technical assistance and transfer of technology in contracting operations subject to tax on the basis of 12 per cent of annual fees.Tax on Liaison, Representative and Branch OfficesThe same corporate and profit taxes will be applied to the taxable income of branches of foreign companies (contractors, consultant engineers, et al.)Other income earning activities of foreign branches will be subject to taxation on an actual basis, i.e. based on their income tax return as filed and supported by their statutory accounting books.(Expenses incurred in Iran by Iranian registered branches and representative offices of foreign companies that are not authorised by their head offices to engage in any trading activity but are only authorised to conduct marketing and market research in Iran are tax deductible upon presentation of receipts from their head office.Tax advantages & exemptions*Income tax exemptions are available to new factories established in special areas, and last from four to eight years, from the first day of operations. In addition, 80% of the reported profit of all manufacturing, mining, assembly plant and related engineering companies are exempt from income taxes. Tax incentives, meanwhile, are available to manufacturing, mining, agricultural activities, exports and investment in special areas.(*In the agricultural sector, by virtue of Article 81 of the,(Direct Taxation Act) the revenues of activities in the fields of agriculture, animal husbandry and livestock, pisciculture, apiculture, raising poultry, hunting, fisheries, sericulture, and restoration of forests, pasturage, orchards, trees and palms of whatever kind are exempted from taxation.*The income of rural, tribal, and agricultural cooperative societies and those of fishermen, laborers, employees, students and their unions are 100 percent tax exempt.*The revenues from hand woven carpets and handicrafts and the related production cooperative companies and unions are exempt from taxation.*The revenues of inventors or discoverers from their innovations and discoveries are exempt from taxation. Also revenues of research and development activities of institutes which have obtained licenses for such activities from the relevant ministries will be exempt from taxation for 10 years as of the entry into force of the Amendment, according to the provisions of the relevant circular of the Council of Ministers.*Profit and awards accrued to participation papers are tax exempt.*All housing production projects for the low-income groups and housing production in the dilapidated urban fabrics will enjoy a discount of around 50% on construction tariffs and construction density fees. The remaining amount can be paid in installments and will not be subject to any commission fees.(Foreign Investment Promotion and Protection Act (FIPPA)Location requirement for tax-exemption:#If investment located out of a 120-kilometer radius from the center of Tehran,#If investment located out of a 50-kilometer radius from the center of Isfahan,#If investment located out of a 30-kilometers radius from the centers of provinces (except for the Industrial Estates within this radius)100% of taxable income of all units located in less developed areas shall be tax exempted for a period of 10 years.Tax exemption - major changesThe exemptions on exports of manufactured and agricultural goods remain in force, but an ambiguity has occurred in the amendment regarding exemptions extended to the public sector (Iranian Government owned entities). Government owned enterprises and their shares in the private sector entities were excluded from all exemptions granted under the Tax Act.(This exclusion has been removed from the relevant texts in the amendment. Until clarification is provided, it is not certain whether or not the government minority shares in the private sector manufacturing, mining and exports activities would enjoy the exemptions granted.(The 50 per cent tax exemption previously granted to tourism enterprises has been extended to include five-star hotels.(http://www.iio.ir/WebGenerator/PageView.aspx?src7)LossesLosses sustained by all taxpayers engaged in trading and other activities, who are required to keep proper books of account, provided they are accepted by the tax authorities; will be carried forward and written off against future profits for a period of three years.(Appeals procedureIt is noteworthy to point out that the Amendment has removed the second stage of appeal process. Appeals to the High Council of Taxation could only be made on questions of non-compliance with the provisions of the Tax Act rather than questions of fact.Official accountantsThe Amendment has for the first time after 1979 reintroduced the concept of the tax audit to be undertaken by official accountants and their designated firms. The taxpayer or the tax administration can choose to appoint an official accountant or a designated firm of official accountants to examine his records and report to the tax authorities.The accounting profession is not particularly organized in Iran. However, the influence of the foreign accounting practices implies an evolution and a relation between the Iranian accountants training and the American one. Thus, an increasing number of accountants and Iranian auditors receives an American training and apply it in Iran. This will contribute to strengthen the harmonization of Iranian book-keeping systems with international standards. KPMG and PriceWaterhouseCoopers are both present in Iran. The main professionals and representative organization in Iran is The Iranian Institute of Certified Accountants.Indirect Taxes (sales, VAT)In 2008, tax rate in Iran was 3%.(http://www.doingbusiness.org/ExploreTopics/PayingTaxes/Details.aspx?economyid91) Value Added Tax Act (VATA) was put into effect since mid-year 1387 (2008).(Press TV - VAT to replace Iran sales tax in fall) Its implementation was suspended following 10 days of widespread demonstrations across Iran in October 2008.(http://www.payvand.com/news/08/dec/1173.html) This Act has substituted all previous laws and regulations dealing with indirect taxes (including sales tax). According to the VATA, supply of commodities and services, as well as their imports and exports, shall be subject to the provisions of this Law.According to article 16 of this Act, the VAT rate is 1.5 percent, but the VAT rates of certain goods such as cigarettes and tobacco products and gasoline and jet fuel are respectively 12 and 20 percent. In addition to the VAT rates just mentioned, article 38 of VATA levies the following duties on goods and services which are subject to this Act:(The fifth development plan stipulates that VAT is to be increased by 1% each year, in order that it reaches 8% by the end of the plan. As of 2010, VAT for goods and services (except oil and tobacco products) was 3%.(http://www.turquoisepartners.com/iraninvestment/IIM-Dec10.pdf)VAT tax exemptionVAT will not apply to free trade zones in Iran. However, goods and services entering Irans customs territory will be subject to payment of VAT according to the law.(http://www.presstv.com/detail.aspx?id107765&sectionid351020102) Articles 12 and 13 stipulate that supply and importation of some commodities and services including the following shall be exempt from the VATA:*a) Unprocessed agricultural products;*b) Livestock and live poultry, aquatic products, honey bees and silkworms;*c) All types of fertilizers, pesticides, seeds and saplings;*d) Bakery flour, bread, meat, sugar, rice, cereals and soya, milk, cheese, shortening and baby formula;*e) Books, press, notebooks and all types of printing papers, writing pads and papers and press papers;*f) Passenger goods for personal use, as exempted under the Export-Import Regulations ;*g) Immovable property;*h) All types of medicine, medical consumables, medical services (human, animal or plant) as well as rehabilitation and other supportive services;*i) Services subject to payment of salary taxes envisaged in the Direct Taxation Law;*j) Banking and credit services rendered by banks, credit institutes and cooperatives, authorized interest-free loan funds and cooperative funds;*k) Public transportation services and urban and inter-city roads, railway, air and sea passenger transport services;*l) Hand woven carpets;*m) All types of research and training services, as stipulated in a By-Law to be approved by the Council of Ministers;*n) Animal and poultry feed;*o) Export of goods and services from official exit points. Any tax paid on account of such exports shall be reimbursed (as regards commodities) upon submitting a certification of the customs certifying the export of goods. Added Tax (VAT) does not apply to free trade zones (FTZ) in Iran. However, goods and services entering Irans customs territory from FTZs will be subject to payment of VAT according to the law.(Municipal taxMunicipal tax in Iran is 3%.(http://fita.org/countries/fiscalite_59.html) (plan to replace it with VAT tax)E-commerceNeither the Electronic Commerce Law of 2004 nor any other Iranian legislation deals specifically with taxation arising from e-commerce.(http://www.ebusinessforum.com/index.asp?layoutrich_story&doc_id8404&titleOverview+of+e%2Dcommerce+in+Iran&channelid4&categoryid31)CustomsAs of 2006, imports to Iran valued at more than IR500,000 ($50,000) must undergo pre-shipment quantity and quality inspection in their country of origin by an internationally recognised inspection organisation (such as S.A.). Goods exported to Iran must be subject to invoices authenticated by the Iranian Embassy and by a nominated Chamber of Commerce operating in the suppliers country.(Tariff ratesFile:Trade balance.png|thumb|right|Irans balance (2000-2007)File:IRANbalanceofpayment.jpg|thumb|right|Irans of payment (2003-2007). Its account (both long and short term) has been decreasing during that same period.(http://en.tpo.ir/UserFiles/File/Mehr%20&%20Azar.pdf)SmugglingOne third of the imported goods in Iran are delivered through the market, economy, and illegal jetties.( Iran is modernizing the customs to prevent the smuggling of contraband in and out of the country worth $12 billion annually.(http://www.iran-daily.com/1387/3274/html/economy.htm) Other estimates put the value of smuggled goods into Iran alone at $5.5 billion-$6 billion annually. In 2010, Police in Iran estimated about $16 billion worth of goods is smuggled into Iran each year. $12 billion worth of goods are illegal to have or own in Iran, with the remaining $4 billion being legal goods that are legal to own in Iran.(http://www.havocscope.com/regions-main/middle-east/iran/)Largest black markets in Iran are that of:((http://www.havocscope.com/ranking/products/alphabetical/)*Drug smuggling ($8.5 billion),*Petroleum smuggling (>$1.3 billion),*Alcohol smuggling ($912.5 million),*Cigarette smuggling,*Prostitution,*trafficking,*Corruption,*Pirated movies and software piracy.One Majlis member recently stated that IRGC black-market activities alone might account for $12 billion per year.(http://rand.org/pubs/monographs/2008/RAND_MG821.pdf) Iranian commander Mohammadreza Yazdi has stated that all IRGC economic activities are legitimate.(http://www.payvand.com/news/11/mar/1210.html ) Besides the IRGC, rogue elements within the of Iran, Bonyads and the Bazaar are allegedly involved in the smuggling activity.(Up to 80 percent of these goods enter the country through unregistered ports and jetties in the gulf, thus undermining the domestic industries in agriculture, garment, textile, home appliances, electronics, etc.(http://www.iran-daily.com/1388/12/11/MainPaper/3630/Page/4/?NewsID11600)(http://www.nitc.co.ir/iran-daily/1388/3438/html/economy.htm#s389754)(http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20100809/ap_on_re_mi_ea/ml_iran_sanctions_2)Dubai and Khasab in the Persian Gulf are important foreign centers of smuggling into Iran.( These imports enter Iran through major ports such as Abbas or free trade zones such as the islands of Kish and Qeshm.( Excessive tariffs (for items such as clothing for example) also contributes to smuggling in Iran.(http://iranprimer.usip.org/resource/bazaar)As per 2010 Iranian customs report $14.43 billion worth of goods were smuggled in and out of Iran out of which $13.25 billion dollars was the value of goods smuggled into Iran leading to loss of some 600,000 jobs.(http://ibnlive.in.com/generalnewsfeed/news/over-usd14b-worth-of-goods-smuggled-in-and-out-of-iran-last-yr/727774.html)DumpingEconomic dumping by countries like China stem from a combination of factors such as overpriced/low-quality of comparable Iranian goods (i.e., lack of competitiveness) in most cases and low Iranian tariff rates for those goods.(http://www.iran-daily.com/1387/3326/html/economy.htm) Iran has since passed a law that bans the import of foreign goods and services when similar products or capacities already exist in Iran.(http://www.nourlaw.com/newsletter/newsletter.html#Iranian_Government_Bans_Purchase_of_Certain_Foreign_Goods)(http://www.presstv.com/detail.aspx?id121954&sectionid351020101)(http://www.payvand.com/news/10/aug/1249.html) Adaptation by domestic suppliers to Iranian consumer tastes and the marketing process needs also to be developed and improved.ModernizationIn an effort to streamline and harmonize the customs procedure with other governmental andprivate partners, the of Iran has selected ASYCUDAWORLD as a tool for its customs administration in order to move toward e-commerce and e-customs. This project is a technical cooperation project between the Islamic Republic of Iran Customs Administration (IRICA), Nations Conference on Trade and Development and UNDP.(http://sdnhq.undp.org/e-gov/retreat/arns/Iran_e-customs.pdf)As of March 21, 2010, all imported goods must have barcode stickers Iran Code that meet the national and international standards.(http://www.iran-daily.com/1388/12/11/MainPaper/3630/Page/4/Index.htm)Free trade zones and re-exportadded tax (VAT) will not apply to free trade zones in Iran. However, goods and services entering Irans customs territory will be subject to payment of VAT according to the law.( In accordance with Article 12 of the Export-Import Regulations Act, the pre-exportation entry (temporary importation) of materials and goods to be used in producing, finishing, processing and packaging of exported goods are exempted from all import duties.(See also*labor law*of major economic laws in Iran*of Iran*International Rankings of Iran in Economy*rates around the world*of Iran*Bonyad - Irans foundations which control 20% of Irans GDP.*Fiscal policy in Iran*of Economic Affairs and Finance (Iran)*calendarReferences and notesExternal links;Taxation*Paying Taxes in Iran - Bank* Ministry of Finance in Iran - Direct tax laws*Annual Reviews - Reports by the Bank of Iran, including macro-economic data, sectoral activity and labor statistics.*Corporate Income Tax in Iran - Iran Trade Point*Summary of Principal Iranian Taxes (Note: document has not been updated)*Tehran Chamber of Commerce - Offers free tax consulting for companies intending to invest in Iran* Nur Law - Database on Iranian laws and regulations*US Social Security Administration - Irans entry (details on Irans social security laws);Customs*Islamic Republic of Irans Customs Administration*Irans Export-Import Regulation Act (2002)*Irans list of countries which have signed double taxation convention, or bilateral reciprocal promotion & protection of investment agreements*Australian trade: Doing business in Iran - Many practical information including importation procedure to Iran.
7868149
Mahlasela_Pass
The Mahlasela pass is a tarred pass in the Maluti mountains of Lesotho, reaching a height of 3222 meters.(Road Sign Elevation Photo, Jaco van Tonder, 2003) It is one of two passes that links the town of Butha-Buthe with the diamond mining town of Mokhotlong, the other pass being the pass.(Map of Lesotho, South and North Sheet, Lesotho Government, 1978) Heavy snowfalls frequently closes the pass in winter. The only skiing resort in Lesotho, Afriski is situated here. It is considered to be the highest road pass in Southern Africa.ReferencesPass
7872784
Mhlbach_am_Hochknig
Mhlbach am Hochknig is a municipality in Johann im Pongau district, Salzburgerland, Austria. Population Its population was 1,622 inhabitants in 2005. Its 854 meters above sea level and its postcode is 5505. Location Mhlbach am Hochknig is found approximately 8 km to the west of Bischofshofen and some 45 minutes south of the city of Salzburg at the foot of the Hochknig mountain in the Austrian state of Salzburg. Surroundings A former copper mining town it is now mainly known as a winter ski resort and summer hiking area. There are many mountains around the area, such as Schneeberg, and there are also a lot of hotels, such as Sporthotel Neuwirt. Another hotel, Arturhaus is outside the town, and The hotel /Alpengasthof Birgkarhaus sits at 1400m in the heart of the Hochkonig ski slopes. Sports A number of ski schools also operate. There are many easy slopes around the Arthurhaus area which make Mhlbach a good place to go for beginners, as well as many km of intermediate slopes.Mhlbach is also part of the King Mountain Ski Area. Gallery Image:MuelhbachAmHochkoenig1.jpg|Mhlbach Am HochknigImage:HochkoenigFromSchneeberg.jpg|Hochknig viewed from SchneebergImage:MHLBACH TOWN.JPG|Mhlbach Am HochknigImage:MHLBACH CHURCH.JPG|The church in Mhlbach Am HochknigImage:SCHNEEBERG_MHLBACH.JPG|The view from Schneeberg Mountain. Clouds can be seen. See also * Salzburg* Salzburgerland External links *Local Tourist Board *Local Government*Local Ski Services am Houchkinigam Hochknigam Hochknigam Hochknigam Hochknigru:--am Hochknigam Hochknigam Hochknig
7885159
Novky
Novky is a town in the District, Region in western Slovakia. Power Plant, a thermal power plant is located near the town.The town is one of the centres of brown coal mining in Slovakia.()GeographyThe town is located in the upper River valley, between the Vtnik and vrchy ranges, about  from Prievidza. In 1942, during the reign of the Nazi puppet government of Independent Slovakia, nearby barracks were used for the assembly and detention of Slovak Jews from all over the country, pending their deportation to Nazi death camps in German occupied Poland. The camp was guarded by the Slovak Hlinka Guard militia.HistoryThe first written record about Novky was in 1113 as Nuovac. It has town status since 1961.DemographicsAccording to the 2001 census, the town had 4,402 inhabitants. 97.32% of inhabitants were Slovaks, 0.89% Czechs, 0.41 Roma and 0.25% Hungarians.() The religious make-up was 75.91% Catholics, 18.06% people with no religious affiliation and 1.57% Lutherans.(ReferencesExternal links* Town websitecs:Novkyde:Novkyeo:Novkyfr:Novkyhr:Novkyit:Novkyhu:Nyitranovknl:Novkypl:Novkyro:Novkyru:sk:Novkywar:Novky
7888518
Guji_Oromo_people
The Guji Oromo are an ethnic Oromo group living in southern Ethiopia. They are part nomadic and part agrarian. According to a population projection from 2007, the total population of the Guji Oromo is above 5 million.The Guji live in fertile and natural resource-rich land in the Ethiopia; the Zone in the Region is named for them. The known gold mining area of Adola (or Mangest), the dense natural forest of Bada Magada, the National Park and Shakiso-Adola evergreen forests are the natural areas which have been conserved by the Guji Oromo.The Guji people are known for using a large number and wide variety of proverbs in many social and conversational contexts ( Tadesse Jaleta Jirata. 2009. A contextual study of the social functions of Guji-Oromo proverbs. Saabruecken: DVM Verlag.).Notes(Sources* Dejene N. Debsu. 2009. Gender and culture in southern Ethiopia: an ethnographic analysis of Guji-Oromo womens customary rights. African Study Monographs 30.1: 15-36.* Loo, Joseph van and Bilow Kola. 1991. Guji Oromo culture in southern Ethiopia: Religious capabilities in rituals and songs. Berlin: Dietrich Reimer Verlag.* Taddesse Berisso. 2000. The Riddles of Number Nine in Guji-Oromo Culture. Journal of Ethiopian Studies Volume 33.1: 49-66.de:Guji-Oromoeo:Guioj
7899351
Mount_Dundas__Zeehan_Railway
Mount Dundas- Zeehan Railway(Also known as the Maestris Tram)The Dundas to Zeehan railway line was a seven mile (11 km) long railway line on the West Coast of Tasmania. Operation It was built by the Mount Dundas and Zeehan Railway Company and opened on the 25th April 1892. ( page 138 )  Under an agreement signed on 4 February, 1891, the Government Railways TGR operated the line.On 28 June, 1899, the Emu Bay Railway EBR agreed to purchase the Dundas railway, however the TGR continued to operate it.The closure of the Silver Bell smelters in 1913 virtually ended mining in the Dundas district, leaving the railway with only a small amount of passenger and timber traffic. By 1921, Dundas had only 55 people. Between 1922 and 1924, the line carried no revenue passengers and only very small amounts of freight. By 1926, timetables merely listed stations on the line and noted that trains ran as required. After a derailment in August, 1931, the TGR refused to work the line. The EBR provided a locomotive to work whatever trips ran thereafter, until a stop block was placed at the junction in June, 1932. (  page 138 ) The official closure date is given as 5 July, 1932, after which contractors were permitted to work timber over the line by horse-power. The rails were lifted in 1940.(The Tasmanian Government Railways on the West Coast Stokes, H.J.W. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, January;February, 2003 pp3-21;43-62)Stopping Places* Zeehan* Rayna Junction (junction with Emu Bay Railway from 21.12.1900.* Brickworks -- Also known as Brickfields Siding from 1905* Mathers* Leslie* Nobbys -- also known as Nobbys Cutting Siding* Brewery Junction* Dundas -- also known as Mount Dundas* Maestris (station for the Comet Mine) See also *Bay Railway*East Dundas Tramway*on the West Coast of Tasmania Notes  References * * * * : 2003 edition - Queenstown: Municipality of Queenstown. :1949 edition - Hobart: Davies Brothers. ; ASIN B000FMPZ80:1924 edition - Queenstown: Mount Lyell Tourist Association. ; ASIN B0008BM4XC* 
7917570
Cwmparc
Cwmparc is a village and a district of the community of Treorchy, in the Rhondda Valley, Wales. History Early legends tell of a medieval park, or hunting preserve, in the area called Parc Cwm Brychiniog, which was subsequently made into four farms in Tudor times, one of which was called Parc Uchaf and another Parc Isaf. Thus the area became known as Cwmparc and its stream Nant Cwmparc (Cwm being the Welsh for valley). With the development of the mining village in this part of the Wales Valleys in the 19th century, the village also became known as Cwmparc.Details of the early history and development of Cwmparc are contained within the booklet, History of Cwmparc. King Coal Invades a Sylvan Valley by Mr Gwyn Prosser which was awarded the prize at Treorchy Semi-National Eisteddfod in 1923. The author describes Cwmparc in 1923 as a mining village of considerable pretensions, aspiring almost to the more dignified name of township with a population of about five thousand. He describes the Parc colliery and, further down the valley, the Dare colliery, and the constant processions of coal-laden trucks running down the railway that flanked the Parc River. Early Cwmparc The pioneer of Cwmparcs development was David Davies of Llandinam described as, foremost of Welsh industrial kings and founder of the renowned Ocean Coal Company, who had in 1862 negotiated with Bailey to commence coal mining on the Tremains Estate. Sinking operations were begun in August 1866 and by the end of that year Parc Pit had produced its first output of coal. The Building of Tallis Street around 1890 thumb|left|Parc and Dare Workmens HallGwyn Prosser describes(History of Cwmparc. King Coal Invades a Sylvan Valley, written by Gwyn Prosser, Republished: Free press - Leader 1936)  how Railway Terrace was the first of the new streets in Cwmparc to be built near to the railway leading from the pithead. The street was known euphemistically as Tub Row because of the habit of the occupants for leaving their tin bath tubs out on the pavements in the evening, thus setting a trap for, and imperilling the life and limbs of unwary strangers on a dark night. As for the rest of the village he describes how Parc Road, the main street, now more than half a mile long, contained the more reputable buildings, such as the institute, two hotels and three chapels. Mr Prosser details how, with the influx of population, housing in the early days of Cwmparc was a major problem.In particular he recalls one elderly residents recollection of how when she came to Cwmparc her family consisting of a mother, father and four children managed to secure accommodation in a shepherds cottage, Parc Bach. The extent of the overcrowding can be seen when you realise that the cottage already accommodated the shepherd, his family and three other lodgers. With such a demand it was not long before builders and property speculators moved into the area, thus in 1867 Cwmdare Street was completed and most of Parc Street the following year. Tallis Street, Barrett Street and Vicarage Terrace were soon to follow erected by a local building club enterprise. Tallis Street was named in honour of Mr A.S. Tallis, manager of Dare Colliery and Barrett Street in honour of a well-respected Scottish doctor in the neighbourhood.Thirteen years later in 1936 the author provided an additional chapter to update his work. When looking at the then current state of the village there is quite a different tone from that taken thirteen years previously. He describes the industrial history of the village as being overhung with gloom and the district as being haunted by the spectre of unemployment. The villages main employer, and indeed reason for being, The Parc and The Dare pits had always worked intermittently and had been unable to absorb all the eager claimants for work. There had been moments of industrial strife, notably the 1926 strike and the stay in strikes of 1935.In 1954 the Coal Board merged the two pits, and finally in 1966 after a hundred years of production the Parc and Dare pit closed for the last time, leaving Cwmparcs sylvan valley to revert in some measure back to its original beauty. WWII Bombing On the night of April 29th 1941, during the World War, Cwmparc was bombed by the German Air Force (Luftwaffe). There were many casualties with some 27 dead, three of whom were evacuees; all members of the same family. The evacuees were all buried in the same grave in Cemetery. This event was the biggest loss of life that the Rhondda suffered in a single night of WWII bombing. Notable people from Cwmparc*Burnett - former darts world champion*Robert Thomas - Sculptor*Tresize - writer*Ian Watkins - Pop Singer*Williams - Orient football managerExternal links*Heritage Trail:Cwmparc*Welsh Coal Mines - research the local pit histories*www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Cwmparc and surrounding areaNotescy:Cwm-parc
7934089
Hybe
Hybe (in Hungarian: Hibbe) is a village and municipality in the Mikul District in the Region of northern Slovakia.HistoryThe village of Hybe was first mentioned in historical records in 1239.The village was founded around the end of the 12th century, as a Slovak settlement. Hybe was named from the river Hybica. In 1230 the village was owned by Hauk, Polk and Beuch from Uhorsk Ves. In 1239, King IV of Hungary took it from them and associated it with the royal property. In 1396, Hybe gives from monarch market liberties and toll free. In the 1. half of 13th century move in German Sasses (probably from neighbor Spi).In 1265 Hybe purchase city privileges like mining city - in 13th century the citizens trying mine a gold on the root of the mountain Kriv. On sign of village is digger and hoe, which is remain unchanged to today. Mining was too useless because of poory gold lode and because of high expenses in hard terrain. Part of gold miners went to Bocianska dolina.In 1390 Hybe was got into property of Liptov District Administrator and become villein small town of domination in Hrdok. Between 14th a 15th centuries mining retreated farming and crafts.Despite of villein ratio to Hrdok, Hybe was became important farming and culture center of top part of Liptov from the end of 19th century to 1. Half of 20th century. Above 20 kinds of crafts was in the village but the most widespread was - builders, which become famous specialists at building of City fo Budapest.PresentSocially important infrastructure in the village represent: infant school, elementary school, palace of culture, Evangelic church, Catholic Church, house of Dobroslav Chrobk and library. Both churches, memorable house of Dobroslav Chrobk, memorable house of poet Jakub Grajchman, grave of Jakub Grajchman with gravestone, memorable house of Alojz trbl are inhere in the Central list ancient monument foundation of Republic, on the list: Culture monuments. Entire center of village is promulgated for national culture treasure. On the present is on the village created strong sports background, local sportsmen get awards in the slovak competitions, primarily in the country skiing. In the Hybe are very good conditions for winter sports, cyclo-tourism, tourism in Hybe gully or into mineral springs and for mushrooms. There is situated ski lift and certified racing track. In village is volunteer fireman brigade.Local school visit kids from surrounding villages (Boca, Boca, Lehota, Maluin). School has good equipped Computer class within of program Infovek, on Hybes school is a lot of activities like tennis, badminton, football and in winter hockey.Notable residentsTodays citizens of Hybe take pride in their cultural history, on men of the day, which came from Hybe and prove competent in a number of areas social and cultural life of Slovak Republic. There are some of them  writers Grajchman and Chrobak, writer and screenwriter Jaro, historian and writer Rudo Brt, poet Jlius Lenko, actors Ivan Rajniak, Ondrej Jariabek, Teodor Piovari, Slavo Zhradnk, director Ondrej Rajniak, director of amateur theatre Ruzena Jariabekov, academic painter Pavol Michalides, architects Jn Svetlk, Jozef Chrobk, Vladimir Chrobk, Jn Mlynr and many others.GeographyThe municipality lies at an altitude of 690 metres and covers an area of 52.866 km. It has a population of about 1602 people.It lies in north part of Republic. It is situated in Liptov fold between Tatras and Tatras, in valley of Hybica and White Vh.Hybe in cinematographyThanks to the works of the writer Jaro, Hybe have been depicted in Slovak cinematography.Pacho the Brigand of Hybe (1975) - from director Martin apk (screenplay from Hybes writer Peter Jaro). This movie is about historical legend - brigand pacho, who helped poor people and fight with poorness like Jnok.The Millenial Bee (1983) - The saga about builder lineage of Pichandovci (by novel of Peter Jaro), which is located in small village in years 1887 - 1917. This movie belongs between the best movie of central Europe. On movie works several important people from social and cultural life after 1968. Director Jakubisko, Screenwriter Peter Jaro, Music - Petr Hapka and famous slovak actors Michal Doolomansk (as Valent Pichanda), tefan Kvietik (as Samo Pichanda), Pavol Mikulk (as Julo Mitron) and the best slovak actor award winner (for The Shop on Main Street ) Krner (as Martin Pichanda). The main part of movie was filmed in Hybe and supernumeraries are real Hybes citizens.External links*http://www.statistics.sk/mosmis/eng/run.html*Hybe - official web-site *Millenial Bee de:Hybeeo:Hybefr:Hybeit:Hybehu:Hibbenl:Hybesk:Hybewar:Hybe
7948098
Koroit_opal_field
The Koroit opal field is an opal mining area in Paroo Shire in southwest Queensland, Australia. The Koroit opal field is located about 80 km north northwest of Cunnamulla.It is not a town.  It has neither electricity nor running water.  (It should not be confused with the town of Koroit in rural western Victoria, Australia.)The Koroit opal field is known for the very distinctive type of boulder opal that is found in its mines.
7955093
Redpath_Museum
The Redpath Museum is a museum of history belonging to University and located on the universitys campus at 859 Sherbrooke Street West in Montreal, Quebec, Canada. It was built in 1882 as a gift from the sugar baron Redpath.(Bronson, Susan. The Design of the Peter Redpath Museum at McGill University: The Genesis, Expression, and Evolution of an Idea About Natural History. Sept. 1992 (17:3), p. 60-76.) It houses collections of interest to ethnology, biology, paleontology, and mineralogy/geology. The collections were started by some of the same individuals who founded the Smithsonian and Ontario Museum collections. The current director is David Green.Commissioned by Redpath to mark the 25th anniversary of Sir William Dawsons appointment as Principal, the Museum was designed by Hutchison and D. Steele. McGill Universitys Redpath Museum Web site characterizes it as an idiosyncratic expression of eclectic Victorian Classicism as well as an unusual and late example of the Greek Revival in North America.(Tea and Fossils: History of the Peter Redpath Museum)It is the oldest building built specifically to be a museum in Canada.(About the Museum, McGill University. Accessed May 11, 2008.) Both the museums interior and exterior have been utilized as a set, for movies and commercials.  Collections Image:DinosaurInRedpathMuseum_Montreal_March2003.JPG|Signature dinosaur skeleton within the Redpath Museum, set against interior Beaux Art decorations.Image:mcgill_redpath_m_albertosaurus.jpg|View of the Albertosaurus in the central evolution exhibit atrium.Image:FossilScallops-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Lions Paw scallop.Image:ClaudiosaurusGermaini-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Claudiosaurus germainiImage:Marrella_splendens_(Redpath_Museum,_Montreal).png|Redpath Museum Collection  Marella splendens.Image:Limnoscelis(Cast)-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Limnoscelis.Image:PecopterisBucklandi-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Pecopteris bucklandi.Image:CamptorhynchusLabradoriusMale(CloseUp)-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Camptorhynchus labradorius.Image:Dendrerpeton(Skull)-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Dendrerpeton.Image:ConuropsisCarolinensis-RedpathMuseumMontreal-June6-08.png|Redpath Museum Collection  Conuropsis Carolinensis. Geology (mineralogy) Five collections, containing approximately 16,000 specimens from all over the world, are identified by their initial letters:*D Doell collection for Dr Donald Doell, a physician who contributed many of the more recent material in the collection.*F Ferrier collection for Frederick Ferrier, famous mining engineer who contributed this pre-eminent collection of minerals from many classic locations.*J Jeffrey collection for de Fourestier, mineralogist and former volunteer at the museum.*P Palache collection for Palache, mineralogist and Harvard professor.*SC Shirley Collection for the wife of Sir Hugh Graham Atholstan who donated the collection in the early 1880s.*NS New System collection for the general collection catalogue. This collection contains the main body of specimens including the collection of the former History Society of Montreal and specimens from the collection of Strathcona. Entomology The Lyman entomology collections were transferred in 1961 by D. Keith McE. Kevan to Macdonald Campus in Sainte Anne-de-Bellevue, leading to the creation of the Lyman Entomological Museum and Research Laboratory. Paleontology The museums important collection of fossils owes much of its beginning to William Dawson who provided not only many of the fossils of plants from his native Scotia, but procured many important specimens from around the world.Dr Thomas Clark, for many years up until his death, was a fixture at the museum and was renowned for his pioneering work on fossils from the Shale, some of the oldest known anywhere. Ethnology The ethnological and archeological collection is one of the oldest in America and began with Sir William Dawsons collection. It received further material from the History Society of Montreal. It now has over 17,000 items from Africa, Egypt, Oceania, paleolithic Europe and America. The collection of Nations artifacts that were once part of the collection now are housed in the nearby Museum in Montreal. Toronto museum Redpath also operates the Sugar Museum in Toronto, opened in 1979 at their Sugar Building processing facility by the waterfront (which itself opened 1958). Affiliations The Museum is affiliated with: CMA,  CHIN, and Museum of Canada. See also * Library* Barnston References  External links * Redpath Museum* Redpath Museum Biodiversity website* Images* Lyman Entomological Museum and Research Laboratory* 360 interactive panorama featuring the Albertosaurus in the Dawson galleryde:Redpath-MuseumRedpathMuseumRedpath
7970275
Gahcho_Kue_Diamond_Mine_Project
The Gahcho Ku Diamond Project is located on the Canadian tundra in the Territories. It is situated at Lake (), in the Akaitcho Treaty 8 Territory AK(Gahcho Ku Project Exploration Camp Project Description) claim block, which is  southeast of the Lake Diamond Mine Project and approximately  east northeast of Yellowknife.( The site is served by an ice runway, Kue Aerodrome, and a spur of the to Contwoyto Winter Road from Mine.( the main camp is at , north of the ice strip, with a smaller site at , south of the runway.(BackgroundThe Gahcho Ku Diamond Project is a 49% / 51% joint-venture between Province Diamonds Inc. and De Beers Canada Inc.(http://www.debeerscanada.com/files_2/pdf_documents/gahcho-factsheet-102604.pdf)(Mountain Province Diamonds)Mountain Province claims 49% and De Beers claims 51%.((The project consists of the Ku kimberlite pipes, which lie underneath Kennady Lake. There are also several unexplored kimberlite occurrences scattered over several kilometres.((HistoryIn 1993, Geological began sampling and surveying the area for Mountain Province Mining Joint Venture (now Province Diamonds). Exploration began in the area with a camp being set up in 1995. In 1997, Monopros, now De Beers Canada, took over the camp when they joined the Mountain Province Mining Joint Venture. In 1998 De Beers began sampling the kimberlite to evaluate the four Gahcho Ku pipes. More drilling followed and the positive results led to the decision to proceed.(Project DevelopmentA project study was started in 2004. An evaluation program in 2006 was followed by a drilling and sampling program in 2007. In September 2009 a feasibility study on a proposed mine was begun, which is anticipated to be completed towards the end of 2010.(About Gahcho Kue, De Beers Canada website.)(Gahcho Ku factsheet)  If it proceeds to a operating mine, is expected to mine , out of , and to produce  per year over a 15 year life.(In 2005, the Valley Environmental Impact Review Board, after an initial environmental assessment, ruled that De Beers applications for a land use permit and water license would require a full Environment Impact Review. De Beers appealed this decision to the NWT Supreme Court, but was denied in April 2007, and the review process began in 2007. Due to economic factors, De Beers has delayed filing the required Environment Impact Statement to the review board; the review process was suspended in May 2010 pending the De Beers submission, which it has now indicated should be after their Feasibility Study is completed.Traditional useGahcho Ku is the traditional Chipewyan, a Dene people, name for the Kennady Lake area and in Dene Suline means Place of the Big Rabbit. The area, also known for Caribou, has been traditionally used by Dene from Lutselke and the Mtis of Fort Resolution. In earlier times Cho (Dogrib), also Dene, people used the area as well(De Beers EA  Final Submission to Public Registry)See also*of diamond minesReferences
7984055
Taegwan
 area_km2  865Taegwan is a kun, or county, in northeastern Pyongan province, Korea.  It lies in the provinces interior, and is bounded by Tongchang on the east, Kusong and Taechon to the south, Chonma to the west, and Changsong and Sakchu to the north. It was created in 1952 from portions of Sakchu county. Taegwans borders are mountainous, with the Mountains rising in the north and the Mountains in the west. The River () flows through the countys ceter, joined in its course by many fast small streams.Taegwan enjoys a relatively rainy climate, with an average annual rainfall of 1300 mm. The average temperature is 7 C, fluctuating between an average of -11.2 C in January and 22.5 C in August.  Some 83% of the countys area is forested; only 8.5% is cultivated. Most of these are dry fields, with maize the chief crop. Forestry, including lumber as well as the harvesting of wild herbs and fruits, is a major local industry; Taegwan is home to the provinces largest lumber base, which specializes in wood for mining and construction applications. Gold and graphite are mined in the county, and a small hydroelectric generator harnesses the Taeryong Rivers stream.  The Line railroad passes through the county, on its way between Anju and Chongsu.Educational institutions in Taegwan include the Taegwan Technical School.References*See also*of North Korea*divisions of North Korea*PyonganExternal links*ja:ko:no:Taegwanzh:
7994513
Lzard_rouge
thumb|One of the carriages of the lzard rouge The lzard rouge (French for red lizard) is a historic Tunisian train, once the property of the Bey of Tunis but now used for tourists. It runs from Metlaoui to Redeyef and passes through the Gorge, taking some 40 minutes for the journey. The track was originally used by mining trains carrying phosphates. External links *travelintelligence.net* world66.com* lonelyplanet.comrouge
8007670
Auchenharvie_Castle
open_to_public Private. Hazardous.Auchenharvie Castle is a ruined castle near Torranyard on the A 736 Glasgow to Irvine road. It lies in Ayrshire, Scotland. History The Castleleft|thumb|200px|The castle in circa 1892.(MacGibbon, T. and Ross, D. (1887-92). The castellated and domestic architecture of Scotland from the twelfth to the eighteenth centuries, 5v, Edinburgh. p 228.)The ruins still stand in a prominent and strongly defensible position at Auchenharvie Farm near Torranyard; the site has been much altered by quarrying . Previously the castle was known as Achin-Hervy, Awthinharye in c 1564 (Rollie 1980), Auchinbervy by Moll in 1745, Achenhay (1775 & 1807), and Auchenhowy is used by Ainslie in 1821.Auchenharvie has long been a ruin, shown as such as far back as 1604 - 08 by Pont.(Pont, Timothy (1604). Cuninghamia. Pub. Blaeu in 1654.) It was too small and the area of the mound also so restricted that its conversion into a more commodious and comfortable dwelling were not practicable.The corbels of the parapet are unusual in that they project less than usual and this links Auchenharvie with the work at Castle and Barr Castle.(Campbell, Thorbjrn (2003). Ayrshire. A Historical Guide. Edinburgh : Birlinn. ISBN 1-84158-267-0. p. 122) The castle is built from whinstone with freestone corners.( A good deal remains of this typical tower castle, which has been ruinous since the 1770s, with indications of the barrel roof vaulting, side tower, ornate sandstone ornamentation, etc. Some very basic consolidation works have been carried out. It is a dangerous site to visit. Uncommon orchids have been recorded as growing on the motte.It is known from the pollen record at Bloak Moss that extensive clearances took place here in the fifth or sixth centuries AD and such a site would have been of great strategic importance to these early settlers, standing out as it does, like an island above the mosses.(Rackham, Oliver (1976) Trees and Woodland in the British Landscape. Pub. J.M.Dent & Sons Ltd. ISBN 0-460-04183-5. P. 52.)The Cunninghames of AuchenharvieThe castle had long been in the hands of the Cunninghames and notably. Auchenharvies most famous owner was Dr. Robert Cunninghame who was created a Baronet of Scotia in 1673 and was Physician to Charles II in Scotland, appointed shortly after the Kings coronation at Scone in 1651. He was with the Kings army at the defeat at Worcester in September 1651 and was made a prisoner in the Tower of London, being released after a ransom was paid. He was very wealthy and purchased back the Barony of Stevenston from the Earl of Eglinton in 1656. He died in 1676 and his son only outlived him by two years and because his daughter could not inherit, the land passed through the male line to her cousin, Robert Cunninghame.(Phillips, Alec, et al. The Auchenharvie Colliery an early history. The Three Towns History Group. Pub. Richard Stenlake. ISBN 1-872074-58-8. P. 4.)(Dobie, James D. (ed Dobie, J.S.) (1876). Cunninghame, Topographized by Timothy Pont 1604-1608, with continuations and illustrative notices. Pub. John Tweed, Glasgow.) In January 1678 Robert Cunynghame, apothecary / druggist in Edinburgh, is stated to be the heir to Anne, daughter of Sir Robert Cunynghame of Auchenharvie. She was Roberts cousin-german and part of  his inheritance was the Barony of Stevenston and the lands of Auchenharvie. He also owned some of the lands of  Lambroughton and Chapeltoun. He married Anne Purves of Purves Hall in 1669 and had seventeen children. Despite his inheritance he later got into serious debt.( right|150px|thumb|The Coat of Arms of the Cunninghames of Auchenharvie.The house belonged to Cunningham, 1st Baronet of Auchinhervie, an absentee courtier in England, till 1642. He planned to add additional building in 1634, beginning with a garden wall around the old tower. He had thought the house too small to accommodate his friends in 1628 during a planned royal visit, so he asked his cousin David Cunningham of Robertland to accommodate his mother so that if his friends visited they could stay at Robertland instead.(National Archives of Scotland: Cunningham Letters GD237/25/1-4: see NAS OPAC on-line catalogue)In 1829 Aitkens map shows the castle as belonging to a Colonel Barns.(Aitken, Robert (1829). The Parish Atlas of Ayrshire - Cunninghame. Edinburgh : W. Ballantine.)The Resurrectionistsleft|200px|thumb|Auchenharvie Castle in 1820.A local legend is that in the days of the body snatchers or resurrectionists; before the Act of 1832, bodies obtained locally were hidden in the ruins before being taken up to Glasgow at night to sell to the surgeons and medical students at the old university who practiced dissection skills on them.( Another version of the story states that the bodies were collected together from neighbouring parishes at Darnshaw, a remote house near Bloak Moss on the old Auchenharvie to Megswell route. The bodies were then sold in Glasgow for 10 each to medicals students from the university.(Strawhorn, John (1985). The History of Irvine. Pub. John Donald. ISBN 0-85976-140-1. P. 113.)(Love, Dane (1989). Scottish Kirkyards. London : Robert Hale. ISBN 0-7090-3667-1. p. 148) The old toll road did run past the site and a toll gate and house stood fairly close by which must cast some doubt on the castle being involved.(Holder, Geoff (2010). Scottish Bodysnatchers. Port Stroud : The History Press. ISBN 978-0-7524-5603-4. Page 54)A local legend involves nearby House and its prominent tower with smuggling.Auchenharvie HouseAn estate named Auchenharvie was built by the family in Stevenston and although demolished, the name lives on in Academy. Middleton near Annick Lodge had been part of the estate, passing into the hands of the Hamiltons of Bourtreehill and then passing to the Earls of Eglinton.( Robert Cunninghame was one of the best known member of the family at its new site, being heavily involved in coal mining in the Barony of Stevenston.(Hughson, Irene (1996). The Auchenharvie Colliery - an early history. Ochiltree : Stenlake Publishing. ISBN 1-872074-58-8. pp. 5 - 12)The Toll RoadThe old toll house close to Auchenharvie Castle farm was demolished in the 1990s and a private house with that name now stands on the site. The toll road junction is still extant as farm tracks. A road used to run across the fields from here to cut across the river by a ford below Megswell farm. This road passed beneath the Montgreenan driveway which was carried by  a highly ornate bridge at this point. The construction of the Lochlibo Road made this route redundant. Etymology and natural history right|200px|thumb|The Torranyard Inn. 2007.Torranyard is a hamlet at a crossroads on the Irvine to Glasgow Lochlibo Road. It was recorded as Turing Yard in 1747, Turnyard in 1775, Tirranyard on Thomsons 1820 map and in 1832. On the 1860 OS map it is shown as having a toll booth and an inn called Tour, on the opposite side of the road from the present Torranyard Inn (2007). The Montgreenan estate and hotel is nearby and the site of the old Girgenti house and surviving tower are nearby on the Cunninghamhead road. A William Forgisal (Fergushill) of Torranyard was miner at the Doura Pit in the 18th-century. He lost his leg in a mining accident, as had his father. Williams wife was a tough sort, her comment being on seeing him so encumbered, was that the Forgisals would need a small plantation of their own to keep them in crutches.(Service, John (Editor) (1887). The Life & Recollections of Doctor Duguid of Kilwinning. Pub. Young J. Pentland. P. 140.)The castle mound today is rich in wildflowers, however any visitor should beware as the castle sits in an elevated position with an unfenced vertical drop.See alsoImage:Law Castle.jpg|thumb|250px|left|Castlethumb|200px|A map of the area, with the Auchenharvies, Bloak & Kennox mosses. The castle ruins are at Auchenharvie farm.* Auchentiber* Cunninghamhead* Chapeltoun* Corsehill* Chapeltoun* House* Perceton* Lodge* and Castle of GiffenReferences Bibliography * Rollie, James (1980). The invasion of Ayrshire. A Background to the County Families. Pub. Famedram. P.83.* Correspondence of David Cunningham of Auchinharvie to Robertland, National Archives of Scotland GD237/25/1-4External links* Photograph of the castle. Accessed : 2009-11-20Auchenharvie
8028208
Electoral_district_of_Burdekin
Burdekin is an electoral district in the Legislative Assembly in the state of Queensland, Australia. Centred on the Ayr&ndash;Home Hill region, the electorate also includes some of Townsvilles southern suburbs (Stuart, Wulguru and Annandale) as well as the coal-mining town of Collinsville. The River flows through part of the electorate.Menkens of the Liberal National Party currently holds the seat, having won it from Labors Steve Rodgers in the 2004 state election.  Steve Rodgers re-contested the seat in 2006.Members for BurdekinElection resultsExternal links* Electorate Profile (Antony Green, ABC)
8049027
1968_in_the_United_Kingdom
Events from the year 1968 in the Kingdom.Incumbents* Monarch  II* Prime Minister  Wilson, Labour PartyEvents* January** The Backing Britain campaign encouraging workers to work extra hours without pay, or take other actions to help competitiveness, spreads across Britain.** Ford Escort car introduced.* 5 January  World debuts on BBC1 television, featuring Thrower.( )* 4 February  96 Indians and Pakistanis arrive in Britain from Kenya. Some 1,500 Asians have now arrived in Britain from Kenya, where they were forced out by increasingly draconian immigration laws.()* 6 February18 February  Great Britain and Northern Ireland compete at the Winter Olympics in Grenoble, France, but do not win any medals.* 14 February  Northampton, the county town of Northamptonshire, is designated as a town, with the Wilson government hoping to double its size and population by 1980.()* 29 February  Announcement of the first discovery of a pulsar by astronomer Bell Burnell at of Cambridge.()* 1 March  First performance of an Lloyd WebberRice musical, and the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat in its original form as a pop cantata, by pupils of Court preparatory school in Hammersmith.()()()* 2 March  mining in the Country, which played a big part in the Revolution, ends after some 300 years with the closure of Colliery near Sedgley.()* 12 March  Mauritius achieves independence from British Rule.()* 15 March  George Brown, British Secretary, resigns.* 17 March  A demonstration in Londons Square against U.S. involvement in the War leads to violence  91 police injured, 200 demonstrators arrested.* 1 April  Valley Police is formed by the amalgamation of Constabulary, Constabulary, Oxford City Police, Constabulary and Borough Police.* 7 April  Motor racing world champion Clark, 32, is killed when his car leaves the track at 170 mph and smashes into a tree during a 2 race at Hockenheim.()* 18 April  Bridge sold to American entrepreneur P. McCulloch who rebuilds it at Lake Havasu City, Arizona.(* 20 April  Powell makes his controversial of Blood Speech on immigration.()* 21 April  Enoch Powell is dismissed from the Cabinet by Opposition leader Heath due to the Rivers of Blood Speech, despite several opinion polls stating that the majority of the public shares Mr Powells fears.(Enoch Powells Rivers of Blood Speech)* 23 April  Five and ten pence coins are introduced in the run-up to Decimalisation, which will be complete within the next three years.(* 27 April  The Act 1967 comes into effect, legalising abortion on a number of grounds, with free provision through the Health Service.* 3 May  Mr Frederick West (aged 45) becomes Britains first transplant patient.(BBC ON THIS DAY | 3 | 1968: Surgeons conduct UKs first heart transplant)* 8 May  The Twins, 34-year-old Ronnie and Reggie, are among 18 men arrested in dawn raids across London. They stand accused of a series of crimes including murder, fraud, blackmail and assault. Their 41-year-old brother Kray is one of the other men under arrest.()* 11 May  Manchester City win the League First Division title.()* 16 May  Point tower block at Newham in east London collapses after a gas explosion, killing four occupants.(* 18 May  West Bromwich Albion win the Cup for the fifth time, with Astle scoring the only goal of the game against Everton at the Wembley Stadium.* 29 May  Manchester United become the first English winners of the European Cup after beating Benfica 4-1 in extra-time at Wembley Stadium.()* 7 June  Start of Ford sewing machinists strike at the Dagenham assembly plant: women workers strike for pay comparable to that of men.* 8 June  Luther King, Jr.s killer, Earl Ray, arrested in London.(* 10 June  Health Service reintroduces prescription charges.()* 18 June  Frederick West, Britains first heart transplant, dies 46 days after his operation.* 20 June  Currie, Member of Parliament at Stormont in Ireland, along with others, squats a house in Caledon to protest discrimination in housing allocations.* 4 July  Rose returns from a 354-day single-handed round-the-world trip for which he receives a knighthood the following day.()* 10 July  Floods in South West England.()* 17 July  Beatles animated film Yellow Submarine debuts in London.(* 31 July  The BBC sitcom Army is first aired on television.* 8 August  Navy Leander-class frigate HMS Scylla is launched at Devonport, the last ship to be built in a Dockyard.* 11 August  Rails last steam train service runs on the gauge: locomotives make the 314-mile return passenger journey from Liverpool to Carlisle before being dispatched to the scrapyard or preservation.* 31 August  First of Wight Festival.* September  The new school year sees the first local authorities adopt three tier education, where 5-7 infant, 7-11 junior schools are replaced by 5-8 or 5-9 first schools and 8-12 or 9-13 middle schools, with the transfer age to grammar and secondary modern schools being increased to 12 or 13.(http://www.middleschoolresearch.org.uk/middschinfo.html )* 8 September  Tennis player Wade wins the 1968 U.S. Open Womens Singles event.(* 15 September  Floods in South East England.* 16 September  Post Office divides post into first-class and second-class services.(* 26 September  Act 1968 ends censorship of the theatre.(()* 27 September  The US musical Hair opens in London following the removal of theatre censorship.()* October  The motorway is completed when the final 35-mile section opens between Rotherham and Leeds.(Motorways - West Yorkshire)* 2 October  A woman from Birmingham gives birth to the first recorded instance of live Sextuplets in the UK.()* 5 October  A civil rights march in Derry, Northern Ireland, which includes several Stormont and British MPs, is batoned off the streets by the Ulster Constabulary.()* 6 October  British racing drivers Stewart, Hill and Surtees take the first three places at the United States Grand Prix.(* 8 October  Enoch Powell warns that immigrants may change the character of England.()* 12 October27 October  Great Britain and Northern Ireland compete at the Olympics in City and win 5 gold, 5 silver and 3 bronze medals.* 13 October  The rebuilt railway station opens.(* 18 October  National Giro opens for business through the Post Office,() with administrative headquarters at Bootle.* 27 October  Police and protestors clash at an anti-War protest outside the of the United States in London.()* 18 November  A warehouse fire in James Watt Street, Glasgow, kills 22.()* 21 November  The Lord carpet business goes into receivership.()(Times 22 November 1968.)* 22 November  Kinks Are the Village Green Preservation Society released.()* 26 November  The Race Relations Act is passed, making it illegal to refuse housing, employment or public services to people in Britain because of their ethnic background.(BBC ON THIS DAY | 26 | 1968: Race discrimination law tightened)* 29 November  The Dawley New Town (Designation) Amendment (Telford) Order extends the boundaries of Dawley New Town in Shropshire and renames it Telford.* 30 November  The Trade Descriptions Act comes into force, preventing shops and traders from describing goods in a misleading way.()* 17 December** Bell, an 11-year-old girl from upon Tyne, is sentenced to life detention for the manslaughter of two small boys.()** Official opening of first phase of the Mints new Llantrisant plant in Wales.Undated* Bennetts play Years On premieres at the Theatre in the West End.* Japanese carmaker Nissan begins importing its range of Datsun badged family cars to Britain.Publications* Christies novel By the Pricking of My Thumbs.* C. Clarkes novel 2001: A Space Odyssey.* Durrells novel Tunc, first of Revolt of Aphrodite pair.* Scotts novel Day of the Scorpion, second of the Quartet.* Wyndhams novel Chocky.Births* 12 January  Mills, British campaigner and former wife of musician Sir McCartney* 27 January  Tricky (born Adrian Thaws), English rapper and musician* 16 February  Ellis, British comic-book and graphic-novel writer* 18 February  Scott, British musician and frontman of 1990s Britpop group Space* 2 March  Craig, British actor* 4 March  Kensit, English actress* 5 March  Villiers, British Conservative politician and MP for Chipping Barnet* 18 March  Marsden, British Labour/Liberal Democrat politician* 20 March  Merson, English footballer* 21 March  Davidson, British actor* 23 March** Atherton, English cricketer** Albarn, English musician (Blur and Gorillaz)* 26 March  Chris Ward, British chess Grandmaster, chess coach, and author* 28 March  Hussain, English cricketer* 8 April  Powell, British television presenter* 22 April  Mealing,  British actress* 23 April  Groves, English actor* 28 April  Donald, singer* 4 May  Barratt, English comedian and actor* 8 May  Jordan,  British artist* 9 May  Kelly,  British Labour politician, former of State for Communities and Local Government, and former MP for Bolton West* 12 May  Tate, comedienne* 27 May  Brooks, British journalist and editor of The Sun* 29 May** Ian Campbell, 13th Duke of Argyll, Scottish peer** Morden, British Labour politician and MP for Newport East* 2 June  Culshaw, English comedian and impressionist* 5 June  Vaizey, British Conservative politician and MP for Wantage* 7 June  Parish, English actress* 13 June  Theroux, British novelist and broadcaster, and son of American writer Theroux* 26 June  Roberts, Welsh footballer* 28 June  Woodyatt, British actor* 20 July  Rhind-Tutt, English film, television and radio actor* 22 July  Ifans, Welsh actor* 26 July  Williams, English actress* 5 August  McRae, Scottish rally driver (died 2007)* 8 August  Dicks, English footballer* 14 August** Clarke, Northern Irish golfer** Lester, British actor* 17 August  McCrory, English actress* 22 August  Elisabeth Murdoch, Australian-born business executive* 26 August  Boardman, English racing cyclist* 9 September** Altikriti,  British Anti-War activist** Sawalha, English actress* 14 September  Shapps, British Conservative politician and MP for Welwyn Hatfield* 20 September  Forrester, British TV presenter* 28 September  Watts, English-born actress* 29 September  Luke and Goss, twin brother singers, members of Bros* 1 October  Durden-Smith, British television presenter* 2 October  Derbyshire, British Radio presenter* 3 October  Crichton, English footballer* 7 October  Yorke, British singer/songwriter* 14 October** Le Tissier, English footballer** Moorhouse, British historian and author* 27 October  Martin Clark, English snooker player* 10 November  Brookstein, British singer* 18 November  Barry Hunter, Northern Irish footballer and football manager* 22 November  Gilligan, British journalist* 20 December  Andrews, British race car driver* 23 December  Simon, British Labour politician and MP for Birmingham Erdington* December 28  Robertson, Scottish field hockey playerUnknown dates* Begg,  British Islamist once held in extrajudicial detention in the US Bay detainment camp* Brokenshire, British Conservative politician and MP for Hornchurch* dAncona, British journalist and editor of Spectator* OHagan, Scottish writer and novelist* Ofili, English painter* Rowen, British Liberal Democrat politician and MP for RochdaleDeaths* 6 February  Berry, 1st Viscount Kemsley, Welsh journalist (born 1883)* 17 February  Wolfit, actor-manager (born 1902)* 20 February  Asquith, British director and writer (born 1902)* 7 April  Clark, Scottish race car driver (born 1936)* 3 May  Edwards, Welsh politician (born 1897)* 7 May  Spence British race car driver (born 1936)* 21 June  E. Johns, writer, creator of Biggles (born 1893)* 24 June  Hancock, British comedian (born 1924)* 13 July  J. Yeatman, humorist (born 1897)* 16 July  William Evans, Welsh-language poet (born 1883)* 23 July  Hallett Dale, English scientist, recipient of the Prize in Physiology or Medicine (born 1875)* 19 August  Gamow, Ukrainian-born physicist (born 1904)* 27 August  Princess Marina, Duchess of Kent (born 1906)* 12 September  Armour, Scottish golfer (born 1894)* 13 October  Stanley Unwin, publisher (born 1884)* 20 October  Flanagan, comedian and singer (born 1896)* 17 November  Peake, writer and illustrator (born 1911)* 28 November  Blyton, childrens writer (born 1897)* 14 December  David James Jones (Gwenallt), Welsh-language poet (born 1899)ReferencesSee also
8056698
Christmas_pyramid
thumb|right|150px|A normal-sized Christmas pyramidImage:Duesseldorf christmas fair 04.jpg|thumb|right|210px|An example at the Christmas Market in DsseldorfImage:Mainz-Weihnachtspyramide.JPG|thumb|right|200px|A pyramid at the Christmas market in MainzA Christmas Pyramid (German: Weihnachtspyramide) is a Christmas decoration that has its roots in the Erzgebirge (Ore Mountains) of Germany but has become popular throughout the country. It is suggested that the Christmas pyramid is a predecessor of the Christmas tree;() These pyramids themselves are not limited to Christmas: in the Erzgebirge existed a custom of dancing around the St. Johns Tree, a pyramid decked with garlands and flowers, at the summer solstice.()It is a kind of Carousel with several levels some depicting Christian motifs, such as angels or manger scenes, and others with more secular motifs such as mountain-folk, forests, and other scenes from the everyday life of people in the Erzgebirge. The spinning motion of the pyramids is traditionally achieved with the help of candles whose rising heat spins a propeller above. Christmas pyramids serve a mainly decorative purpose today, filling children and adults alike with holiday cheer. Generally Christmas pyramids are made of wood and based on four- to eight-sided platforms with a long pole in the middle serving as the axle to which the entire apparatus tapers above and which supports any further platforms.  Inside in a glass or ceramic support is a driveshaft on to which at least one platform is attached. The figures, which stand on the platforms are also traditionally made of wood. Christmas pyramids take various forms from intricately carved miniature houses with pitched roofs, to large multi-level structures that simply serve as a display for the carved figures. In many cities in the Ore Mountains there are large Christmas pyramids on the Market Square at the Market or in other locations associated with Christmas hustle and bustle. History of the Christmas pyramid The origins of the Christmas pyramids date back to the Ages.  In this period it was traditional in southern and Europe to bring evergreen branches, for example boxwood into the home and hang them, in order to ward off moroseness in the dark and cold winter months.  In northern and Europe traditional candles were used to achieve this goal.  The Christmas pyramid would eventually unify these two traditions and become a symbol of Christmas celebrations.  The forefather to the pyramid was a construction known as a Lichtergestelle (literally: thing on which lights are set) and were very popular in the 18th century.  They were constructions made of four poles, decorated with evergreen boughs, tied together at the top and lit with candles.  In the large cities, the tree, now recognizable all over the world, gradually replaced the Lichtergestelle, but in the mountains, the people did not see a simple tree bedeckt with lights, rather they were reminded of the capstans, which were commonly used in the mines of the Ore Mountains.  To the pyramid shape was added the spinning motion of the capstan and the earliest Christmas pyramids were born. The name Christmas pyramid came about because the Campaign in Egypt at the end of the 18th Century brought pictures of the pyramids back to Europe and eventually to the Ore Mountains, where they reminded the people of the mining capstans and also of the Christmas constructions.  An important breakthrough in the popularity of the Christmas pyramid came around 1830 with the discovery of kerosene.  Previously, people had used relatively expensive candles or oil.  As the means to light and spin the pyramids became much cheaper, the tradition spread.  Now such pyramids can be found in numerous styles and sizes all over Germany as well as in many parts of the States. See also *toymaking in the Ore MountainsReferencesde:Weihnachtspyramidede Navidadde Nolno:Julepyramidenn:Julepyramidesv:Julpyramid
8071282
Blackett_Baronets
There have been two Baronetcies created for members of the Blackett family, both in the of England. One creation is extant as of 2008. The Blackett Baronet family can be traced back to the Blacketts/Blakheveds of Woodcroft, Durham and became highly successful in shipping, and as lead and coal mining merchants in Newcastle-upon-Tyne.The Blackett Baronetcy, of Newcastle in the County of Northumberland, was created in the Baronetage of England on 12 December 1673 for William Blackett, of Parliament for Newcastle-upon-Tyne.   Blackett was succeeded by his elder son, Edward, the second Baronet who represented Ripon and Northumberland in the House of Commons whilst his third younger son William was created a Baronet in his own right in 1685 (see below). The second Baronets eldest surviving son, Edward, the third Baronet, was a Captain in the Royal Navy. He died childless in 1756 and was succeeded by his nephew, Edward, the fourth Baronet, who was   Member of Parliament for Northumberland and the son of John Blackett. The title thereafter descended from father to son until the death of  Charles, the ninth Baronet, in 1968. Two of his younger brothers, George, the tenth Baronet, and Francis, the eleventh Baronet, both succeeded in the title. As of 2008 the title is held by the latters eldest son, Hugh, the twelfth Baronet, who succeeded in 1995. Another member of the family to gain distinction was Henry Blackett (18671952), son of John Charles Blackett, fourth son of the fourth Baronet. He was an Admiral in the Royal Navy.The family seat is Hall, Matfen, Northumberland, now a hotel and country club.The Blackett Baronetcy, of Newcastle-upon-Tyne in the County of Northumberland, was created in the Baronetage of England on 23 January 1685 for William Blackett, third son of the first Baronet of the 1673 creation. He sat as Member of Parliament for Newcastle-upon-Tyne. On his death the title passed to his son, William, the second Baronet. He also represented Newcastle-upon-Tyne in the House of Commons. Blackett had no legitimate issue and the title became extinct on his death in 1728. His illegitimate daughter Elizabeth married Walter Calverley-Blackett, 2nd Baronet, who assumed the additional surname of Blackett (see Baronets for more information on this title).Blackett Baronets, of Newcastle (1673)*Sir William Blackett, 1st Baronet (16201680)*Edward Blackett, 2nd Baronet (16491718)*Sir Edward Blackett, 3rd Baronet (16831 March 1756). Blackett was the eldest surviving son of Sir Edward Blackett, 2nd Baronet, and his wife Mary, daughter of Sir John Yorke. He served in the Navy and achieved the rank of Captain. Blackett married Mary, daughter of Reverend Thomas Jekyll. They had no children. He died in March 1756 and was buried in Ripon, Yorkshire. The baronetcy devolved on his nephew, Edward. Lady Blackett only survived her husband by nine months and died in November 1756.*Edward Blackett, 4th Baronet (17191804)*Sir William Blackett, 5th Baronet (16 February 175927 October 1816). Blackett succeeded to the baronetcy on the death of his father, Sir Edward Blackett, 4th Baronet, in 1804, and was educated at College, Oxford. He was Sheriff of Northumberland in 1807/8. Blackett married Mary Anne Keene and their home was Hall, Matfen, Northumberland. He died at Westoe Lodge, Cambridge and was succeeded by his son Edward.*Sir Edward Blackett, 6th Baronet DL JP (23 February 180323 November 1885). Blackett succeeded to the baronetcy on the death of his father Sir Edward Blackett, 5th Baronet, in 1816. He was educated at College and Church, Oxford and served in the army in the Life Guards. He was also a of the Peace,  Lieutenant of Northumberland (23 July 1831),and Sheriff of Northumberland in 1833, and constructed the new mansion house at Hall, Matfen, Northumberland, in 1828. Blackett married four times; in 1830 to Julia Monck, the mother of all his children, in 1851 to Francis Vere (Lorane) Ord (d. 29 May 1874), widow of Ord of Whitfield, in 1875 to Isabella Richardson and finally in 1880 to Alethea Rianette Scott. He died on 23 November 1885 at Matfen Hall, Matfen and was succeeded by his son Edward.*Sir Edward William Blackett, 7th Baronet CB (22 March 183113 September 1909). Blackett was the son of Sir Edward Blackett, 6th Baronet. He succeeded to the baronetcy on the death of his father in 1885. He was educated at College and served in the Rifle Brigade in the War and was seriously injured at the Sebastopol Redan. He was promoted to Colonel in 1878, in which year he was de Camp to HM Victoria and was appointed of the Order of the Bath. He was also Sheriff of Northumberland in 1889. Blackett married Julia Frances Somerville, daughter and co-heiress of Kenelm Somerville, 17th Lord Somerville. He was succeeded by his son Hugh.*Sir Hugh Douglas Blackett, 8th Baronet (24 March 187313 November 1960). Blackett was the eldest son of Colonel Sir Edward Blackett, 7th Baronet, by his wife the Hon. Julia (ne Somerville). He was a Captain in the Northumberland Yeomanry and served as Sheriff of Northumberland in 1914. He was also a of the Peace for the county. Blackett married Helen Katharine, daughter of George William Lowther, in 1903, by whom he had several children. Lady Blackett died in January 1943. Blackett survived her by seventeen years and died in November 1960, aged 87. He was succeeded in the baronetcy by his eldest son, Charles.  *Sir Charles Douglas Blackett, 9th Baronet (19041968)*Sir George William Blackett, 10th Baronet (19061994)*Sir Francis Hugh Blackett, 11th Baronet (19071995)*Sir Hugh Francis Blackett, 12th Baronet (b. 1955)The apparent is the present holders son Henry Douglas Blackett (b. 1992)Blackett Baronets, of Newcastle-upon-Tyne (1685)*Sir William Blackett, 1st Baronet (16571705)*William Blackett, 2nd Baronet (16901728)See also*Baronets*Blackett*of WylamExternal links*The Blacketts of North East EnglandReferences*Kidd, Charles, Williamson, David (editors). Debretts Peerage and Baronetage (1990 edition). New York: St Martins Press, 1990.*The Baronetage of England, Containing a Genealogical and Historical Account of all Baronets now existing Volume2, Kimber and Johnson (1771) pp3702. Google Books**www.thepeerage.com
8080591
List_of_World_War_II_military_operations
This is a list of known War II era operations, and missions commonly associated with World War II.  this is not a comprehensive list, but most major operations that Axis and Allied combatants engaged in are included, and also operations that involved neutral nation states. Operations are categorised according to the theater of operations, and an attempt has been made to cover all aspects of significant events including Holocaust. Operations contained in the Western Front category have been listed by year. Operations that follow the cessation of hostilities and those that occurred in the pre-war period are also included. Operations are listed alphabetically, and where multiple aspects are involved these are listed inline.Flags used are those of the time period.AfricaExcluding North African campaigns* Appearance (1941)   &mdash; British seaborne assault on Italian-held Berbera, in Somaliland* Atmosphere (1941)  &mdash; base established at Mersa Kuba to aid the capture of Massawa from the Italians* Begum (1941)  &mdash; naval actions to deny supplies to Italian forces in Somaliland** Breach (1941)  &mdash; mining of Mogadishu by FAA aircraft* Camilla (1941)  &mdash;  British disinformation operation to mask action against Eritrea* Canned (1940)  &mdash;  British naval bombardment of Banda Alula, Somaliland* Canvas (1941)   &mdash; British invasion of Somaliland* Chapter (1941)   &mdash; capture of Guardafui lighthouse and adjacent area* Chronometer (1941)   &mdash; Anglo-Indian capture of Assab* Composition (1941)  &mdash; FAA attack on Massawa* Ironclad (1942)   &mdash; The Battle of Madagascar* Menace (1940)   &mdash; seaborne Free French and British attack on Dakar, West Africa (Senegal)* Postmaster (1942)  &mdash; SOE operation to capture three Axis vessels in the neutral Spanish island of Fernando Po* Supply (1941)  &mdash;  Allied anti-submarine naval patrol off MadagascarAtlantic OceanIncludes North Sea, Arctic Ocean and actions against naval vessels in harbour* Alacrity (1943)  &mdash; Allied naval patrols around Azores* Berlin (1941)  &mdash; Atlantic cruise of Scharnhorst and Gneisenau* Catechism (1944)  &mdash; final RAF air attack on Tirpitz* Cerberus (1942)  &mdash; escape of German capital ships from Brest to home ports in Germany (Dash)* Croquet (1944)  &mdash; Allied anti-shipping off Norway* Cupola (1945)  &mdash; British anti-shipping operation off Norway* Deadlight (1945)  &mdash; postwar scuttling of U-boats*Dervish (1941)  &mdash; first of the Arctic Convoys to the Soviet Union* Domino (1943)  &mdash; second aborted Arctic sortie by Scharnhorst, Prinz Eugen and destroyers* Doppelschlag (Double blow) (1942)  &mdash; German anti-shipping operation off Zemlya by Admiral Scheer and Admiral Hipper* Drachenhohle (1944)  &mdash; aborted attack on Fleet at Flow, using Mistel composite aircraft* Drumbeat (1942)  &mdash; part of Second Happy Time (Paukenschlag)* EJ (1941)  &mdash; British anti-shipping operation off Norway* Enclose (1943)  &mdash; British anti-submarine air offensive in of Biscay (also Enclose II)* Foxchase (1945)  &mdash; British anti-shipping operation off Norway* Fronttheater (1943)  &mdash; first aborted Arctic sortie by Scharnhorst, Prinz Eugen and destroyers* Goodwood I, II, III & IV (1944)  &mdash; sequence of 4 carrier-borne air attacks on Tirpitz* Holder (1943)  &mdash; British special naval transport to Murmansk* Husar (1943)  &mdash; cancelled German anti-shipping operation in Sea by Lutzow* Leader (1943)   &mdash; antishipping operation off Norway by USS Ranger* Lucid (1940)  &mdash; attempt to destroy German invasion barges* Mascot (1944)  &mdash; failed carrier-borne air attack on Tirpitz* Nordseetour (North Sea Tour) (1940)  &mdash; first Atlantic operation of Admiral Hipper* Obviate (1944)  &mdash; RAF air attack on Tirpitz* Ostfront (1943)  &mdash; final operation of Scharnhorst to intercept convoy JW-55B* Paderborn (1943)  &mdash; third and successful transfer of Scharnhorst and destroyers to Norway* Paravane (1944)  &mdash; RAF air attack on Tirpitz* Paukenschlag  (Drumbeat, Beat of the Kettle Drum, happy time) (1942) &mdash; German U-boat campaign against shipping off the States east coast* Planet, Brawn, Tiger Claw and Mascot (1944)  &mdash; cancelled carrier-borne air attacks on the Tirpitz* Posthorn (1944)  &mdash; British naval air attack on shipping off Norway* Potluck (1944)  &mdash; Allied anti-shipping patrol off Norway* Primrose (1941)  &mdash; capture of U-110s Enigma cypher machine and documents by HMS Bulldog* Regenbogen (Rainbow) (1942)  Germany &mdash; failed German attack on Arctic convoy JW-51B, by Admiral Hipper and Lutzow* Rheinbung (Exercise Rhine) (1941)  Germany &mdash; planned German attacks on Allied shipping conducted by Bismarck and Prinz Eugen * Rsselsprung (Knights Move) (1942)  &mdash; German naval operation (including Tirpitz) to attack Arctic convoy PQ-17* Roundel (1945)  &mdash; British convoy escort to Murmansk* Source (1943)  &mdash; British class submarine (midget submarine) attacks on German warships based in Norway* Sportpalast (1942)  &mdash; aborted German naval operation (including Tirpitz) to attack Arctic convoys PQ-12 and QP-8** Zauberflte (Magic Flute) (1942)  &mdash; return of damaged Prinz Eugen from Trondheim to Germany* Stonewall (1943)       &mdash; Allied operation to intercept blockade runners in the of Biscay* Tungsten (1944)  &mdash; carrier-borne air attack on Tirpitz* Tunnel (1943)  &mdash; standard British plan to intercept German blockade runners* Wikinger (1940)  &mdash; foray by German destroyers into the Sea* Wunderland (1942)  &mdash; German anti-shipping operation in Sea by Admiral Scheer* Zarin (1942)  &mdash; German mining action off Zemlya by Admiral Hipper and destroyersEastern FrontMediterranean SeaSouth West Pacific and Pacific OceanChina* Sank (1942-1944)  &mdash; Japanese campaign in five provinces  of northeastern China to crush the Chinese resistance following the Regiments Offensive* Alpha (1944)   &mdash; improvement of the defences of Kunming against Japanese threats* Strategic Offensive Operation (1945)  &mdash; Soviet invasion of Manchuria and other Japanese occupied territories* Ichigo (1944)  &mdash; Japanese campaign in eastern China to secure overland routes to Indo-China and airfields* Matterhorn (1944)  &mdash; establishment of bases for US B-29 bomber aircraftSouth West, South, and South East AsiaIraq, Syria, Iran, India, Burma, Malaya and Indo-China, and the Indian Ocean* Anakim (1943)    &mdash; proposed strategy to retake Burma and reopen the land route to China* Bajadere (1942)  18px &mdash; German special forces operation in India, including India Legion personnel* Balsam (1945)  &mdash; photographic reconnaissance of southern Malaya and airstrikes against Sumatran airfields* Birdseed (1944)  &mdash; anti-shipping raid against Ramree harbour area* Boarding Party (1943)  &mdash; raid against German ships interned in neutral port of Goa.* C (1942)  &mdash; major Japanese naval incursion into Indian Ocean* Canned (1944)  &mdash; search and destroy operation for German supply tanker* Capital (1943)  &mdash; Allied capture of northern Burma* Cockpit (1944)       &mdash; Allied naval airstrike on Sabang, Sumatra* Collie (1945)  &mdash;  naval airstrikes against the Islands and air cover for minesweeping forces near Island* Corkscrew (1944)  &mdash; anti-shipping raid against Gwa area* Countenance (1941)    &mdash; Allied invasion of neutral Iran** Dover (1941)   &mdash; occupation of Abadan*** Crackler (1941)   &mdash; *** Marmalade (1941)   &mdash; *** Mopup (1941)   &mdash; *** Rapier (1941)   &mdash; ** Bishop (1941)   &mdash; mopping up of Abadan Island* Crimson (1944)      &mdash; Allied naval airstrike and bombardment of Sabang, Sumatra* Culverin (1943)  &mdash; proposed allied invasion of northern Sumatra* Curtain (1944)  &mdash; naval bombardment of coast near Indin* Dracula (1945)  &mdash; British amphibious assault on Rangoon, Burma.** Bishop (1945)  &mdash; covering operation for Dracula* Diplomat (1944)      &mdash; Allied exercise in preparation for joint operations against the Japanese* Dukedom (1945)  &mdash; British search and destroy operation for Japanese cruiser Haguro* Exporter (1941)     &mdash; British and Commonwealth invasion of French-held Syria* Foil (1945)  &mdash; cutting of submarine telephone cables off Kong* Franz (1942)  &mdash; proposal to establish sabotage teams in Iran* Ha-Go (1944)  &mdash; Japanese action to isolate and destroy Anglo-Indian forces in Burma* Jaywick (1943)   &mdash; Anglo-Australian attack on Japanese shipping in Singapore harbour* Krohcol (1942)  &mdash; British move into Thailand to pre-empt expected Japanese action* Lentil(1945)  &mdash; naval air attack on refineries on Sumatra* Livery (1945)  &mdash; naval air strikes on northern Malaya and air cover for minesweeping operations* Longcloth (1943)  &mdash; Chindits advance into Burma * Matador (1941)  &mdash; Planned British pre-emptive move into Siam from Malaya* Matador (1945)  &mdash; British occupation of Island* Meridian (1945)  &mdash; naval air attacks on installations on Sumatra* Pamphlet (1943)  &mdash; convoying of Australian troops from Suez to Australia* Pioneer (1944)  &mdash; aborted anti-shipping raid against Kyaukpyu harbour * Rathunt (1944)  &mdash; naval patrol of coast near Gwa* Rimau (1942)   &mdash; anti-shipping raid by special forces on Japanese shipping in Singapore harbour* Sabine (1941)   &mdash; British and Commonwealth invasion of the of Iraq to restore government ousted by Ali; including;** Regatta  &mdash; 21 Brigade advance from Basra by boat up the Tigris.** Regulta  &mdash; Euphrates Brigade (20 Indian Brigade) deployment from Basra to Kut by steamer and barge.* Sabre (1945)  &mdash; cutting of communications cable off Saigon* Sankey (1945)  &mdash; landings by Marines on Island* Screwdriver (1944)  &mdash; combined operations raid against a Japanese headquarters at Rock* Scupper (1944)  &mdash; anti-shipping sweep north of Gwa* Sheikh Mahmut (1943)  &mdash; failed attempt to establish bases in Iraq* Sleuth (1944)   &mdash; pursuit of German commerce raider in Indian Ocean* Struggle (1945)  &mdash; destruction of IJN cruiser Takao in Singapore harbour, using midget submarines* Talon (1945)   &mdash; Anglo-Indian capture of Akyab island and construction of supply airbase in support of Burma campaign** Lightning (1945)   &mdash; landings on Akyab island* Thursday (1944)  &mdash; Chindits operation in Burma* Transom (1944)       &mdash; Allied naval air raid on Surabaya, Java* Turret (1945)   &mdash; Anglo-Indian landings and capture of Taungup* U-Go (1944)  18px &mdash; Japanese assault on Imphal and Kohima* Zipper (1945)  Planned British seaborne landing in Malaya.** Slippery (1945)  deception operation for ZipperScandinaviaAxis* Birke (Birch) (1944)  &mdash; German plan to withdraw from northern Finland prior to the War* Birkhahn (1945)  &mdash; German evacuation from Norway.(pp.138-139, Transactions and Proceedings of the Royal Society of New Zealand 1868-1961 http://rsnz.natlib.govt.nz/volume/rsnz_34/rsnz_34_00_001270.html)* Bffel (Buffalo) (1940)  &mdash; German operation to relieve troops in Narvik, Norway.* Holzauge (Wood knot) (1942)  &mdash; activities in Greenland* Ikarus (1940)  &mdash; planned German invasion of Iceland in response to British Operation Fork* Juno (1940)  &mdash; German naval operation to disturb allied supplies to Norway.* Lachsfang (1942)   &mdash; Proposed combined German and Finnish attack against Kandalaksha and Belomorsk.* Nordlicht 2 (Aurora Borealis) (1944)  &mdash; German withdrawal from the Peninsula into Norway* Renntier (Reindeer) (1941)  &mdash; German occupation of Finnish Petsamo* Silberfuchs (Silver Fox) (1941)  &mdash; German operations in the Arctic, including:** Blaufuchs 1 (Blue Fox 1) (1941)  &mdash; Staging of German forces from Germany to northern Finland.** Blaufuchs 2 (Blue Fox 2) (1941)  &mdash; Staging of German forces from Norway to northern Finland.** Platinfuchs (Platinum Fox) (1941)  &mdash; German attack towards Murmansk from Finnish Petsamo** Polarfuchs (Polar Fox) (1941)  &mdash; German attack towards Kandalaksha from Finnish Lapland** Renntier (Reindeer) (1941)  &mdash; German occupation of Petsamo.* Sizilien (1943)  &mdash; German raid upon allied occupied Spitsbergen (Svalbard)* Ost (1944)  &mdash; failed German attempt to capture Suursaari from Finland* West (1944)  &mdash; planned German attempt to capture the Islands from Finland* Weserbung (Weser Exercise) (1940)  &mdash; German invasion of Denmark and Norway** Weserbung Nord (Weser Exercise) (1940)  &mdash; German invasion of Trondheim and Narvik** Weserbung Sud (Weser Exercise) (1940)  &mdash; German invasion of Bergen, Kristiansand and Oslo* Zitronella (Lemon flavour) (1943)  &mdash; German raid against a Norwegian/British station on Svalbard.Allies* Alphabet  (1940)  evacuation of British troops from Norway* Archery (1941)  &mdash; British commando raid on Vgsy, Norway** Anklet (1941)  &mdash; raid on German positions on Islands, Norway* Banquet (1940)  &mdash; Reallocation of RAF training aircraft * Carthage (1945)  &mdash; RAF bombing of the Gestapo headquarters in Copenhagen, Denmark * Catherine (1939)  British plan to gain control of Sea* Claymore (1941)  &mdash; British raid on Islands, Norway* Freshman (1942 ) &mdash; attempted raid on a Norwegian water plant at Vemork, see Gunnerside** Grouse (1942)  &mdash; Norwegian guide party for Freshman** Gunnerside (1943)  &mdash; 2nd raid on the Norwegian water plant at Vemork*Fork (1940)  &mdash; Invasion of Iceland by British.* Gauntlet (1941)    &mdash; raid on Spitsbergen* Halfback (1945)  &mdash; Naval operation that led to the of 28 January 1945* Jupiter (1942)  &mdash; suggested invasion of Norway* Musketoon (1942)   &mdash; British/ Norwegian destruction of a power station in Norway* R 4 (1940)  &mdash; Planned British invasion of Norway * Source (1945)   &mdash; British response to German operation Sizilien* Sepals/Perianth Operation (1944) &mdash; OSS supported operation in Sweden* Wilfred (1940)  &mdash; British plan to mine the Norwegian coastOther* Rdda Danmark (Save Denmark) (1945)  &mdash; Swedish plan to liberate Denmark before the country was occupied by the Soviet Union (cancelled because of German surrender)** Rdda Sjlland (1945)  &mdash; Swedish landings on Zealand** Rdda Bornholm (1945)  &mdash; Swedish landings on BornholmWestern FrontTechnologyAxis* Caesar (1945)  &mdash; transfer of technical plans and strategic materials to Japan, using U-864* Beethoven (1941&ndash;1945)  &mdash; German programme to develop composite aircraft (Mistel)* Prfstand XII (Test stand) (194?)  &mdash; German programme to develop submarine launched V-2Allies* Alsos (Grove) (1940&ndash;1945)   &mdash; Allied efforts to gather data on German nuclear fission developments.** Big (1945) &mdash; capture of an pile at Haigerloch.** Harborage (1945)  &mdash; US sweep up of German atomic assets ahead of French occupation.** Epsilon (1945)  &mdash; Eavesdropping on incarcerated German scientists.* Aphrodite (1944)  The use of B-17 bombers as radio-controlled missiles.* Backfire (1945)  &mdash; launches of captured rockets.* Hawkeye (1944)  &mdash; Radar research by US Navy.* Lusty (1945)  &mdash; US actions to capture German scientific documents, facilities and aircraft.* Project (1941&ndash;1945)  &mdash; program to build an bomb.* Most III (Bridge III) (1944)   &mdash; transfer of captured V-2 components from occupied Poland to Britain. Also known as Wildhorn III.* Paperclip (1945&ndash;)  &mdash; capture of scientists, technical and German rocketry. Originally Operation Overcast sometimes called Project Paperclip.* Surgeon (1945&ndash;)  &mdash; Similar to Paperclip; program to exploit German aeronautical scienctific advances.* Stella Polaris (1944&ndash;)   transfer of Finnish SIGINT, equipment, and personnel to Sweden following end of war in 1944.* TICOM (Target Intelligence Committee) (1945&ndash;)  &mdash; seizure of intelligence apparatus, in particular cryptographic assets. See also Stella Polaris.Market GardenSpecial Operations ExecutivePartisan operationsIncludes some operations by regular forces in support of partisans.* Anthropoid (1942)   &mdash; assassination of Heydrich in Prague.* Burza (Tempest) (1944) &mdash; a series of local uprisings by the Polish Home Army** Ostra Brama (1944) &mdash; battle for Wilno (Vilnius)* Canuck (1945)  &mdash; SAS operation near Turin to train and organise Italian resistance fighters.* Carpetbagger (1943)  &mdash; US airdrops to several national Resistance forces * Gwki  (Heads) (1943-1944)  &mdash; a series of assassinations of Nazi personnel by the Army** Brkl (1943)  &mdash; assassination of Brkl** Hunting (1944)  &mdash; assassination of Ludwig Fischer** Kutschera (1944)  &mdash; assassination of Kutschera* Montagnards (1944)  &mdash; FFI action to establish base in Vercors Massif** Cadillac (1944)  &mdash; airborne supply operation to FFI in Vercors Massif** Eucalyptus (1944)  &mdash; airdrop into Vercors Massif of liaison teams** Zebra (1944)  &mdash; airborne supply operation to FFI in Vercors Massif* Savannah (1941)  &mdash; Free French attempt to ambush and kill Luftwaffe pathfinder pilots in France* Tama (Belt) (1943-1944)  &mdash; action of the Home Army against German border guarding stations* Wieniec (Garland) (1942) &mdash; action of the Polish Odwetu against German railway transport* Uprising (1942-1944) &mdash; series of operations of the Polish resistance against the GermansAnti-partisan operationsIntelligenceAxis* Bernhard (194?) &mdash; German plan to damage British economy using forged British banknotes.* Elster (Magpie) (1944)  &mdash; landings of German agents on the US east coast with objective of gathering intelligence on Project* Haudegen (Broadsword) (1944)  &mdash; German intelligence collection in Spitsbergen Norway* Hummer (Lobster) series (1940 onwards)  &mdash; insertion of German agents into Britain. See also Hummer I* Kadella (1945)  &mdash; airdrop of agents near Marseilles* Kathleen (1941)  &mdash; plan sent by the Irish Republican Army (IRA) to Germany seeking support for  activities. Dubbed Artus by German Foreign Ministry. See Abwehr World War II for all IRA Abwehr involvement.* Karneval (1945)  &mdash; airdrop of agents near Brussels and Waal* Mosul (1944)  &mdash; air drop of agents and supplies near Mosul* Pastorious (1942)  &mdash; separate landings of German agents on the US east coast with objective of industrial sabotage.* Perlen-fischer (1945)  &mdash; airdrop of agents near Paris* Salaam (1942)  &mdash; insertion of German agents into the British-occupied of Egypt* Seemwe (Seagull) series (1940 onwards)  &mdash; insertion of German agents into Britain and Ireland. See also Seagull I and Seagull II.* Taube (Dove/Pigeon) (1940)  &mdash; mission to transport IRA Chief of Staff Russell from Germany back to Ireland.* Wal (Whale) (1940)  &mdash; aborted German plan to foster links with Scottish and Welsh nationalist groups.* Walfisch (Whale) (1940)  &mdash; aborted German plan to land an agent in Ireland.Allies*Cornflakes (1945)  &mdash; insertion of propaganda into the German mail system.* SIGSALY (1943&mdash;1945)  &mdash; secure speech system for highest-level Allied communications.* MAGIC (1939 &mdash;)  &mdash; SIGINT resulting from Japanese cipher system PURPLE.* Ruthless (194?)  &mdash; Admiralty plan to capture an Enigma encryption machine.* Venona (1940&mdash;)   &mdash; intelligence sharing resulting from spying on Soviets.* Ultra  &mdash; SIGINT resulting from German cipher system Enigma.Uncategorized* Alpenfestung  &mdash; plan for nazi national Redoubt in Alps.** Werwolf (1945-50)  &mdash; guerrilla force to resist occupation by Allies.* Big Bang (1947)  &mdash; demolition of defences of Heligoland* Bracelet (1942)  &mdash; Churchills flight to Cairo and Moscow.* Catapult (1940)  &mdash;  Royal Navy actions to seize, disable or destroy the French fleet after Frances surrender.* Crossword (1945)     &mdash; negotiations leading to German surrender in Italy. Known as Sunrise by US forces.* Eiche (Oak) (1943)  &mdash; German rescue from custody of Mussolini* Frantic (1943) &mdash; The use of Soviet airfields by western Allied bombers.* Feuerzauber (Fire Magic) (1936-39) &mdash; Transfer of planes, engineers, and pilots to fascist forces during Civil War. ** Rgen (1937)  &mdash; Bombing of Guernica.** Bodden (1937-43)  &mdash; Abwehr intelligence gathering system operating from Spain and Morocco.** Ursula (1936-1939)  &mdash; Kriegsmarine Uboat operations in support of Francoist and Italian navies.* Gaff (1944) &mdash; attempt to kill Rommel* Keelhaul (1945)   &mdash; forced repatriation to the Soviet Union, by the western Allies, of Soviet prisoners of war* Magic Carpet (1945&ndash;1946)  &mdash; American  post-war operation to transport US military personnel home* Manna (1945) &mdash; Allied air drops of food to famine-ravaged Netherlands, with German cooperation * Margarethe (1944)  &mdash; German occupation of Hungary.  Sztjay, an avid supporter of the Nazis, become the new Hungarian Prime Minister with the aid of a Nazi military governor.* Panzerfaust/Eisenfaust (Bazooka/Armored Fist) (1943)  &mdash; Kidnap of Hungarian leader Horthys son to prevent defection of Hungary from Axis. * Peking (1939)  &mdash; removal of Polish warships to Britain, in advance of German invasion* Pied Piper (1939)  &mdash; evacuation of children from British cities.* Rabat (1943)  &mdash; Plan to kidnap the Pope and diplomatic corp. from City.* Regenbogen (Rainbow) (1945)  &mdash; rescinded order to scuttle Kriegsmarine.* Rsselsprung (Knights Move) (1944)  &mdash; German attempt to capture Broz Tito* Safehaven (1944) &mdash; allied efforts to capture fleeing Nazis and seize German resources abroad* Symbol (1943)  &mdash; Churchills flight to Casablanca. * Tabarin (1943)  &mdash; British Antarctic expedition.* Worek (Sack) (1939)  &mdash; Polish naval defence of the Polish coast* Rainbow War Plans (1920s-30s)  &mdash; Global US War planning between the World Wars.Propaganda, war crimes, and genocide* Himmler (1939)  &mdash; SS & SD staged attacks throughout Poland as propaganda in claiming a justified invasion. * Walkre (Valkyrie) (194?)  &mdash; Plan to put down insurrection of slave workers within the German Reich in the event of rebellion. Used as a cover for clandestine action by the July 20 plotters.* Reinhard (1943)  &mdash; Phase I of the Solution targeting Jews across Europe.* Tannenberg (1939)  &mdash; plan to exterminate Polish intelligentsia involving Einsatzgruppen.* Sonderaktion Krakau (1939)  Operation to murder members of the intelligentia at univerisites in Krakow. * Ost (1942)  plan for cleansing across Europe. See Also Barbarossa.ReferencesExternal links* WW2DB: List of Axis Operations* WW2DB: List of Allied Operations* Operations lists (contains inaccuracies) hier auch erscheinen.de la Segona Guerra Mundialdes oprations lors de la Seconde Guerre mondialedi operazioni militari durante la seconda guerra mondiale
8087504
UCIL
UCIL may refer to:* Carbide India Limited, a pesticide production company infamously known for the disaster which ccurred on the night of December 23, 1984 at the Union Carbide India Limited pesticide plant in Bhopal, India, referred as the worst industrial catastrophe. * Corporation of India, a centrally owned corporation, under the of Atomic Energy of India for mining and Processing.
8097243
Butterfly_Valley_Botanical_Area
File:Darlingtonia californica ne2.JPG|thumb|225px|Butterfly Valley Botanical Area, with plant habitat.californica ne1.JPG|thumb|225px|The carnivorous California Pitcher Plant - (Darlingtonia californica) in closeup.File:Darlingtonia californica ne3.JPG|thumb|225px|A bog habitat in the Butterfly Valley Botanical Area.Butterfly Valley Botanical Area, in the northern Sierra Nevada, was designated a protected botanical area in 1976 due to its abundance and diversity of plant life. It is located just north of Quincy, in Plumas County of northeastern California, United States. The diverse and unique community habitats in the nature reserve, at elevations of , are protected and managed by the Mt. Hough Ranger District of the National Forest. PlantsThe Butterfly Valley Botanical Area is a home of the rare plant, californica. It only grows in limited and scattered bog habitats  from where the northern Sierra Nevada and southern Range meet near here, up through northern California to southern Oregon.(USFS-Plumas website; Mt. Hough Ranger District; Butterfly Valley Botanical Area; accessed 03-20-2011.)The unique plant community also includes other carnivorous plants; a dozen Piperia species of native orchids; two dozen species of native lilies and tiger lilies including washingtonianum and parvum; many species of Ferns of California; and other native plants.(History;MiningThe Butterfly Valley Botanical Area consists of Butterfly Valley and the surrounding area.  In the early 1850s, mining operations and the old mining town of Butterfly Valley occupied the area.  When the mines panned out, the town of Butterfly Valley was abandoned.;GrazingGrazing and logging operations took over, after mining ended.  The Galeppi brothers increased grazing in the area by bringing in their cattle into the area in the early 1900s.  Grazing continued until the Butterfly Valley Botanical Area was designated a protected botanical area in 1976.At about the same time as grazing began, the Murphy Lumber Company began railroad logging, which was expanded by Quincy Lumber Company, the purchaser of the Murphy Lumber Company. Logging operations stopped in 1950.See also *of plants of the Sierra Nevada (U.S.) ReferencesExternal links*Plumas National Forest: Butterfly Valley Botanical Area - Visiting activities and information
8110101
Muskogee_Company
The Muskogee Company, although a Philadelphia company, was founded  in Delaware on February 27, 1923. The company officers were brothers C. Jared Ingersoll, industrialist, as president, and John H. W. Ingersoll, attorney and industrialist, as vice president and treasurer. The Muskogee Company owned large interests in the mining industries of Northeastern Territory, later Oklahoma and large interests and later control of several of the regions railroads.Coal shipments from company owned mines to colder western regions of the United States via the Muskogee Company owned Midland Valley was the original plan for profit. Oil discoveries in Oklahoma later produced lucrative revenues for the Muskogee Company railroads that were strategically located in high production areas of the state.The railroads that fell under the control and common management of the Muskogee Company commonly were referred to as the Roads. The Muskogee Roads were made up of the Valley Railroad, Oklahoma and Gulf Railway, and the City-Ada-Atoka Railway. C. Jared Ingersoll was a majority owner of the Midland Valley since its beginning on February 1, 1903. The Kansas Oklahoma & Gulf in receivership was acquired by Ingersoll and then merged with the Midland Valley on May 1, 1926.  Finally the Oklahoma City-Ada-Atoka Railway was purchased in April 1929. The Muskogee Company assets were sold to the Pacific Railroad in 1964. References * Lloyd E. Stagner. 1996. Midland Valley: Rails For Coal, Cattle, & Crude. David City, Nebraska, South Platte Press,  ISBN 0-942035-36-4* Weigley, Russell F., editor. 1982. Philadelphia: A 300-Year History, W.W. Norton & Company, New York, New York, 1982
8119048
McGee_Airways
McGee Airways was an American airline, founded in Alaska, in 1932 by Linious Mac McGee. Starting with a single three seat Stinson airplane, the company grew and the fleet of aircraft expanded to seven Stinsons.()()( Although McGee was an excellent manager, there were two major competitors in Anchorage - Air Service and Airways. There was not enough business to support the three companies, and they were all struggling financially. In 1937 McGee sold the company to Star Air Service.(( When Mac McGee sold the company, he began working several mining claims, but was called back to manage Star Air Service on several occasions while they continued to struggle financially. He left the airline business for the last time in 1937 when he arranged to sell Star Air Service to a new group of investors who hoped to make the company a major player in the Alaska airline business.(McGee Airways was the original Alaska air service that, through a long series of mergers and acquisitions ultimately became Airlines in 1944.()HistoryMcGee came to Alaska as a stowaway in 1929.(() He worked as a miner, truck driver,( dishwasher and fur trader. In 1931 he partnered with W. Barnhill( to found & McGee Airways with a three-seat Stinson SM8A which they had purchased from Airlines in Francisco.( In 1932 McGee bought Barnhills interest and dissolved the company.( McGee obtained a bank loan and purchased a second Stinson airplane and hired half-brother Estol Call to bring it to Anchorage, where he founded McGee Airways.Operationsright|thumb|Railroad crane will lower plane into Ship Creek in Anchorage at high tide where it can taxi into Cook Inlet for take-off.Although McGee learned to fly he did not like flying.  He preferred to hire pilots and personally manage the company. He paid his pilots on commission based on the income they generated.((( ) Originally the operation was completely un-scheduled.(( They flew trappers, hunters, tourists, salesmen, sport fishermen and commercial fishermen to destinations throughout the Territory, going from place to place delivering and picking up cargo and passengers until returning to home base in Anchorage.(( The pilots collected cash for the flights and settled with McGee each time they returned to Anchorage.((( The Department paid to have indigenous natives, who were wards of the government, flown to hospitals for  medical care.(The airplanes had no radios or navigational instruments.( Only a very few of the large cities had landing fields.( In summer the planes were equipped with pontoons for landing on lakes and rivers.(( Lake Spenard was the Anchorage pontoon base.( In winter the planes were converted to skis, landing on ice and snow covered waterways or clearings. Winter home base was Field in Anchorage.(left|thumb|McGee Airways Stinson being transported by pickup truck to Alaska Railroad Bridge.In the fall of 1934 McGee Airways obtained the first airmail contract to deliver mail to the Bay area of southwest Alaska.() He hired Roy Dickson to fly the new mail route. Dickson had brought a B-1 Ryan airplane to Alaska in March, 1934, and flew the summer mining season for Alaska Exploration & Mining Company out of Cantwell. McGee approached him in the Parsons Hotel in Anchorage with a proposition. Its a new project, never been tried before, do you want to try it? Dickson was anxious to get on McGees payroll so he could bring his family to Alaska from the states. His Ryan was in need of an overhaul, and he had been paid mostly in company stock rather than cash for his summers work. He accepted McGees offer, sold the Ryan to Bowman Airways, and sent for his family.( Dickson flew the mail route until late 1935, when he founded his own company Bering Sea Airways.The new air mail delivery flight took a minimum of three days with deliveries to Lake, Naknek, Egegik and Ugashik, the southernmost village on the run, then returning with deliveries to Nushagak, Dillingham, another stop at Iliamna Lake and back to Anchorage.( This new connection to the outside world allowed remote villagers to obtain products previously unavailable. The pilots always had a shopping list when they returned to Anchorage.((Previously mail had been delivered by steamships in the summer and dog teams in winter.(( In winter months from October 1 until May 1 only letters, cards, packages of seeds weighing less than a pound, and newspapers going to libraries or newspaper publishers were carried. Packages were held in Seattle until the summer months when they could be taken in by boat.( McGee was a workaholic, working seven days a week.( He was also known as an honest businessman, and shrewd manager.( He pioneered the concept of having a fleet of identical aircraft so that parts would be interchangeable.( In order to make a profit, he loaded his planes with all they could carry, causing the of Commerce aircraft inspector to frequently cite the company for overloading aircraft.( McGee Airways had two significant competitors in Anchorage, Woodley Airways and Air Service.() Woodley Airways was founded by Art Woodley in 1932,( and in April 1932, three young Seattle pilots Charlie Ruttan, Steve Mills and Jack Waterworth founded Star Air Service,( planning to offer flight instruction and charter service.(DissolutionBy the winter of 1934, it was apparent that there was not enough business to support three air services in Anchorage with the surplus of airplanes and an economy suffering from the Depression. McGee was also anxious to work some mining claims he had staked. Star Air Service acquired McGee Airways in 1934 for $50,000.((  McGee stipulated that if not paid on time, he would return and manage the operation until  receiving his money.( The acquisition made Star Air Service the largest airline operation in Alaska. By 1936 it had a fleet of 22 planes and a gross annual income of $190,000.( But Stars pilot owner/managers were a restless bunch and changes in the front office were common. McGee returned to manage the company twice, and in 1937, he bought his way back into the airline and finally sold the company to a new group of investors,(() ending his involvement in the airline business. After working his mining operations for a number of years,( McGee retired to the lower 48 and died in Nevada, in 1988( at age 71.PilotsThe bush pilots who flew in the 1930s were a most important element in the development of air services in Alaska, and indeed in the development of Alaska itself. They flew single engine aircraft all over the Territory, with no weather reports, no navigation aides, no radios in aircraft, not even good maps, and there were very few landing fields.  The pilots took the risks and their contributions to the inhabitants of Alaska were of enormous importance.(( The bush pilots who flew for McGee Airways were:*Estol Call((()*Roy S. Dickson (1901-1958)((((*James M. Jim Dodson (1902-1969)((*Ed Fageros(*Don Glass (d.1943)((*Don H. Goodman (b.1909)((*Gordon MacKenzie (1894-1963)(((*John W. Johnny Moore (1907-1988)((*Kenneth W. Kenny Neese (1903-1944)((((*Murrell Sasseen (1906-1974)((*Dan Victor (1901-1942)(*Oscar Winchell (1903-1987)((((AircraftMcGee Airways only operated Stinson airplanes.(*NC211W Stinson SM-8A (serial# 4038)()*NC216W Stinson SM-7A (serial# 3002)(*NC404M Stinson SM-1F (serial# M420)(*NC443M Stinson S Junior (serial# 8104)((*NC448H Stinson SM-1E (serial# M517)(*NC478M Stinson S Junior (serial# 8105)((*NC10828 Stinson S Junior (serial# 8011)(*NC13849 Stinson SR-5 (serial# 9220)(Further reading* International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 29. St. James Press, 1999.* Alaska Airlines: General Information and History, Seattle: Alaska Airlines, 1992.* Alaska Airlines, Archie Satterfield (1981). The Alaska Airlines Story. (Anchorage, AK: Alaska Northwest Pub. Co., 207 p.). Alaska AirlinesHistory. ISBN 978-0882401645* Robert J. Serling, Character & Characters: The Spirit of Alaska Airlines (Seattle: Documentary Media LLC, 2008), 492 pp., hardback, ISBN 978-1-933245-11-9* Robert W. Stevens D.D.L. (1989). Alaskan Aviation History. (Des Moines, IA: Polynyas Press, 1095 pp., hardback 2 volume set). ISBN 0929427017* Pat Wachel (1967). Oscar Winchell Alaskas Flying Cowboy. (Minneapolis, MN: T.S. Denison & Company, Inc., 210 pp., hardback). ASIN B0006BQWQEReferencesBibliography*Anchorage Centennial Commission Aviation Committee, Honoring 100 ALASKA BUSH PILOTS. Alaska, June 24, 1967*Archie Satterfield, The Alaska Airlines Story. Alaska Northwest Publishing Company, Alaska, 1981. ISBN 0-88240-165-3*John P. Bagoy, Legends & Legacies, Anchorage 1910-1935. 2001, ISBN 1-888125-91-8*Robert W. Stevens, Alaskan Aviation History, Polynyas Press, Moines, Washington, 1989, ISBN 0929427017*McLaren & Dickson, Roy Dickson 1930s Alaska Bush Pilot, Plane Truth Publishing, Tennessee, 2009. ISBN 978-1-932-496-72-7External links* A diamond in the sky: Alaska Airlines celebrates 75 years of service above the clouds., Alaska Business Monthly* Alaska Airlines 75th Anniversary Web Site, Alaskas World* Funding Universe, Alaska Air Group, Inc., Company History*  Roy Dickson 1930s Alaska Bush Pilot*  Alaska Aviation Heritage Museum* AIRLINES - Business History of Carriers,  Kipnotes* Alaska Air  75th Anniversary, January 1932,  Kipnotes* Airlines of North America* History Link.org The Free Online Encyclopedia of Washington State History, Alaska Airlines
8129636
Trimsaran
Trimsaran is a former mining village which lies on the B4308 between Llanelli and Kidwelly, in the Welsh county of Carmarthenshire.Trimsaran is six miles (10 km) from Llanelli, and  from Carmarthen. It is close to Port harbour, Country Park and the Coastal Park.Trimsaran CollieryThere are historical reports of mining activities taking place in the Trimsaran area dating back hundreds of years. By 1896, the Inspector of Mines noted that Trimsaran employed 144 men, producing coal, anthracite, and fireclay.By the early 1900s, three mines made up Trimsaran colliery: Caedean (deepest), Waunhir and the Upper slant; all connected underground and on the surface by a tramway. By 1908, Waunhir and Cadean employed 198 men, while by 1918 the workforce had grown to 435. By 1923 352 men employed at Caedean Slant, Upper Slant employed 63 men and Waunhir 126 men.There were three notable accidents:*February 1907, Waunhir slant - 6 men died when a coupling plate broke and full mine-cars ran down the drift - the men had no chance.*1909 - an explosion in the Caedean Slant killed 4 men, possibly caused by firedamp. *26 April 1923- 12 men died whilst travelling out of the mine the end of the day shift, when part of the journey of drams, in which they were riding suddenly careered back down the slope after a connecting shackle broke.By 1931 the mine was owned by Amalgamated Anthracite Ltd. and employed 700 men on the existing working. These drifts closed in 1934 and was replaced by the Waunffynhonnau drift (new drift or Wimpey drift), which employed over 300 men in 1945. The mine was closed by the Coal Board in April 1954, with most of the workforce going to Carway or Colliery.The site was later opened up as part of Celtic Energys move into mining, called Ffos Las, but was closed in 1997.()As part of the redevelopment of the site, it has been approved to become a fishing lake, bike and biking centre,(Report - Proposed Use of Quad Biking and Paintball Recreational Facilities and Tea Rooms in Existing Dwelling at Culla Park, Culla Road, Trimsaran) before proposed redevelopment of the site as a 16 million/1000m horse racing course, training centre and a grandstand for 1,000 spectators. A hotel and up to 250 houses would also be built on the site of the  site.()Trimsaran Rugby ClubTrimsaran is known for its union involvement, and is a sport that plays a part in the local community. Rugby was first played in Trimsaran in 1910 but the first recorded captain was Bill Bailey in 1927. Players who have graduated from RFC onto represent Wales included Jonathan Davies and Evans.ReferencesExternal links*Trimsaran and Pen-Y-Mynydd Website*Trimsaran Community website*Trimsaran RFC*WelshCoalMines.co.uk page on Trimsaran*Pictures of modern opencats mining at Trimsaran*Ffos Las racecourse*www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Trimsaran and surrounding areacy:Trimsaran
8139738
Volker_Braun
Image:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-1982-0104-301, Volker Braun, Ruth Berghaus, Wieland Frster.jpg|thumb|300px|Volker Braun (left), director Berghaus (center) and sculptor Frster in Berlin 1981.Volker Braun (born 7 May 1939, Dresden) is a German writer.  His works include Provokation fr mich (Provocation for Me) -- a collection of poems written between 1959 and 1964 and published in 1965, a play, Die Kipper (The Dumpers) (1972; written 1962-1965), and Das ungezwungne Leben Kasts (The Unrestrained Life of Kast) (1972).LifeVolker Braun,  who worked in mining and civil engineering after the Abitur before he studied philosophy in Leipzig, occupied himself with the contradictions and hopes in a socialist state.  A member of the SED since 1960, he succeeded in publishing his prose and poetry due to the application of his tactical skill.His work included spoken poems, theater pieces, novels and stories.At first his work reflected a critical enthusiasm for the build up of socialism.  From 1965 to 1967, Braun worked as an artistic director at the Ensemble from Helene Weigels invitation.  After the events of the Spring, he occupied himself pulling together criticism of the life in Socialism and the possibility of reform.  After that, he would be watched over strongly by the Stasi.  Since 1976, Braun worked at the Deutschen Theater Berlin (German Theater Berlin) and belonged to the artists who signed the petitions against Wolf Biermanns expatriation in 1976.  From 1979 he was active again in the Berliner Ensemble.  He left the Writers Union of East Germany in 1982.  They expanded while the livelihood of the East German arising Work did not give a picture of an increasingly depressed  Life.  The actors move resigned in an immovable association.  Nevertheless, he received the Prize of East Germany in 1981 and the Prize of East Germany in 1988.During the Wende, Braun belonged to the supporters of an independent third way for East Germany.  After the reunification, Braun occupied himself with critiques of the foundations for the failure of East Germany.  In this connection stood also his cooperation with that of Fritz Haug surrendered the western-Marxist periodical Argument.1986 Braun would awarded the Bremer Literature Prize and 1992 he got the excellence of the Memorial Prize.  He was awarded a stipend of the Massimo and a guest of the University of Wales in 1994.  In 1996, he received the Kritikerpreis (German Critic Prize), became a member of the Akademie fr Sprache und Dichtung, the Akademie der Knste (Saxon Academy of the Arts) and held Poet-lecturer at the of Heidelberg.  He received the Schrittmatter Prize in 1998 and the Bchner Prize in 2000.  From 1999 to 2000, he was the Grimm professor at the of Kassel.  He would be elected to the Director of the Literature Section of the der Knste in 2006.  In 2008, he received the 2007 Prize 2007 for his story, Das Mittagsmahl (The Midday Meal).Volker Braun lives in Berlin.Selected works* Die Kipper (The Dumpers), Drama (1965)* Provokation fr mich (Provocation for Me), Poem (1965)* Vorlufiges (Provisional), Poem (1966)* Kriegs Erklrung (Wars Explanation) (1967)* Lenins Tod (Lenins Death), Drama (1970)* Wir und nicht sie (We and not Them), Poem (1970)* Die Kipper (The Dumpers), Drama (1972)* Gedichte (Poems) (1972)* Gegen die symmetrische Welt (Against the Systematic World), Poem (1974)* Es gengt nicht die einfache Wahrheit (It does not satisfy the Simple Truth) (1975)* Unvollendete Geschichte (Incomplete History/Unfinished Narrative) (1977)* Training des aufrechten Gangs (Training of the Upright Gang), Poem (1979)* Hinze-Kunze-Roman (Every Tom, Dick and Harry Novel), Novel (1985)* Verheerende Folgen mangelnden Anscheins innerbetrieblicher Demokratie. Schriften (Disastrous Results mangled Appearances in-house Democracy.  Writings) (1988)* Der groe Frieden (The Great Peace)* Der Wendehals (The Wende Neck) (1995)* Lustgarten Preuen (Delight Garden of Prussia) (1996)* Wir befinden uns soweit wohl. Wir sind erst einmal am Ende (We feel ourselves so far whole.  We are only once on the End.) (1998)* Tumulus, Poetry Collection (1999)* Das Wirklichgewollte (The Real Artificial) (2000)* Das unbesetzte Gebiet (The Untaken Area), Historical Story (2004)* Das Mittagsmahl (The Midday Meal), Story (2007)Literature* Edition Text and Criticism: Volker Braun, 1977* Jay Rosellini, Volker Braun, 1983* Christine Cosentino, Wolfgang Ertl: Zur Lyrik Volker Brauns (To the Poet Volker Braun), 1984* Katrin Bothe: Die imaginierte Natur des Sozialismus. Eine Biographie des Schreibens und der Texte Volker Brauns 1959-1974 (The Imaginative Nature of the Socialist.  A Biography of the Writings and Texts of Volker Braun 1959-1974), Wrzburg 1997* Fritz J. Raddatz: Broken Lives (German). Die Zeit, 44/2000* Rolf Jucker (Hg.): Volker Braun in perspective, Amsterdam/New York, 2004Film* Zur Person: Volker Braun (To the Person: Volker Braun), Reportage, 50 Min., Author: Gaus (1991)External links*Literary Encyclopedia page on Volker Braun*Works by and on Volker Braun in the Catalog of the National Library** Link list of the FU Berlin on Volker BraunReferencesBraunBraunBraunBraunBraunBraun
8146140
The_Universal_Solvent_(comics)
The Universal Solvent is a 1995 Duck story by Rosa.PlotGearloose has invented a universal solvent, a thick, black liquid capable of instantly dissolving anything except diamonds, with it then transforming the dissolved matter into a super-dense dust. Gyro then gives the Universal Sovent (referred to as, Omnisolve) kept in an diamond jar and a Omnisolve umbrella. Scrooge buys the solvent from him, intending on using it in mining, in order to gain the super pure diamonds located in the outer core of the Earth. However, in his enthusiasm, Scrooge carelessly pours the solvent directly onto the ground, where it eats a solid shaft all the way down to the centre of the Earth (due to the Omnisolve creating a super-strong and dense lining on the sides of the shaft wall.)After Huey, Dewey and Louie explain the potentially catastrophic impact of this act - it would eventually lead to the Earths destruction by destroying the planets electromagnetic field and causing the Earth to be bombarded with radioactive solar winds - Scrooge, Donald and the boys go on a quest down the shaft to retrieve the solvent. What follows is an underground adventure along the lines of Vernes Journey to the Center of the Earth. They first start slowly going down with an ascent platform created by Gyro. In order to stop the air pressure from crushing them, Gyro creates an airlock over the shaft, making the shaft a vacuum, meaning they cannot eat, much to Donalds comical misery. Their platform is also slightly damaged by a falling pebble (which, due to the vacuum having no air to slow it down, was essentially traveling at the speed of a bullet). Scrooge also finds his diamonds, although he is nearly burned by the massive heat of the diamonds, as they were in the outer core. Later, as Scrooge finds out, they soon become essentially weightless, due to their weight being their attraction to the Earths mass, and as they travel deeper, more of the Earth is above them than below them, making them almost weightless. They also find that they have reached a section of the shaft still with air, meaning that they can now eat, much to Donalds glee. Eventually, they reach the center, and after Scrooge is nearly killed by the Omnisolve, they are able to capture the Universal Solvent. However, the magma from inside the mantle will soon break through the shaft, making them have to use a rocket flight through inner space. Donald has his helmet destroyed by a falling pebble, but still survives, due to air leaking in from cracks. They soon find that the magma is destroying the shaft from the bottom up, and the top of the shaft is collapsing. They are able to escape due to using the Omnisolve umbrella, which saves them from the falling rocks and allows them to create an escape route, but unfortunately, the magma is able to follow them. They eventually find themselves in Terry Fermy, with the Terries and Ferrmies destroying a column, forcing them to use another escape route. They eventually find themselves under the Tulebug River, with the river water solidifying the magma. They then arrive at the Money Bin (with the help of Gus Goose), with the top of the shaft about to erupt like a Volcano. Gyro is able to stop the eruption with the Omnisolve umbrella, which causes the magma to be reduced into a super-dense dust hat kept falling back on itself. Scrooge also gets the super-pure diamonds he wanted in the first place (due to them be carried by the magma, but the Omnisolve umbrella couldnt destroy them). Scrooges Money Bin is also safe, although it is severely tilted, with Scrooge musing he could still have his workers work there by wearing some special shoes. In the end, Scrooge deems the solvent as a failed investment. While it did succeed in getting him thousands of flawless diamonds from the bowels of the Earth, he didnt take into account that these diamonds are super-dense, and thus even the smallest ones weigh over 100 kg (200 pounds) each, making them useless as jewelery, with him then destroying the Omnisolve notes with the Omnisolve itself, much to Gyros relief. This story was inspired by the novel A Journey to the Center of the Earth and was based on a Pertwillaby Papers adventure titled Vortex. It was also likely a partial sequel of the classic Barks story, Land Beneath the Ground!.Don Rosa wrote two sequels to this story, called The Black Knight and Black Knight Glorps Again.External links*Matka Maan keskipisteeseenlser sig
8160253
Coal-mining
#REDIRECT mining
8169073
Antarctic_Snow_Cruiser
thumb|right|350px|A cutaway drawing of the Antarctic Snow Cruiser.The Antarctic Snow Cruiser was a vehicle designed from 1937 to 1939 under the direction of Poulter, intended to facilitate transport in the Antarctic. While having several innovative features, it generally failed to operate as hoped under the difficult conditions, and was eventually abandoned in Antarctica. Rediscovered under a deep layer of snow in 1958, it later disappeared again due to shifting ice conditions. The Snow Cruiser was also known as The Penguin, Penguin 1 or Turtle(Wings Magazine - February, 1980 http://www.joeld.net/snowcruiser/wings_feb_1980.html) in some published material.The Snow Cruiser was featured in the novel Atlantis Found by CusslerHistoryDesign and constructionOn April 29, 1939, Poulter and The Research Foundation of the Institute of Technology showed the plans to officials in D.C.. The Research Foundation would finance the cost and oversee the construction, and then loan the vehicle to the United States Antarctic Service. Work began on August 8, 1939 and lasted for 11 weeks.  On October 24, 1939, the vehicle was fired-up for the first time at the Pullman Company in Gary, Indiana (near Chicago) and began the  journey to the Boston Army Wharf. During the trip, a damaged steering system caused the vehicle to drive off a small bridge on the Highway and into a stream near the town of Ohio near Ohio, where it remained for 3 days.  After it arrived in Boston, it departed for Antarctica on November 15, 1939 aboard the ship the North Star.Arrival in the AntarcticThe Snow Cruiser arrived in of Whales, Little America, Antarctica in early January 1940 and experienced many problems. It was necessary to construct a ramp  from timber to unload the vehicle. As the vehicle was unloaded from the ship, one of the wheels broke though the ramp. The crew cheered when Poulter powered the vehicle free from the ramp but the cheers fell silent when the vehicle failed to move through the snow and ice. The large, smooth, tread-less tires were originally designed for a large swamp vehicle; they spun freely and provided very little forward movement, sinking as much a  into the snow. The crew attached the two spare tires to the front wheels of the vehicle and installed chains on the rear wheels, but were unable to overcome the lack of traction. The crew later found that the tires produced more traction when driven backwards. The longest trek was  -- driven completely in reverse. On January 24, 1940, Poulter returned to the US, leaving Alton Wade in charge of a partial crew. The scientists conducted seismologic experiments, cosmic-ray measurements, and ice core sampling while living in the snow- and timber-covered Snow Cruiser. Funding for the project was canceled as the focus in the United States became World War II.Rediscovery and final fateIn the late 1940s, an expedition team found the vehicle and discovered it needed only air in the tires and some servicing to make it operational. In 1958, an international expedition uncovered the snow cruiser using a bulldozer. It was covered by several feet of snow but a long bamboo pole marked its position. They were able to dig down to the location of the bottom of the wheels and accurately measure the amount of snowfall since it was abandoned. Inside, the vehicle was exactly as the crew had left it, with papers, magazines, and cigarettes scattered all around. Later expeditions reported no trace of the vehicle. Although there was some unsubstantiated speculation that the (traction-less) Snow Cruiser was taken by the Soviet Union during the Cold War, the vehicle most likely is either at the bottom of the Southern Ocean or buried deep under snow and ice. Antarctic ice is in constant motion and the ice shelf is constantly moving out to sea. In the mid-1960s, a large chunk of the Ross Ice Shelf broke off and drifted away; the break occurred right through Little America. It is not known on which side of the ice shelf the Snow Cruiser was located.Specifications*Length: 17.0 meters (55 feet 8 inches)*Width: 6.06 meters (19 feet 10.5 inches)*Height (wheels retracted): 3.7 meters (12 ft)*Height (wheels extended): 4.9 meters (16 ft)*Fully loaded Weight: 34,000 kg (75,000 pounds)*Range: *Maximum Speed: 48 km/hour (30 miles/hour)*Self-Sufficiency: 1 year under the most extreme conditions*Fuel Capacity: 9,463 liters (2,500 US gallons) stored under the floor*Additional Fuel Capacity: 3,785 liters (1,000 US gallons) stored on the roof, to be used by the plane *Crew Size: 5 people*Estimated Final Cost: $300,000*Cabin Compartments: control cabin, machine shop, combination kitchen/darkroom, storage for fuel, food, two spare tiresPowertrain Specifications*Powertrain Configuration: Diesel-Electric Hybrid (2 diesel engines, 2 generators, 4 electric motors)*Diesel Engine Model: Cummins H-6 engine*Diesel Engine Power Rating: 112 kW (150 horsepower) @ 1800 rpm -- 224 kW (300 horsepower) total combined power for 2 engines*Diesel Engine Configuration: 6-cylinder inline; naturally aspirated*Diesel Engine Displacement: 11.0 liters (672 cubic inches)*Diesel Engine Bore and Stroke: 124 mm (4 7/8 inch) bore x 152 mm (6 inch) stroke*Electric Generator Manufacturer: Electric*Electric Drive Motor Manufacturer: Electric*Electric Drive Motor Power Rating: 56 kW (75 horsepower) -- 224 kW (300 horsepower) total combined power for 4 motors*Tire Manufacturer: Tire and Rubber Company*Tire Dimensions: 3048 mm (120 inch) outer diameter x 1676 mm (66 inch) inner diameter x 851 mm (33.5 inch) widthInnovative Features*Wheels and tires retracted into housings where they were heated by engine exhaust gases. This was to prevent low-temperature cracking of the natural rubber compound.*Long front and rear overhangs on the body were to assist with crossing crevasses up to  wide. The front wheels were to be retracted so the front could be pushed across the crevasse. The front wheels were then to be extended (and the rear wheels retracted) to pull the vehicle the rest of the way across. This process required a complicated, 20-step procedure.*A pad on top of the vehicle was designed to hold a small aircraft (a 5-passenger Beechcraft biplane.) A winch would pull the aircraft into place. The plane was to be used to conduct aerial surveys.*Engine coolant circulated through the entire cabin for heating. The heating system was very efficient and the crew reported that they needed only light blankets when sleeping.*Excess electrical power could be stored in batteries for running lights and equipment when the engine was not running.*The Diesel-Electric drive train allowed for smaller engines and more space for the crew, due to the elimination of large mechanical drive components throughout the vehicle. This is possibly the first application of a diesel-electric powertrain in a 4-wheeled vehicle of this size; this design is now common in large modern mining trucks.References(See also* Snowcat* coachExternal links*The Antarctic Snow Cruiser*Snow cruiser history*Reprint of article from Invention & Technology Magazine*The Antarctic Edsel by Bob Hanes*Planting The Stars And Stripes In The Antarctic Popular Science, November 1939, Reprint of an article from Popular Science magazineCruisernea kroziloCruiserCruiser
8178673
Treeton_railway_station
Treeton railway station was a station situated on the Midland Railways line between Rotherham Masborough and Chesterfield. It was situated in the centre of the mining village of Treeton, in the Rother Valley near Rotherham in Yorkshire, England.The original Treeton railway station opened 6 April 1841 but its life was short. A new station, on the same site, was opened on 1 October 1884 and closed on 29 October 1951, although it was used for a small number of excursion trains after that date.The line here consisted of four tracks. The platforms served the centre two with access by steps from the adjacent road bridge, the goods lines being routed to the rear of the platforms in an arrangement similar to that at Brightside in Sheffield.(Pixton, B., (2000) North Midland: Portrait of a Famous Route, Cheltenham: Runpast Publishing)The station was located between Rotherham Masborough and Woodhouse Mill.The stationmasters house was situated at 8, Station Road, opposite the Station Hotel. References
8199961
Rotherham_Main_Colliery
Rotherham Main Colliery was situated in Canklow, about  south of the town in the Rother Valley. The area was the site of an ancient crossing of the river set below the crag on which were Canklow Woods, an ancient woodland area.  History The first shaft was commenced in 1890 with the pit going into production in 1894. The owners of the colliery and later the coke ovens and by-products plant were Sheffield-based steel makers Brown and Company who also built houses for their workers and a school for the children of the colliers.(Mining Heritage, Rotherham)An accident occurred in 1891 when 8 miners fell  from their wooden platform.(About Canklow, Rotherham, South Yorkshire)The colliery had problems, the area was prone to flooding but prior to War I it employed around 2,000 miners. Following the Strike in 1926 the colliery was virtually closed and needed just 300 employees to maintain it.The colliery closed in 1954 and nowadays there are no signs of its existence, the last of what did remain being swept away under a road scheme which followed the Rother Valley linking the towns relief road to the M1 via Rother Way to Junction 33. The Railway Connection The colliery was linked to the main railway network by a branch line from the Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railway at a junction known as Rotherham Main, situated about  on the Sheffield side of Rotherham Central.This branch line was also the subject of an agreement between the  Great Central Railway Company and steel makers Peech and Tozer giving access to the steel companys locomotives and wagons across the main line tracks and to tip furnace waste (slag etc) on land adjacent to the line.References* Original agreement between the G.C.R. and Steel, Peech and Tozer, 1912.
8204729
Dabus_River
The Dabus River is a north-flowing tributary of the River in southwestern Ethiopia; it joins its parent stream at . The Dabus has a drainage area of about 21,032 square kilometers.(Tana & Beles Integrated Water Resources Development: Project Appraisal Document (PAD), Vol.1, World Bank, 2 May 2008 (accessed 5 May 2009))This river was formerly known as the Yabus, and local speakers still refer to it by that name, without distinction for the Yabus in Sudan that is a tributary of the Nile. Maria Schuver was the first European explorer to determine that they were two separate rivers, and in 1882 proved false the rumor that these rivers flowed from the same mountain lake.(Wendy James, Gerd Baumann and Douglas H. Johnson, Juan Maria Schuvers Travels in North East Africa (London: The Hakluyt Society, 1996), pp. 132f)It is important as a boundary both in cultural and political terms. According to Dunlop, who explored the region in 1935, the river is where the Christian church of the Oromo people gives place to the mosque, and the Oromo greeting to the universal Muslim politeness: Salaam Aleikum. In contrast to the Oromo and Amhara dress, consisting of a shirt with close-fitting sleeves, jodpurs and chamma, they wear a white skull-cap, pugaree, flowing coat with loose sleeves and baggy trousers.(A. Dunlop, The Dadessa Valley, Geographical Journal, 89 (1937), p. 519) In political terms, its course defines not only part of the boundary between the Benishangul-Gumuz and the Regions, but also the entire shared boundary of the Asosa and Zones of the Benishangul-Gumuz Region. The Dabus is a historically significant source for gold, where the local inhabitants used mining to recover the mineral.(Quoted in Richard Pankhurst, Economic History of Ethiopia (Addis Ababa: Haile Selassie I University, 1968), p. 233.) Notes  See also *of Ethiopian riversDabusru:
8219956
Lehigh_Gorge_State_Park
 accessdate2008-06-04)| elevation_imperial           1027| elevation_round              1| elevation_note               (| area_unit                    acre| area_imperial                4548| area_round                   0| area1_imperial                | area1_type                    | length_imperial              | length_orientation           | width_imperial               | width_orientation            | highest_type                 Northern terminus| highest                      | highest_location             Kidder Township| highest_lat_d                41| highest_lat_m                06| highest_lat_s                21| highest_lat_NS               N| highest_long_d               75| highest_long_m               43| highest_long_s               30| highest_long_EW              W| highest_elevation_imperial   1514| lowest_type                  Southern terminus| lowest                       | lowest_location              Jim Thorpe| lowest_lat_d                 40| lowest_lat_m                 52| lowest_lat_s                 21| lowest_lat_NS                N| lowest_long_d                75| lowest_long_m                44| lowest_long_s                18| lowest_long_EW               W| lowest_elevation_imperial    559| biome                       | biome_share                  | biome1                      | biome1_share                 | geology                      | geology1                     | plant                        | plant1                       | animal                         | animal1                     | established_type            | established                  1980| established1_type           | established1                 | management_body              Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources| management_location         | management_lat_d                     | management_lat_m             | management_lat_s             | management_lat_NS            | management_long_d                    | management_long_m            | management_long_s            | management_long_EW          | management_elevation        | visitation                  | visitation_year             | free_type                    | free                        | free1_type                    | free1                        | map                          Lehigh Gorge State Park.PNG| map_caption                  Location of Lehigh Gorge State Park in Pennsylvania| map_locator                  | map_first                   | website                        Lehigh Gorge State Park}}Lehigh Gorge State Park is a  Pennsylvania state park in Luzerne and Carbon Counties, Pennsylvania in the United States. The park encompasses the Lehigh Gorge, which stretches along the River from a Army Corps of Engineers flood control dam in Luzerne County to Jim Thorpe in Carbon County. The primary recreational activity at Lehigh Gorge State Park is water rafting.()Park accessThere are three primary access areas for the park. The northern access point is at White Haven, just off exit 273 of Interstate 80 on Route 940. The central access point is near Rockport, a few miles off Route 93 near the borough of Weatherly. The southern access point is just off exit 74 of 476 near Glen Onoko and Route 903.(CourseThe Lehigh River forms the border between Carbon and Luzerne counties in the northern part of the park. The northern end of Lehigh Gorge State Park is just below the Army Corps of Engineers E. Walter Dam, in Bear Creek Township on the bank (Luzerne County) and Kidder Township on the bank (Carbon County). The Lehigh River flows generally south and enters Dennison Township, then the borough of White Haven, the northern access point, on the right (Luzerne) bank. It enters the borough of East Side, opposite White Haven, on the left (Carbon) bank. Leaving the boroughs, the river enters Foster Township on the right (Luzerne) bank, and returns to Kidder Township, passing Run State Park on the left (Carbon) bank.( Note: shows Lehigh Gorge State Park)( Note: shows Lehigh Gorge State Park)left|thumb|A section of the cascade waterfalls downstream from the Glen Onoko FallsThe river and park then leave Luzerne County, with the southern part of the park entirely within Carbon County. Lehigh Township is on the right bank, with the river entering Penn Forest Township soon after on the left bank. The river veers west here and makes a large, tight bend at Rockport and the central access point (right bank), before heading back east, then south, west, and then generally south again. Some of the land bordering the river here is State Game Lands Number 141. The park then enters the borough of Jim Thorpe on the left bank, then the borough of Nesquehoning on the right bank, with the Glen Onoko southern access point on the right bank in Lehigh Township, just before Nesquehoning. Soon both banks of the river are within the borough of Jim Thorpe, and shortly after this the park ends, just above the Route 903 bridge.(The Gorge Trail, a multi-use trail, follows the right bank of the Lehigh River south through the park from the village of Port Jenkins in Dennison Township in Luzerne County to Glen Onoko in Lehigh Township in Carbon County.(</ref)HistoryCoalThe history of Lehigh Gorge State Park is tied into the development of coal mining, which was once the center of the economy of northeastern Pennsylvania. Coal was discovered near Summit Hill in 1791, leading to rapid development of the area to mine the coal from the mountains and ship it to the cities of the east coast of the United States. However, Lehigh Gorge and its rapid waters stood in the way as barges could not pass the rapids. This problem was solved by Josiah White and the Lehigh Coal and Navigation Company, which built a canal through the gorge by reshaping the river. Twenty dams and twenty nine locks were built between what was then known as Mauch Chunk (now Jim Thorpe) and White Haven. The Upper Grand Section of the Canal was destroyed by severe flooding in the mid-19th century and was eventually replaced by railroads.LumberNaturalist and painter James Audubon visited the Lehigh Gorge in 1829 and spent over a month painting the birds of the area. At this time the gorge was largely untouched by human hands, but Audubon could see that this was not to last. The demand for lumber was intense during the mid-to-late 19th century and the forests of much of Pennsylvania were stripped bare. Lehigh Gorge was no exception, its forests of white pine and hemlock were harvested and sent down the Lehigh River. The wood was used for lumber and the bark was used in tanneries to make leather. The second largest tannery in the United States was along the Lehigh River at the small town of Lehigh Tannery. By 1875 most of the saleable timber had been clear-cut,with many acres of dried treetops and other wooden debris left on the ground. That same year a spark from a passing coal-fired locomotive ignited a massive forest fire that burned the debris, the remaining standing timber, the sawmills, and their lumber stockpiles. This forest fire brought about the end of the lumber era in the Lehigh Gorge.thumb|right|200px|From a 1907 postcardFrom resort to state parkLehigh Gorge was a resort area for a brief time at the turn of the 20th century. Railroads operated tourist lines that led to a resort area at Glen Onoko. The resort hotel there had 47 rooms, courts, a dance pavilion, and trails that led to the scenic Onoko Falls. This area was very popular with people seeking to get away from the polluted cities in the northeastern United States. The hotel and surrounding forests were destroyed by fire in the 1910s and the Lehigh Gorge area was largely forgotten until the 1970s.  The abandonment of the main line of the Central Railroad of New Jersey through the Gorge (in 1972) provided the necessary real estate for the trail.  The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania purchased this right of way from the Reading Company, leading to the establishment of Lehigh Gorge State Park in 1980.Recreationthumb|200px|An overlook on the Glen Onoko Falls Trail.The primary recreational use of Lehigh Gorge State Park is on the whitewater of the gorge. Other uses are hiking, bicycling, sight seeing and animal/bird watching along the abandoned railroad grade of the Gorge Trail. The park is also open to hunting and fishing.RaftingRafting is very popular in Lehigh Gorge State Park. The River is rated a Class III river on the Scale of River Difficulty, although this depends on the water conditions, which are generally best in the spring. The conditions are controlled by the amount of rainfall in the area and by the amount of water released from the E. Walter Dam at White Haven by the Army Corps of Engineers. All boaters must wear jackets that are in compliance with the rules and regulations of the States Coast Guard. Several licensed commercial outfitters currently operate on the Lehigh River.Image:Lehigh Gorge State Park - April 21 2007.JPG|thumb|292px|The River in Lehigh Gorge State Park.Hunting and fishingHunting is permitted in much of Lehigh Gorge State Park. Hunters are expected to follow the rules and regulations of the Game Commission. The common game species are Grouse, squirrels, turkey, deer, black bear and rabbits. The hunting of groundhogs is not permitted at the park. The Fish and Boat Commission assures that anglers will have plenty of chances to catch fish by stocking  trout in the waters of the Lehigh River.Nearby state parksThe following state parks are within  of Lehigh Gorge State Park:()()*State Park (Carbon County)*Pocono State Park (Monroe County)*Slocum State Park (Luzerne County)*State Park (Monroe and Wayne Counties)*Environmental Education Center (Northampton County)*Run State Park (Carbon County)*Lake State Park (Schuylkill County)*State Park (Luzerne County)*State Park (Monroe and Wayne Counties)*State Park (Schuylkill County)See also*Hole Tunnel, an abandoned railroad tunnel in the park at Glen OnokoReferencesExternal links* 
8225996
Paul_Hardiman
 Paul Hardiman is a British record producer noted for his work with Cole and the Commotions (on their debut Rattlesnakes), and Cole solo. More famously he also produced the worldwide hit Lady in Red by De Burgh and the critically acclaimed Mining by The. External links * 
8237799
William_W._Morrow
thumb|right|200px|William W. Morrow.William W. Morrow (July 15, 1843July 24, 1929) was a Representative from California from 18851891.  Born near Milton, County, Indiana, he moved with his parents to County, Illinois in 1845, attended the common schools and received private instruction. He moved to Rosa, California, in 1859, taught school and explored mining regions. Morrow went East in 1862 to join the Army and served in the National Rifles of the of Columbia. While in the of the Potomac he was appointed a special agent of the States Treasury Department in January, 1865, and was detailed to California. He remained there and was employed during the next four years in confidential positions under the of the Treasury. Morrow studied law, was admitted to the bar in 1869 and commenced practice in Francisco. He was assistant States Attorney for California from 18701874, assisted in organizing the Francisco Bar Association in 1872 and served as its president in 1892 and 1893. Morrow served as chairman of the Republican State central committee of California 18791882, attorney for the State board of harbor commissioners from 1880-1883, and also special United States attorney before the and American Claims Commission 18811883, and before the Claims Commission 18821885. He was a delegate to the National Convention in 1884, elected as a Republican to the Forty-ninth, Fiftieth, and Fifty-first Congresses (March 4, 1885March 3, 1891). Morrow was not a candidate for renomination in 1890. He was appointed States District Judge for the Northern District of California 18911897 and then States court of appeals judge of the Ninth Judicial Circuit 18971922. Morrow retired from the bench on January 1, 1923. He was one of the incorporators of the Red Cross and resided in San Francisco, Francisco County, California, until his death in that city on July 24, 1929. Morrow was interred in Cypress Lawn Cemetery, California.References
8248786
Gold_in_California
Gold in California became highly concentrated there as the result of global forces operating over hundreds of millions of years.  Volcanoes, tectonic plates and erosion all combined to concentrate billions of dollars worth of gold in the mountains of California.  During the Gold Rush, gold-seekers known as Forty-Niners retrieved this gold, at first using simple techniques, and then developing more sophisticated techniques, which spread around the world. GeologyImage:subduction magma rising.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Gold-bearing magma rising after being subducted under the continental crust.Scientists believe that over a span of at least 400 million years, gold that had been widely dispersed in the Earths crust became more concentrated by geologic actions into the gold-bearing regions of California. Only gold that is concentrated can be economically recovered. Some 400 million years ago, California lay at the bottom of a large sea; underwater volcanoes deposited lava and minerals (including gold) onto the sea floor; sometimes enough that islands were created.( p. 167.)  Between 400 million and 200 million years ago, geologic movement forced the sea floor and these volcanic islands and deposits eastwards, colliding with the American continent, which was moving westwards.(Hill, Mary (1999), p. 168.)Beginning about 200 million years ago, tectonic pressure forced the sea floor beneath the American continental mass.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 168-69.) As it sank, or subducted, beneath todays California, the sea floor heated and melted into very large molten masses (magma). Being lighter and hotter than the ancient crust above it, this magma forced its way upward, cooling as it rose(, pp. 195-196.) to become the granite rock found throughout the Sierra Nevada and other mountains in California today &mdash; such as the sheer rock walls and domes of Valley.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 149-58.  Similar forces created the granite domes and spires of Crags in Shasta County.) As the hot magma cooled, solidified, and came in contact with water, minerals with similar melting temperatures tended to concentrate themselves together.(  As it solidified, gold became concentrated within the magma, and during this cooling process, veins of gold formed within fields of quartz( because of the similar melting temperatures of both.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 174-78.)thumb|left|250px|Goldfields in the mountains of northern and central California.As the Sierra Nevada and other mountains in California were forced upwards by the actions of tectonic plates, the solidified minerals and rocks were raised to the surface and exposed to rain, ice and snow.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 169-173.)  The surrounding rock then eroded and crumbled, and the exposed gold and other materials were carried downstream by water.  Because gold is denser than almost all other minerals, this process further concentrated the gold as it sank, and pockets of gold gathered in quiet gravel beds along the sides of old rivers and streams.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 94-100.)  The California mountains rose and shifted several times within the last fifty million years, and each time,  old streambeds moved and were dried out, leaving the deposits of gold resting within the ancient gravel beds where the gold had been collecting.(Hill, Mary (1999), pp. 105-110.) Newer rivers and streams then developed, and some of these cut through the old channels, carrying the gold into still larger concentrations.( The Forty-Niners of the Gold Rush first focused their efforts on these deposits of gold, which had been gathered in the gravel beds by hundreds of millions of years of geologic action.Gold recoveryThe early Forty-Niners panned for gold in Californias rivers and streams, or used cradles and rockers or long-toms,(Images and detailed description of placer mining tools and techniques; image of a long tom) forms of mining.(Brands, H.W. (2002), pp. 198-200.)(Bancroft, Hubert Howe (1884-1890) History of California, vols. 18-24, The works of Hubert Howe Bancroft, complete text online, pp. 87-88.) Modern estimates by the Geological Survey are that some 12 million ounces (373 t) of gold were removed in the first five years of the Gold Rush (worth approximately US$7.2 billion at November 2006 prices).(Mining History and Geology of the Mother Lode (accessed Oct. 16, 2006))By 1853, the first mining was used.(, p. 89.) In hydraulic mining, (which was invented in California) a powerful stream of water is directed at gold-bearing gravel beds; the gravel and gold then pass over sluices, with the gold settling to the bottom.  By the mid-1880s, it is estimated that 11 million ounces (342 t) of gold (worth approximately US$6.6 billion at November 2006 prices) had been recovered via hydraulicking.(The final stage to recover loose gold was to prospect for gold in the flat rivers of Californias Central Valley and other gold-bearing areas of California (such as Valley in Siskiyou County).  By the late 1890s, dredging technology (which was also invented in California) had become economical,(*  pp. 1991) and it is estimated that more than 20 million ounces (622 t) were recovered by dredging (worth approximately US$12 billion at November 2006 prices).(Gold-seekers also engaged in hard-rock mining, that is, extracting the gold directly from the rock that contained it (typically quartz)(Rawls, James J. and Orsi, Richard (eds.) (1999), pp. 36-39) Once the gold-bearing rocks were brought to the surface, the rocks were crushed, and the gold was separated out (using moving water), or leached out, typically by using arsenic or mercury.(Rawls, James J. and Orsi, Richard (eds.) (1999), pp. 39-43) Eventually, hard-rock mining wound up being the single largest source of gold produced in the Gold Country.(Geological after-effectsThere were decades of minor earthquakes, more than at any other time in the historical record for California, before the San Francisco earthquake. Previously interpreted as precursory activity to the 1906 earthquake, they have been found to have a strong seasonal pattern and due to large seasonal sediment loads in coastal bays that overlie faults as a result of mining of gold inland.(Seasonal Seismicity of Northern California Before the Great 1906 Earthquake, (Journal) Pure and Applied Geophysics, ISSN 0033-4553 (Print) 1420-9136 (Online), volume 159, Numbers 1-3 / January, 2002, Pages 7-62.)NotesReferences* Bancroft, Hubert Howe (18841890) History of California, vols. 18-24, The works of Hubert Howe Bancroft, complete text online * * * * 
8258351
Costa_Rican_jade_tradition
Jadeite is presumed one of the most precious materials of Pre-Columbian Rica.  It, along with other similar looking greenstones ( ex. chalcedony, serpentine, and green jasper) were cherished and worked for years.  Jadeite was used to decorate the body and presumably a symbol of power. Timeline There are three main periods in Costa Rican Jade Tradition, they correspond with the second half of Mid-Preclassic to Late Classic Periods in Mesoamerica.# Beginning Period: 500 BC- 300 AD# Florescent Period: 300-900 AD# Decadent Period: 700-900 ADThe end of the jade tradition in Rica corresponds with the beginning of gold work.   Jade workingJadeite rates between 6-7 on the scale of hardness, therefore making it extremely tough and time consuming to work because it was necessary to use minerals of equal or harder value.  Abrasive powders made of these minerals were often used to carve into the material.  Some of the main techniques used were pecking, drilling, sawing, carving, engraving and grinding.  String sawing was a technique likely developed by Costa Rican lapidaries, in the northeastern region.  This technique was done by sawing with a cord and a powdered abrasive.  It was used to create curved slits openings, and by drilling a hole in the middle of a piece you could thread the cord through and create a hole. The final process was polishing.Presumed patterns: :High-intensity: this pattern of jade working characterizes the jade objects that took the most time to complete, sometimes years.  They were more time consuming in addition to being more elaborately decorated, with deeper incisions.  :Low-intensity: this pattern was less time consuming and could be made of softer materials, greenstones that looked like jadeite.  They were less valuable because they were made from local materials.  It was socially motivated by the high-intensity pattern. Jade objects Most of the jade objects recorded are from looted context, but when found in situ the objects are primarily in graves.  The bulk of Costa Rican jades contain drilled holes so they can be utilized to decorate the body in bead and pendant form.  There are three main types of objects listed here.1. Axe Gods: Generally these are stylized figure pendants that look like they were made from axes or celts.  They are two-dimensionally decorated on the front with three main segments.  The first being the top of the head to the top of the shoulders, where holes are drilled to suspend the object.  The second is from the top of the shoulders to the bottom of the wings or arms.  The third section is the blade of the pendant, it goes from the bottom of the wings or arms to the base, which consists of 30-40% of the entire pendent.  There are two types of Axe god figurines, Avian and Anthropomorphic.  The earliest known jade work is the Avian axe god celt found at the site of La Regla, dated at 500 BC.2.  Beak Birds: These are characteristic for their large, stylized beak.  All were drilled through their neck so when strung to hang the beak would be projecting.  The figures are very diverse in size and shape.  The beaks are either straight, or curved pointing up or down.  Some of the beaks are curved into a spiral, and attached to the body presenting the string saw technique.3.  Bar Pendants:  These are horizontal and usually winged.  They are drilled with two holes through the length of the pendant or drilled parallel to each other through the width of the pendant.  Examples of this type are open-winged bats, double headed winged bats, double headed bar with reptile heads at either end, opened winged bats with reptile heads at both ends, or plain with no incised decoration.   Likely source and trade patterns Most of the jade work in Costa Rica was done with a particular type. It was a deep, blue-green color, and the same type the Olmecs used.  In 1998 an enormous region of this particular jade was uncovered after a hurricane in Guatemala.  The area is located in south east Guatemala In the Motagua River Valley.  It is about the size of Rhode Island, and has evidence of ancient mining.  This is the likely source of both the Olmec and Costa Rican jade.  This implies a significant long-distance trade hundreds of years before Christ.  Postulated by David Mora there was a direct exchange network between the previously mentioned area in Guatemala (in the Mayan lowlands) and the northwestern/ central areas of Costa Rica between 300 BC and 800 AD, in which Costa Ricans obtain jade.  Also, the jade tradition died down due to the collapse of (the Olmecs) Copan, the presumed trade center for the jade. References*Broad, William J. The New York Times:In Guatemala, a Mother Lade of Jade. May 22, 2002. Front page*Easby, Elizabeth Kennedy. Pre-Columbian Jade in Costa Rica. Emmerich Inc.  NY 1968*Guerrero Miranda, Juan Vicinte. 1998. The Archeological Context in Costa Rica. In Jade in Ancient Costa Rica edited by Julie Jones, pp 23-37. New York: The Metropolitan Museum of Art.*Mora-Marn, David. 2005. The Jade to Gold Shift in Ancient Costa Rica:A World Systems Perspective UNC-Chapel Hill  *Archaeology GlossaryExternal links *Images Of Costa Rican Jade*Virtual Museum Of Costa Rican & Pre-columbian Jade*Costa Rican Archaeology
8267311
The_Vigilantes_Are_Coming
 budget           $82,616 (cost:  $87,655)(The Vigilantes Are Coming is a 1936 American Republic serial.  It was the third of the sixty six serials made by Republic Pictures (and the third released in 1936).This serial was filmed between 28 May and 17 June 1936 under the title of The Vigilantes.  It was released two months later, on 22 August 1936, under the final title.  In the early 1950s the serial was re-edited into six 26 minute episodes for television.PlotFollowing the discovery of gold in Mexican California in 1844, Russian Cossacks led by Count Ivan Raspinoff, in collusion with General Jason Burr, attempt to invade California and turn it into a Russian Colony with Burr as its dictator.  In doing so they round up slaves to work the mines and General Burr has Don Lorings brother and father murdered to acquire their ore-rich land.When Don returns, having been away at the time with Salvation, Whipsaw and Captain John Fremont, he assumes the masked identity of The Eagle to stop them and get his revenge.He is aided by a group of vigilantes assembled from the Californian ranchers, fighting both General Burrs henchmen and Raspinoffs Cossacks, while awaiting the arrival of Captain Fremonts American troops before the colony becomes official.Cast*Robert Livingston as Don Loring, the mild mannered church organist and the masked vigilante The Eagle*Hughes as Doris Colton, John Coltons daughter*Big Boy Williams as Salvation, leader of the vigilantes*Hatton as Whipsaw, another Californian vigilante*Kohler as General Jason Burr, conspirator with Count Raspinoff aiming to become supreme dictator of Russian California*Warwick as Count Ivan Raspinoff,  emissary of the Russian Tsar aiming to conquer Mexican California and claim its gold*Farnum as Father Jose, the local priest;Supporting cast*Kortman as Boris Petroff, a Cossack*Merton as Rance Talbot, one of General Burrs henchman*Ingraham as John Colton, Mining engineer held by General Burr*William Desmond as Anderson, Rancher/Vigilante*Canutt as Barsam, one of General Burrs henchman*Layne as Clem Peters, Rancher/Vigilante*Pope as Ivan, a Cossack*Clemente as Pedro, one of General Burrs henchman*Osborne as Harris, one of General Burrs henchman*Crash Corrigan as Captain John Charles Fremont, Army CaptainProductionStedman states that The Vigilantes Are Coming was a reworking of The Eagle, Valentinos silent film.()  Harmon and Glut expand on that to say it was based on Zorro and Lone Ranger Rides Again in addition to Valentinos The Eagle.()  However, no mention is made of this being a derivative work in Witneys autobiography.()The serial was budgeted at $82,616 although the final  cost was $87,655 (a $5,039, or 6.1%, overspend).  Despite being overbudget, this was the cheapest Republic serial of 1936 as well as the second cheapest of them all.( It was filmed between 28 May and 17 June 1936 under the title The Vigilantes.(  The serials production number was 418.(This was William Witneys first time working on a serial, although not as director (that would be Painted Stallion in 1937).  In The Vigilantes Are Coming he worked as a unit director and as an extra (a Cossack).  It was the only serial Republic produced in this year, 1936 (the first year of serial production for Republic), where the lead character did not share the name of the lead actor (although Crash Corrigan in the previous Republic serial, Kingdom, had his name created specifically for that serial).Stunts* Canutt as Don Loring (doubling Robert Livingston)* Coats* Cooper* Garrett, roping double* Mapes* WestReleaseTheatricalThe Vigilantes Are Comings official release date is 22 August 1936,  although this is actually the date the sixth chapter was made available to film exchanges.(TelevisionIn the early 1950s, The Vigilantes Are Coming was one of fourteen Republic serials edited into a television series.  It was broadcast in six 26-minute episodes.(Chapter titles#The Eagle Strikes (31 min 24s)#Birth of the Vigilantes (20 min 51s)#Condemned by Cossacks (18 min 45s)#Unholy Gold (16 min 50s)#Treachery Unmasked (19 min 4s)#A Tyrants Trickery (17 min 54s)#Wings of Doom (17 min 23s)#A Treaty with Treason (17 min 18s)#Arrows Flight (17 min 59s)#Prison of Flame (18 min 26s)#A Race With Death (15 min 37s)#Fremont Takes Charge (17 min 45s)Source:(()Cliffhangers#The Eagle is shot and falls from a church tower.#The Eagle is locked inside the Powder Magazine when it explodes.#The Eagle is caught by a squad meant for Salvation.#The Eagle is caught under a hydraulic ore crusher.#The Eagle falls over a cliff under a hail of bullets.#The Eagle is knocked unconscious on a cart carrying powder when it explodes.#The Eagle trips and falls beneath the blades of four Cossacks.#A stagecoach carrying The Eagle and Count Raspinoff goes over a cliff.#The Eagle is shot off his horse and falls under the hooves of his pursuers.#The Eagle is locked in a burning building.#The Eagle is caught in several explosions and the resultant landslide.See also* of film serials* of film serials by studioReferencesExternal links* * 
8283402
Ovambo_language
mapcaptionThe distribution of Oshiwambo languages in NamibiaOvambo or Ambo, also known as Oshiwambo (which is also used specifically for the Kwanyama or Ndonga dialect), is a cluster in Angola and northern Namibia, of which the written standards are Kwanyama and Ndonga.Over half of the people in Namibia speak Oshiwambo,() particularly the people.The language is closely related to that of the Hereros and Himba, Otjiherero. An obvious sign of proximity is the prefix used for language and dialect names, Proto-Bantu *ki- (class 7, as in Ki-swahili), which in Herero has evolved to Otji- and in Ovambo further to Oshi-.HistoryAfter Namibias independence in 1990, the area previously known as Ovamboland was divided into the regions of Ohangwena, Omusati, Oshana or Otshana, and Oshikoto. The population, estimated at between 700,000 and 750,000, fluctuates remarkably. This is because of the indiscriminate border drawn up by the Portuguese and Germans during colonial rule, which cut through the Oukwanyama tribal area, placing some in Angola and others in Namibia. This results in regular cross-border movement.There are approximately one million Oshiwambo speakers located in Namibia and Angola.( ) Though it is mainly spoken in the northern regions of Namibia, it is widely spoken across the rest of the country by populations of migrant workers from Ovamboland. These workers comprise a large part of the population in many towns, particularly in the south, where there are jobs in the mining industry. For example, in Lderitz, an 18 hour drive from Ovamboland, at least 50% of the population speaks Oshiwambo.NameThe names Ambo and Ovambo appears to have originally been exonyms. Despite extensive speculation, their origin remains unknown. The country was called Ovamboland and Amboland by the German colonial authorities. In English, Ovamboland predominates, though Ambo country is sometimes used, and in English publications from Namibia, Owamboland, Wamboland, and Owambo are seen. The endemic forms are Owambo (Ndonga) and Ouwambo (Kwanyama). The people are generally called the Ovambo or Ambo in English. The endemic forms are Aawambo (Ndonga) and Ovawambo (Kwanyama); the singular in both cases is Omuwambo. The language is generally called Ovambo, Ambo, or Oshiwambo in English; the endonym in both standards is Oshiwambo.(Minna Saarelma-Maunumaa, 2003, Edhina Ekogidho&mdash;Names as Links: The Encounter between African and European Anthroponymic Systems among the Ambo People in Namibia. Helsinki.https://oa.doria.fi/dspace/bitstream/10024/1007/1/edhinaek.pdf) Ovambo tribes and dialects There are eight dialects, including the two written standards Kwanyama and Ndonga. The following table contains the names, areas, dialect names and the locations of the Ovambo tribes according to T. E. Tirronens Ndonga-English Dictionary. The table also contains information concerning which noun class of the Proto-Bantu language the words belong to.(Toivo Emil Tirronen: Ndonga-English Dictionary. Oshinyanyangidho shongeleki ELCIN. Oniipa, 1986.)External links* PanAfrican L10n page on Ovambo* News in the Ovambo language in the newspaper The NamibianReferencesca:Oshiwambode:Oshivamboes:Oshiwambolingvofr:Oshiwambooshiwambokalbanl:Oshiwambono:Oshiwambopt:Oshiwamboru:sv:Oshiwambo
8292449
Louis_Caryl_Graton
Louis Caryl Graton (1880-1970), American geologist, chemist and educator, began his career in 1900 as assayer for Ledyard Gold Mines Ltd., near Ontario. He moved on to Canadian Goldfields Ltd. later in 1900, then entered University as a graduate student, studying many of the famous mines of Ontario and Quebec. He continued his studies at University in 1902-1903.In 1903, Graton was hired by Lindgren of the Geological Survey to assist Lindgrens restudy of the Creek, Colorado goldfields. This began an association that lasted until Lindgrens death in 1939. While at the USGS, he studied ore deposits in the southern Appalachians, Mexico and California.In 1909, Graton was appointed assistant professor of Mining Geology at Harvard; he advanced to full professor in 1912, a position he would hold for 37 years. Graton made important contributions in applying the science of geology to the practical job of finding ore. He was notably successful in selling geology to the mining industry, in an era when many companies doubted the value of employing mining geologists. He became Professor Emeritus in 1949.Graton began a long association as a consultant for the Corporation (then the Cerro de Pasco Copper Corp.) in 1920. He was an active consultant until 1950. From 1945 to 1967 he served on the Cerro of Directors. For Cerro and other industrial clients, he set up modern geological departments and trained staff geologists to high professional standards.L.C. Graton occupied a pre-eminent position in geology for half a century. He was President of the of Economic Geologists in 1931, and was awarded the Medal in 1950, among many other awards and honors. He left a significant legacy of scientific papers and reviews. His bibliography is included in the Graton-Sales memorial volume, cited below.See also* Gratonite, a mineral named to honor Graton.References* Louis Caryl Graton in Ore Deposits of the United States, 1933-67, the Graton-Sales volume, New York, AIME, 1968. LC Catalog # 68-24170. Includes bibliography.* Contributions to economic geology, 1909, Part I, Metals and nonmetals except fuels--Copper, Geological Survey Bulletin No. 430-B (1910)* Reconnaissance of some gold and tin deposits of the southern Appalachians, with notes on the Dahlonega mines with Lindgren, Geological Survey Bulletin No. 293 (1906)* The ore deposits of New Mexico with Lindgren and C.H. Gordon, Geological Survey Professional Paper No. 68 (1910)External links* Memorial by CS Hurlbut Jr.
8303082
Attack_of_the_Hideous_Space-Varmints
Attack of the Hideous Space-Varmints or Attack of the Hideous Space Monsters is a 1997 Duck story by Rosa.PlotMcDuck receives a shipment of space junk from his satellite business. The junk turns out to be an artificial meteorite-shaped probe containing an unknown device of alien origin. His curiosity piqued, Scrooge activates the device. This causes the whole Bin to shake, so Scrooge, Donald and the nephews hastily evacuate the building.Once outside, the ducks find that the whole Money Bin has started moving and takes off into the sky. Not wanting to lose his money, Scrooge goes after it in his secret rocket, taking Donald and the boys with him. The device controlling the Money Bins flight takes the bin into speed, which takes both it and the ducks rocket to the belt.In the asteroid belt, Scrooge finds that a group of four aliens has laid claim on his Money Bin and are converting it into their new house. Scrooge, Donald and the boys go after them to stop their plans. When the ducks and the aliens meet, it turns out that the aliens are the equivalent of a simple, peaceful farmer family. Scrooge befriends the familys aging grandfather, who has had quite a career in asteroid mining in his younger days.Together with the alien grandfather, Scrooge has such fun reliving his younger days in the Yukon that he is torn between two choices - go back to Earth with family and friends or stay in space and have the adventure of his life. This dilemma is cut abruptly short when an alien police patrol appears, having come after the unlicensed warp speed device that was the root cause of the whole adventure. The police are decidedly unfriendly to ugly, evil aliens such as the ducks, so the ducks take the warp speed device back into the Money Bin and flee back to Earth.External links*abominables monstres de lespace attaquent
8320657
Network_Aviation
Network Aviation is an airline based at Airport, operating charter services in support of fly-out mining operations throughout Western Australia. In partnership with subsidiary engineering provider Network Turbine Solutions, Network Aviation operates over 50 flights a week on behalf of mining companies to facilitate crew changes at remote sites.()(CASA web site link to Network Aviation Air Operator Certificate retrieved 2009-01-30. ) History After assisting to establish Aviation, Lindsay Evans founded Network in 1998. Originally operating a mix of smaller aircraft types such as 441 Conquests, 310s and Super King Airs, in partnership with key clients Network grew into larger types and commenced operating Embraer Brasilias in 2000 and 100s in 2008(>).In February 2011, Network Aviation was purchased by Qantas Airways and became a wholly owned subsidiary of Qantas.(Qantas Media Release, 13 December 2010, http://www.qantas.com.au/regions/dyn/au/publicaffairs/details?ArticleID2010/dec10/5055) Network retains its current management, employees and operating structure, with the business to be aligned with Qantas operations, standards and processes. With the purchase, Qantas stated it is looking at significantly growing Networks fleet and operations.()In February 2011 Qantas announced that it was purchasing 10 second hand Fokker 100 aircraft for its Network Aviation operation. Destinations Image:E120NHZ.JPG|thumb|Network EMB-120ER with weight-saving polished aluminium liveryImage:NAAflightline.JPG|thumb|Network Aviation Flightline with a 100 in the foregroundNetwork Aviation operates regular fly-in fly-out services to fixed schedules from Perth Airport to the following destinations in Western Australia:(Network Aviation website home page, listing the scheduled arrival and departure times. Retrieved: 30 September 2010.)*Bellevue Gold Mine - Northern Goldfields*Gold Mine - Mid West Region*Gold Mine - Desert*Cue - Mid West Region*Cloudbreak - Pilbara Region*Duketon Gold Mine - Northern Goldfields*Leinster - Northern Goldfields*Leonora - Northern Goldfields*Morawa - Mid West Region*Mount Hale Ore Project - Murchison Region*Nifty Copper Mine - Pilbara Region*Sinclair Nickel Mine - Northern Goldfields *Wyloo Station - Gascoyne Region*Woodie Woodie Manganese Mine - Eastern Pilbara Fleet As of August 2011 the Network Aviation fleet includes the following aircraft:(Australian civil aircraft register search using Network Aviation as the search parameter. Search conducted 10 August 2011.)*7  EMB 120 Brasilia*3  100 - plus 10 on order.(http://www.qantas.com.au/regions/dyn/au/publicaffairs/details?ArticleID2011/feb11/5081)One of the three Fokker 100s is a non-flying source of spares. External links *Network Aviation References 
8332899
Whim_Creek,_Western_Australia
thumb|200px|left|The iconic Whim Creek Pub, c. 2007Whim Creek is a small town in Australia. Originally a post office known as Whim Well, Whim Creek is on the West Coastal Highway midway between Karratha and Port Hedland.  It is  north of Perth and a stopover point for travellers to Broome. Whim Creek Hotel The Whim Creek Hotel is a famous landmark midway between Karratha and Port Hedland, and is renowned as a rest stop, hotel and drinking establishment for the better part of the 20th century. The original Whim Creek Hotel was a tin-roofed structure which was blown down in a cyclone in the 1890s. The hotel was resurrected, and has been blown down twice since; in the mid-20th century and in the 1990s. The current Whim Creek Hotel was erected in the early 20th century. The original building frame, made of steel, was originally intended to be the frame for the Bar Courthouse. The frame and materials were landed at the Balla Balla Creek jetty, ready for transport inland to Marble Bar, but the effort was stranded by a large cyclone. The building was erected at its current site on the banks of Whim Creek, where the steel frame has stood ever since. The wooden facade has, however, been blown off twice.  Colourful history Whim Creek was renowned for its alcoholic camel which used to drink patrons beers before being relocated to Wiluna, suffering from cirrhosis of the liver, and a large python which used to live within the rafters above the bar. Three brothers from the local Aboriginal community are commemorated for their war service via a mall memorial in the car park. They died in 1943 in the Papuan Campaign of War II.  History of Mining thumb|200px|left|Old headframe for historic underground workings, Whim Creek MineCopper was discovered several kilometres west of the town in 1872 and gold 20 km north in 1887.  Copper has been mined on and off at Whim Creek over a period of 120 years. Copper was mined initially via a series of small adits and stopes into the Whim Creek and Mons Cupri deposits by artisanal miners, with records indicating that as early as 1882 small quantities of malachite, azurite, chrysocolla and other copper minerals were being won.  Copper was shipped via a small port on the coast at the nearby town of Balla Balla.  A single track narrow-gauge railway ran from Whim Creek to Balla Balla.  At its peak, the town supported two hotels, a blacksmith, a police station and a horse track.In the early 1900s a second period of mining began, with around 60,000 tonnes of copper concentrate produced mainly from the Whim Creek Mine.  In the 1960s Japanese interests undertook a resource drilling program, with diamond core drilling, and built a small oxide mining operation.  This shut down in the early 1970s. The leases passed to Whim Creek Copper Limited, but the company found profit elsewhere, and the mining leases were passed through several owners until the mid-1990s when Straits Resources Limited took over the tenure. Mining Today Whim Creek Hotel currently serves as an accommodation village for the mine workers who work at the Whim Creek Copper Mine. Around 150 to 180 men and women live in demountable units (dongers), and share messing facilities at the Whim Creek Hotel. Several other mining and exploration camps located nearby also use the hotel and messing facilities, as few other facilities exist.The Blackrock StakesThe Blackrock Stakes is a 122km race from Whim Creek to Hedland in which competitors, either in teams or as individuals, push a wheel barrows weighed down with ore. Like most good ideas, it was born over a few beers at a bar, in 1971 and what developed has raised more than $1 million for charity and caused grown men, women and children to lump a wheelbarrow full of iron ore from a remote mine site and into Hedland(ABC Blackrock States broadcast.).Teams of 10, trios, duos and lone runners now push modified wheelbarrows containing 11 kgs of iron ore over the distance. References * Straits Resources
8358216
Prentice_Mulford
Prentice Mulford (18341891) was a noted literary humorist and California author.  In addition, he helped found the Thought movement. Biography Mulford was born in Harbor, New York and, in 1856, sailed to California where he would spend the next 16 years. During this time, Mulford spent several years in mining towns, trying to find his fortune in gold, copper, or silver. After leaving the mining life, Mulford ran for a position on the State Assembly in Sacramento. Although he was nominated, he ultimately lost the election. He returned to Francisco and began writing for a weekly newspaper, Golden Era. Mulford spent five years as a writer and editor for various papers and was named by many San Franciscans a Bohemian, for his disregard for money. Mulford states in his autobiography, poverty argued for us possession of more brains (Prentice Mulfords Story 130). He became known for his humorous style of writing and vivid descriptions of both mining life as well as life at sea. In 1872, Mulford returned to York City, where he became known as a comic lecturer, author of poems and essays, and a columnist for The New York Graphic from 1875-1881. Mulford was also instrumental in the founding of the popular philosophy, Thought, along with other notable writers including Waldo Emerson.  Mulfords book, Thoughts are Things served as a guide to this new belief system and is still popular today. Partial works *Thoughts Are Things (1889)*Your Forces and How to Use Them (1907)*The Gift of Understanding*Gift of Spirit (1917 2nd revised ed.)*Thought Forces Essays Selected from the White Cross Library (1913)*Prentice Mulfords Story: Life By Land and Sea (1889)* Gift Of The Spirit { 1904 } 1st edition- with a introduction by Arthor Edward Waite External links * Library of Congress page on Mulford* California Legacy Radio Anthology  - provides access to radio scripts containing excerpts from Prentice Mulfords Story* New Thought Movement homepage* 1905 Magazine Article with photos* Index of Prentice Mulford humorous stories presented on the Mister Rons Basement Podcast* 3 short radio episodes Canned Oysters from California Culinary Experiences, 1869; Piquant Sauce and Spelling from The Prentice Mulford Story, or Life by Land and Sea, 1889. Legacy Project.MulfordMulfordMulfordMulfordMulfordzh:
8369750
Standburn
Standburn is a small village which lies within the Falkirk council area in central Scotland. It is located  south-west of Maddiston,  north-east of Avonbridge and  south east of Falkirk. The entire village is located along a section of the B825 road between Avonbridge and Loan.thumb|left|220px|altA road which runs through Standburn|The village of StandburnThe Kingdom Census 2001 reported the population as 149 residents, a figure almost unchanged from the census of 1991Drumbowie Environment Action Group is a charitable organisation which owns Drumbowie Park to the north of Standburn, this community woodland is open to the public.Standburn was a mining community with several active pits until the 1950s. The pits were individually numbered and all prefixed by Gateside. The bings from the mining days can still be seen although the land has now been planted with trees and named Gateside Woodland.See also*of places in Falkirk council areaReferencesExternal Links*Drumbowie Environment Action Groupgd:Standburn
8376124
List_of_Star_Trek_planets_(RS)
R Rachelis - Enterprise-D transports plasma plague samples to the Rachelis system.(TNG: The Child) Rahm-Izad - Planet Captain Picard says holds the last missing DNA fragment to throw off the Cardassians in their hunt for the genetic secret of the origin of humanoids species.(Voy: Year of Hell)Rakal - Planet in Cardassian space with a secret underground base located on its fourth moon.(DS9: to Grace)Rakella Prime - Homeworld of the Voksha species.(Voy: and Demons)Rakhar - Planet where Odo transports a Rakhari prisoner.(DS9: Vortex)Rakosa V - Delta Quadrant planet, home of the Rakosian species. The planet was mistaken by the Cardassian Dreadnought missile as the planet Aschelan V. The missile was destroyed by the USS Voyager before it could impact the planet where it would have killed over 2 million inhabitants.(Voy: Dreadnought)Ramatis III - Home of the deaf-mute negotiator Rivas.(TNG: as a Whisper)Ram Izad homeworld - see Rahm-Izad.Ramura - Homeworld of the Ramurian species.(Voy: Unforgettable)Rana IV - Also called Delta Rana, Rana IV is planet with three moons whose Federation colony was wiped out by the Husnock species.(TNG episode The Survivors) Note: It is unspecified whether the planet orbits the star Rana (aka Eridani).Ranza V - Planet mentioned for its frozen drink called Darmok.(TNG: Darmok) Regula - A once lifeless planetoid until Federation scientists used it as a testing ground for the Genesis experiments.(Trek II: The Wrath of Khan)Regulak IV - Cardassian planet destroyed by Dominion forces.(DS9: Dogs of War)Regulus - Star system with three inhabited planets, Regulus III, IV and V. Regulus III has Starfleet Academy facilities.(DS9 Fascination) Regulus V is the home of giant Eel Birds that return after 11 years to the cavern where they hatched to mate.(TOS: Time)Reina VI(TNG: Pen Pals)Rekag-Seronia - The Enterprise-D takes a mediator to this planet that is home world to both the Rekag and Seronian people.(TNG: Man of the People)Relva VII - a Mars-like planet (possibly Class K) with a Federation base on the surface. Starfleet Academy also has a campus here which Wesley Crusher tried to gain acceptance into.(TNG: Coming of Age)Remmil VI - Planet whose natives spin a crystalline webbing and use it as a building material. In 2371, Odos criminal report speaks of a group of Nausicaan thieves break into a museum there.(DS9: Heart of Stone)Remus - The tide-locked companion of Romulus and home of the Reman species who have been enslaved by the Romulans.(Trek Nemesis)Rhadarus - Former Klingon controlled planet, annexed by neighboring alien culture who later abandons it.(Ent: Judgement)Rhaandaran - Homeworld of the Rhaandarite species.(Trek: The Motion Picture)Rhymus Major - Planet of which various locales were simulated by Quarks first holosuite programs.(DS9: Profit and Loss)Rigel II(TOS: Shore Leave)Rigel III(TNG: Good Things...)Rigel IV - Homeworld of Mr. Hengist, the Chief City Administrator at Argelius II, and also of the mass murderer of women known as Boratis.(TOS: Wolf in the Fold) Lwaxana Troi mentions that an astronomer from Rigel IV once named a star after her.(TNG: Half a Life) Mentioned as the site of a Trill-operated refinery.(DS9: Prodigal Daughter)Rigel V(TOS: to Babel)Rigel VI - Location of Starbase 134.Rigel VII - Located in the Beta Orionis A system. The planet was visited by the USS Enterprise before the events in The Cage. A conflict between the landing party, under Capt. Christopher Pikes command, and the Kaylar killed three crewmembers, including the captains yeoman, and severely injured seven others.(TOS: The Cage) The matte painting of the Rigel VII fortress seen in Pikes Talosian illusion was later re-used as Flints home in for Methuselah. Note: The true Rigel star is not in this system.Rigel X(Ent: Broken Bow)Rigel XII - The location of a dilithium mining colony where the conman Harcourt Fenton Mudd strikes a deal with the lonely miners to trade his women for dilithium.(TOS: Women)Rinax - formerly populated moon of Talax and home of Neelix. All life was destroyed by the Haakonian Metreon Cascade invented by Dr. Jetrel.(Voy: Jetrel)Risa - Also called Epsilon Ceti B II, located about 88.2 http://memory-beta.wikia.com/wiki/Risa light-years from Earth, known for its beauty and relaxing tropical atmosphere. It is a world commonly sought by interstellar vacationers and starship crews on shore leave.(TNG: The Game)(Ent: Days and Two Nights)(Ent: Hero) The planet orbits several stars and its climate is controlled by a weather modification network, with the natural climate being extremely violent. Risians are extremely open and will freely share their planet, and even themselves, with vacationers; a practice known as Jamaharon.(TNG: Holiday) Perhaps uncoincidentally, the name given to the fun-loving planet is also the Spanish word for laughter, and phonetically similar to the German word Reise, which translates as travel or trip.Rivos V - Delta Quadrant planet known for its Zoth-Nut soup.(Voy: Think Tank)Rochanie III - Planet visited by Cmdr. Benjamin Sisko and Curzon Dax who were cornered by hostile aliens on the surface.(DS9: Dramatis Personae)Romulus - The home planet of the Romulan people and the capital world of the Romulan Star Empire. Romulus shares its orbit with a binary companion Remus.(Ronara Prime - Planet in the Cardassian DMZ. Ensign Ro Laren was sent on a covert mission to infiltrate Maquis rebel cell hiding there.(TNG: Preemptive Strike)Rondac III - Planet within Cardassian space used by the Dominion as a cloning facility.(DS9: Changing Face of Evil)(DS9: When it Rains...)Rousseau V - Planet with an unusual asteroid ring that sparkles with colored energy bursts which likewise creates music-like tones in the planets atmosphere. Wesley Crusher shows a holodeck simulation of the rings to Salia.(TNG: Dauphin)Ruah IV - One of the planets visited by Dr. Galen in his search for DNA clues to the origin of humanoid races.(TNG: The Chase)Rubicun III - A utopian planet visited by the USS Enterprise-D whose inhabitants, the Edo, are watched over by powerful dimensional entities they worship as their god.(TNG: Justice)Runara IV - Planet with a Kazon colony. A member of a rival Kazon set planned to attack the colony by hijacking the USS Voyager.(Voy: Basics, Part I)Rura Penthe - A frozen Klingon controlled planet which contained a penal colony, known for its harsh conditions and dilithium mines. Captain Jonathan Archer (along with his attorney Kolos) were sentenced by a Klingon tribunal to work in the planets dilithium mines for the rest of Archers life and for one year, respectively, until Archer was rescued by his crew.( Captain Kirk and Dr. McCoy were imprisoned there after their sentencing for the murder of Klingon Chancellor Gorkon.(Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country) The planet is named after a Siberian penal colony in and Peace.(http://ditl.org/index.php?daymain/pagfilm.php?ST-TUC) It is also the name of the penal colony that Nemo and his crew escaped from and avenged in the 1954 double Oscar winning film Leagues Under the Sea (1954 film).Rutia IV - Non-affiliated homeworld of the Rutian and Ansata species located in Federation space. In 2366 the Enterprise-D drops off medical supplies there.(TNG: The High Ground)S Sakari homeworld - Delta quadrant planet, fourth from its unnamed sun, visited by Voyager. It is inhabited by the secretive Sakari people who went underground to avoid detection by the Borg.(Voy: Blood Fever)Sakura Prime - Planet under the control of the dictator Sural, known for beheading his rivals as well as his own parents.(Saltok IV - Former Federation colony world annexed into the Cardassian DMZ where colonists battled with Cardassian forces.(DS9: Maquis)Salva II - Federation colony annexed to the Cardassian DMZ.(DS9: the Uniform)Samrins Planet - Planet where Lt. Worf and his former love interest KEhleyr first met each other in 2359.(TNG: Emissary) Sarona VIII - Recreational planet.(TNG: Well Always Have Paris)Sarpeidon - Also known as Beta Naiobi I, this class M planet was visited by the USS Enterprise in 2269 hours before its star Beta Naiobi went supernova. The Enterprise crew discovered the natives of the world had escaped their fate by time travelling to their worlds past.(TOS: All Our Yesterdays)Sarpedion V - Heavily fortified headquarters planet of the Cardassian Twelfth Order military division. (It is not in the same system as Sarpeidon as that system was destroyed in 2269).(DS9: Into the Wind)Sarthong V - Homeworld of the Sarthongians, and rich in archeological ruins that Vash considered exploring after parting ways with Picard.( Vash returns from the world with Q.(TNG: Qpid)Saturn - Sol VI. The Borg Cube passed Saturn on its way to Earth.(TNG: The Best of Both Worlds)Sauria - Homeworld of the Saurian species.( They are known for their popular Saurian brandy served in a characteristic curved bottle. Capt. Picard says that he once traded a bottle of very old Saurian brandy for a rare Gorlan prayer stick.(TNG: Bloodlines)Scalos - A strange planet outside Federation territory that was visited by the USS Enterprise NCC-1701. The Scalosian inhabitants have a hyper-accelerated physical existence and move at a faster rate of time.(TOS: Wink of an Eye)Secarus IV - Planet where the infamous criminal known only as The Albino, responsible for attacks against the Klingons, resides in a private fortress.(DS9: Blood Oath) Sefalla Prime - Planet near Draylon II.(DS9: Sanctuary) Selay - One of two inhabited planets in the Beta Renner system. It is home of the cobra-headed Selay species who were at war with their sister planet Antica. Both worlds wished to join the Federation. The Enterprise-D transported delegates to difficult peace negotiations on Parliament.(TNG: Among Us)Selek IV - Delta Quadrant planet, site of a gambling tournament.(Voy: Critical Care) Selenia Prime - Delta Quadrant planet mentioned to have a militaristic humanoid race that waged a brutal war with neighboring species.(Voy: Warhead) Tom Paris and Neelix meet con artists posing as clerics from the planet.(Voy: Live Fast and Prosper)Sentinel Minor IV - Destination of the USS Lalo which was destroyed enroute by a Borg cube headed for Sector 001.(TNG: The Best of Both Worlds, Part I)Septimis Minor - Destination of the colony ship SS Artemis which disappeared, eventually landing on Tau Cygna V.(TNG: Ensigns of Command)Septimus III - Planet that was headquarters of the Cardassian Eleventh Order military division. During the Dominon War, it was attacked and conquered by the Klingons.  The five-hundred thousand Cardassians of the Eleventh Order were all wiped out.(DS9: Strange Bedfellows) Seros - Delta Quadrant homeworld of the advanced Serosian species who use pseudo-solid holographic generated servants called isomorphs and treat them as slave labor. One is driven insane and murders the crew of a Serosian ship.(Voy: Revulsion)Setlik III - Federation colony near Cardassian space that was attacked around 2347 by the Cardassians in an event that became known as The Setlik Massacre. Miles OBrien was part of the Federation task force who battled the Cardassian invaders.(TNG: The Wounded)(DS9: Paradise)(DS9: Tribunal)(DS9: Nor) Sha Ka Ree - The Vulcan name for a mythological planet that was the alleged source of all creation. It is also known as QuiTu by the Klingons, Vorta Vor by the Romulans, or Eden by people of Earth. Sha Ka Ree was believed by Spocks older half-brother Sybok to be located at the center of the galaxy, hidden behind the Great Barrier energy field. According to legend, the planet was where God resided. Instead, it was discovered that the world, which had a barren, unviable surface ecology, was actually a prison for a dangerous entity.(Trek V: The Final Frontier) Note: Its name is supposedly derived from the actor after whom Sybok was modeled: Connery.Shantil III - Planet used in a Tamarian mythological tale about the characters Darmok and Jalad who faced off against a common enemy on an island called Tanagra.(  Shermans Planet - An agricultural world near the Neutral Zone that is contested between the Klingons and the Federation.(TOS: Trouble With Tribbles)(Trek: The Animated Series: More Tribbles, More Trouble (1973))Sheva II - Location of a JemHadar breeding facility.(DS9: More Unto the Breach)Shiralea VI - A beautiful world inhabited by the Parallax Colony, a group of free-spirits concerned only with love and pleasure. Lwaxana Troi introduced Worfs son Alexander to a holodeck simulation of a Parallax mudbath and to experience their Laughing Hour.(TNG: Cost of Living)   Sigma Draconis - A star system with three inhabited worlds, those being the 3rd, 4th, and 6th planets respectively. Each is populated by different technologically primitive culture, however Sigma Draconis VI was visited by the USS Enterprise where Captain Kirk chases down aliens who have stolen Spocks brain.(TOS: Brain)Sigma Erani - Star system, according to the trader Kivas Fajo, it is the only known source of hytritium.(TNG: Most Toys)Sigma Iota II - The Iotians established a 1920s gangster society, the result of cultural contamination of a missing book from the USS Horizon.(TOS: A Piece of the Action)Sikaris - Delta Quadrant homeworld of the Sikarian species. The planet has a thick quartz mantle used as an amplification device in the Sikarians advanced Spacial Trajector Transporter which the USS Voyager crew hoped could send them 40,000 light years closer to Federation space.(Voy: Prime Factors) Simperia - Cardassian planet where the Cardassian Liberation Front was headquartered, and also one of eighteen worlds destroyed by Breen and Dominon forces in 2375.(DS9: The Dogs of War) Sirrie IV - Kivas Fajo was in possession of a one-of-a-kind vase by artist Mark Off-Zel of Sirrie IV.(Skagaran colony - Planet in the Delphic Expanse settled by the humanoid Skagaran species. In the 19th Century, the aliens abducted a group of Human settlers from the north-western United States to use them as slave labor. Eventually the slaves had an uprising and overthrew their captors to become the dominant species of the planet.(Ent: North Star)  Sobras - Kazon planet where rival Kazon sects congregate for talks.(Voy: Alliances)(Voy: Maneuvers) Solais V - Home planet of the Solari, where two factions have been at war for fifteen centuries. In 2265, the Enterprise-D takes the deaf-mute mediator named Rivas there to lead a delicate peace negotiation.( When Sisko is promoted to Captain and wants to tell Kasidy Yates about it, he learns that she is hauling a load of duranium to Solais V.(DS9: The Adversary)Solarion IV - Site of a Bajoran terrorist raid.(TNG: Ensign Ro)Solosos III - Maquis colony in the Cardassian DMZ where Cmdr. Sisko forced the surrender of agents and their weapons.(DS9: For the Uniform) Sona Prime - Homeworld of the Sona species and capital world of the Sona Solidarity.(Trek: Insurrection)Sothis III - Planet mentioned by Prof. Galen whose inhabitants, the Satarran species, disdain mysteries.( The Satarrans waged a decades long war with a neighboring race, the Lysians.(TNG: Conundrum) Soukara - A Cardassian planet with thick jungles and the site of a Dominion base. In 2347, Worf and Jadzia Dax undergo a covert mission there to rescue a Cardassian defector who knew the fake identities of Founders hiding in the Alpha Quadrant.(DS9: Change of Heart)(DS9: the Pale Moonlight) Spica - Star system also known as Alpha Virginis. There is a Federation colony there which is known for its valuable Spican flame gems.( Stameris - A planet that in 2151 had active slave trade. The Ferengi pirates who hijacked the Enterprise NX-01 were planning to sell captured crew there.(Ent: Acquisition)Starbase 6 - Planetside Starbase facility. In 2268, the Enterprise-D drops off Kareen Brianon there for transport back to Earth. The name of the planet Starbase 6 was located on was not mentioned.(TNG: The Schizoid Man) On stardate 4307.1, Starbase 6 lost contact with the USS Intrepid and sent rescue coordinates to the USS Enterprise NCC-1701(TOS: The Immunity Syndrome) Starbase 11 - Planetside Starbase facility. The primary purpose of the station seems to be the handling of litigation matters. The name of the planet Starbase 11 was located on was never mentioned.(TOS: Court Martial)(TOS: The Menagerie, Part I) Note: From the matte painting backdrop used in The Menagerie, it appears the planet may be a moon of a ringed gas giant.Starbase 12 - Planetside Starbase facility in the Haven system. The USS Dauntless and USS Sovereign use it as a base of operations in their investigation of the Vesuvi event.(TNG: Trek: Bridge Commander)Starbase 73 - Planetside Starbase facility. In 2365, the Enterprise-D stops at the base along route to the Endicor system. Riker bought some Owon eggs here.(TNG: Time Squared) In 2366, the Enterprise goes there again to investigate a distress call from the Ficus Sector.(TNG: Up the Long Ladder) The name of the planet Starbase 73 was located on was never mentioned.Starbase 123 - Two Romulan cruisers are detected by Starbase 123 on the way to the Beta Stromgren system to secure Tin Man.(TNG: Tin Man)Starbase 133 - Destination of the Enterprise after it leaves the Rana system at the end of TNG episode The Survivors. Also the location of the static warp bubble trapping Dr. Beverly Crusher in the TNG episode Remember Me.Starbase 152 - Enterprises destination at end of the episode Tin Man.(Starbase 153 - The Enterprise transports an emissary (KEhleyr, Worfs former mate) from Starbase 153 to the Boradis system.(Starbase 234 - Planetside Starbase facility located near Romulan space. It has orbital drydock stations. The name of the planet Starbase 234 was located on was never mentioned.(TNG: Redemption, Part II) Capt. Picard goes there to investigate the disappearance of Ambassador Spock.(TNG: Unification, Part I)Starbase 515 - Planetside Starbase with extensive medical facilities. In 2365, Capt. Picard went there to undergo a cardiac replacement. The name of the planet Starbase 515 was located on was never mentioned.(TNG: Snare)Starbase Earhart - Federation Starbase. Location of the Bonestell Recreation Facility where young Ensign Picard picked a fight with a group of Nausicaans, one of which stabbed him through the heart.(TNG: Tapestry) Recalling the incident, Picard refers to the station as Farspace Starbase Earhart.( The station was probably named in honor of Earhart.Starbase Montgomery - Planetside Federation Starbase. The Enterprise-D went there for an inspection of the warp core after a series of system failures.(TNG: Icarus Factor)Star Station India - Destination of the Enterprise-D after it left the Darwin Genetic Research Station on Gagarin IV.(TNG: Unnatural Selection)Straleb - Planet whose inhabitants, along with the people of Altec, makes up the Coalition of Madena. A political leader of Altec had issues with the rogue freighter captain Okona.(TNG: Outrageous Okona)Styris IV - a Federation colony needing a rare vaccine from Ligon II.(TNG: Code of Honor)Suliban homeworld - a planet in sector 3641, home of the Suliban people. The name of the planet is not mentioned.(Sulvin IV - Planet where Captain Picard was invited to by his associate Dr. Langford to assist in an archeological dig.(TNG: Rascals)Sumiko IV - Site of the Cliffs of Heaven in a holodeck program.(TNG: Conundrum) Surata IV - Uninhabited planet where Commander Riker was poked by a poison thorn and later falls comatose from the infection.(TNG: Shades of Gray)ReferencesSee alsoList of Star Trek planets:  A-BC-FG-LM-QT-Zfr:RisaPenthehu:Risaja:
8382354
Shire_of_McKinlay
WintonThe Shire of McKinlay is a Local Government Area located in north western Queensland, Australia.It covers an area of , and has existed as a local government entity since 1891. The shire economy is based around beef production and mining.  Billiton operate the Cannington mine in the shire, extracting silver and lead. History The Mackinlay Division was created on 9 December 1891 out of parts of Boulia and Cloncurry, and was subject to the Divisional Boards Act 1887. With the passage of the Local Authorities Act 1902, Mackinlay became a shire on 31 March 1903. On 24 July 1930, it was abolished and a new Shire of McKinlay was formed from parts of Cloncurry, Mackinlay, Winton and Wyangarie (Richmond). Towns and localities * Julia Creek* Cannington* Kynuna* McKinlayPopulationReferencesde McKinlayzh:
8392997
John_I._Beggs
 website   John Irvin Beggs (September 17, 1847 &ndash; October 17, 1925) was an American entrepreneur, industrialist and financier associated closely with the electric utility boom under Edison. He was also associated with Milwaukee, Louis, Missouri and other regional rail and interurban trolley systems. Beggs is also known for developing modern depreciation techniques for business accounting and for being one of the early directors of what became Electric. Youth John Irvin Beggs was born in Philadelphia on September 17, 1847, the son of James and Mary Irvin Beggs.  Both of his parents were of descent but had emigrated to the United States from Ireland.His early life was spent around Philadelphia. After his father died when he was seven years old, Beggs worked to support of his mother in a brickyard, as a cattleman, and butcher. Education As a young man Beggs taught accounting and handwriting in the Bryant & Stratton Business College in Philadelphia. He went to Pennsylvania at the age of 21 to work for Mitchell & Haggerty Coal Company as an accountant.  He then worked selling real estate and fire insurance in Harrisburg.  Beggs joined the Masonic fraternities at Harrisburg and maintained his membership in them until his death. Electric light industry When the electric light industry was in its infancy, Beggs assisted organization of the Electric Light Co. He built and managed its plant  which was the first commercially successful electric light plant in the United States.  Beggs interest in electric lighting arose because he was head of the building committee of Grace Methodist Episcopal Church.  He was married in Harrisburg to Sue Elizabeth Charles, who died  March 14, 1902.  They had one child, Mary Grace Beggs.On account of his success in Harrisburg as an electric plant manager, he was called by Morgan to York in 1887 as manager of the Electric Illuminating Co. of that city.  He remained in New York for about five years during which time he built the Street Station and 26th Street Station.  Pearl Street provided electricity for the first time to Streets stockbrokers.  He worked closely with A. Edison and consequently became one of that small group known as Pioneers.  Beggs was one of the Illuminating Company Directors at the meeting when Ford first met Edison and presented his idea for the automobile. Career From New York he went to Chicago as Western Manager of  Edison Company where he remained until the Edison Company was merged with the Electric Company to form what is now the General Electric Company.The American Company, which had just been organized, had acquired an electric lighting interest in Ohio and Beggs went to Cincinnati in charge of these interests.  The North American Company shortly afterward acquired the electric railway and lighting companies in Wisconsin, and for several years, Beggs divided his time between these cities.  In 1897, the Cincinnati interests were sold and Beggs moved to Milwaukee to devote his time to the utilities there.In 1903, The North American Company began to acquire electric lighting interests in Louis, Missouri.  Beggs first visited St. Louis as an advisor, and then began to divide his time between the two cities.  At one time, Beggs was president of the St. Louis electric lighting company, the gas company, and the street railway company, as well as president and general manager of the Electric Railway and Light Company.While Beggs was President of the Milwaukee Companies he built the Public Service Building in Milwaukee. His funeral services were conducted in its auditorium by the Mutual Benefit Association.  He also constructed the systems of railways radiating from Milwaukee.By 1911 Beggs had acquired a controlling interest in the Louis Car Company. He resigned from the Milwaukee companies and moved to St. Louis.  He still maintained many business connections in Milwaukee and spent time there, although his residence was in St. Louis. Beggs IsleIn the spring of 1911, Beggs purchased and named Beggs Isle in Lac La Belle at ( Retrieved January 13, 2011.) near Wisconsin.  He developed it into a summer residence for himself and his daughters family.  Beggs turned this island into a botanical garden bringing in exotic plants. Egyptian papyrus plants were trained to last through the long Wisconsin winters.  Beggs would purchase large commercial grade fireworks for their of July celebrations.()In 1915, he invested in water power in northern Wisconsin and began to spend more time in that state, although still residing in St. Louis.  In 1920 he was again elected president of the Milwaukee Electric Railway and Light Co., which position he still held at the time of his death.Beggs was a member of the Executive Committee of the North American Company.  He also devoted much time to the First Wisconsin National Bank in which he invested.  During his last decade he directed the construction of the second largest paper mill in the country; engineered the reorganization of the J. I. Case Plow Company, arranged to finance a hotel in City, New Jersey. and conducted a large Florida real estate transaction.() Director and Officer At the time of his death, Beggs was an active director or officer of 53 companies, including:# North American Edison Company, Director (Now General Electric)# The North American Company, Director, Member of Executive Committee# Electric Railway and Light Company, Director, President, Member of Executive Committees# Wisconsin Gas & Electric Company, Director, Vice-President# Briggs & Stratton Corporation, Director, Chairman Executive Committee# Louis Car Company, Director, Chairman of Board# J. I. Case Plow Works Company, Inc., Director# Improvement Company, Director, President# First Wisconsin National Bank, Milwaukee, Director, Member of Executive and Finance Committees# Wisconsin Company, Milwaukee, Director# & Sixth National Bank, Milwaukee, Director, Member of Executive and Finance Committees# National Bank in St. Louis, Director# Northern Railway Company, Director, President# Traction, Light, Heat & Power Company, Director, President# Power Company, Director# American Utilities Investment Corporation, Director# Kentucky Coal Company, Director# Railways Company of St. Louis, Director# Securities Company, Director, Member of Executive Committee# Public Service Corporation, Director# & Marinette Light & Traction Company, Director# Railway, Light & Power Company, Director# & Sea Investment Company, Baltimore, Director# Transport Company, Baltimore, Director# Power, Light & Heat Company, Director# River Power Company (Hydro-Electric), Director# Wisconsin Power Company (Hydro-Electric), Director# Casualty & Surety Company, Director, Member of Executive and Finance Committees# The Newport Company, Director# Milwaukee Coke & Gas Company, Director# Electric Company, Director, President# Real Estate Company, Director, President# Real Estate Development Corporation, Director, President# & Sixth Building, Inc., Director, President# Utilities Securities Corporation, Director, President, Treasurer# Oil, Gas & Refining Company, Director# Oil Producing Company, Director# & King Coal Company, Director, President# Mining Company, Director# Granite Company, Director, President# Manufacturing Company, Director# Coast Development Company (Florida), Director, President# Pulp & Paper Company (Bastrop, LA.), Director, President# Refrigerating Company, Director# & Northwestern Ry. Company, (Prescott, Ark.), Vice-President# Railroad Company (Clarksville, Ark.), President# Apartment Hotel Company (Atlantic City), President Legacy He died in Milwaukee on October 17, 1925 at the age of 78.  He was buried in Pennsylvania.Edison and Beggs remained friends throughout their lifetimes.  On Beggs 75th Birthday Celebration on Beggs Isle, Edison presented Beggs with a large grandfather clock and a signed photograph addressed To my hustler friend,  (signed) Thomas A. Edison.At the time of his death, Beggs was reported to be the wealthiest man in Wisconsin, with an estimated net worth of over $20M.  He passed this fortune to his grandchildren: * Grandson Robert Paxton McCulloch (19111977), was responsible for McCulloch Chainsaws, the Paxton Supercharger, founding Havasu City, Arizona and moving the London Bridge to Arizona.(  He married Barbra Ann Briggs, whose father was Foster Briggs of and Stratton.* Granddaughter  Sue McCulloch, Suzie Linden (19131996), author of Suzies Story, was inducted into the Hall of Fame for founding in 1957, and operating for forty years, the Gables Croquet Club in Lake, New Jersey, the oldest continuously running club in the USA.()  Also, a founding member of the USCA.  In 1931, She first married Jones who went on to found Highlands in Aspen, Colorado.  Subsequent husbands were New York investment banker and attorney Lowell Oakes (father of judge L. Oakes), War II veteran Lister Knight, and Portland banker Cabel Linden.  * Grandson John Irvin Beggs McCulloch (19081983), became fluent in over 10 foreign languages.  After graduating from Yale, in 1933 he married Whips sister Elizabeth Ten Broeck Jones.  He became a foreign political analyst and a prolific writer of books and articles in many languages.  Later in his career he supported the Speaking Union pushing for the wider use of English.These three had another notable grandfather, Robert McCulloch (18411914) who was the only confederate officer to survive the Charge at the of Gettysburg.  Both grandfathers were active in Freemasonry. Filmography *  - 1986 documentary, directed by Louis Rugani.  Through the use of archival footage John I. Beggs stars in this look at the history and survival efforts of this small anachronistic Wisconsin trolley line since 1907, and an overview of its relationship to the surrounding area, the now-dissolved parent company which built it, and the vanished traction empire of which it was a small part. See also *Troy Electric Railroad*Pioneers References Further reading* * In Memoriam, John Irvin Beggs (1926), 49 pages, with Photo* Funerary Packet, Captain Robert McCulloch (1914), Includes biography and the speech of Robert McCulloch on his return visit to Gettysburg fifty years after the battleExternal links* Biographical sketch from Historical Society* 
8405813
James_E._Gill
James Edward Gill (1901  1980) was a scientist, teacher, explorer and mine developer. Along with R. James, Sr. he discovered the high-grade ore deposits of Quebec and Labrador. He is remembered for his important contributions in the fields of stratigraphy and Pleistocene geology.Gill was born in British Columbia. He started off attending the of British Columbia, but completed his B.Sc. in Mining Engineering in 1921 at University. He worked as a Mining Engineer for two years in British Columbia, before going on to University as a Proctor Fellow. In 1925, he obtained his PhD. Career  Gill began at the of Rochester as Assistant Professor in 1925. After three years he moved to Montreal to teach at McGill. While at McGill he introduced the Masters of Applied Science in Mineral Exploration program and established an analytical laboratory for the application of geochemistry to mineral exploration. Gill focused his studies on the structural geology of ore deposits. He formulated the concept of a structural province and used it to define the fundamental subdivisions of the Shield. He published over 50 technical papers.  He served as Managing Editor for the 24th International Geological Congress.Outside of academia, Gill discovered deposits, which became mines and expansions of producing mines. In 1929, Gill and Dr. William R. James Sr., an internationally-famous mining consultant, conducted one of the first major air-supported exploration projects. It resulted in the discovery of the high-grade iron ore deposits that led to the opening up of the iron wealth of Quebec and Labrador. Gill was instrumental in discovery of more than three gold mines in northwestern Quebec and served as consultant and advisor on several other successful gold mines. His field work identified coal on Island, clays in Pennsylvania, the Caribbean, America, the mineral resources of the Territories and Lake, Ontario.During War II Gill directed the development and opening of Canadas only chromite mine. In 1949, Gill was a founding member of the executive committee of the National Advisory Committee on Research in the Geological Sciences. Gill retired from McGill in 1969 as Emeritus Professor.Honours*1939, awarded the Memorial Medal by the Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and Petroleum*1943, awarded the Medal of the Institute of Canada*1957, awarded the G. Miller Medal by the Society of Canada*1967, awarded the Medal by the Geological Association of Canada*2003, inducted into the Mining Hall of Fame by the Canadian Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and PetroleumReferences* Canadian Mining Hall of Fame* Willet G. Miller Medal*  Prospectors and Developers Association of Canada* Canadian Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and Petroleum
8418879
Western_use_of_the_swastika_in_the_early_20th_century
thumb|right|600px|Postcard sent in June 1910The swastika (from Sanskrit svstika) is an equilateral cross with its arms bent at right angles, in either right-facing () form or its mirrored left-facing () form. Archaeological evidence of swastika-shaped ornaments dates from the Neolithic period and was first found in the Valley Civilization of the subcontinent. The swastika (gammadion, fylfot) symbol became a popular symbol of luck in the world in the early 20th century. Although the Party adopted the symbol in the 1920s, it continued in use in Western countries with its original meaning until the Nazi association became dominant in the 1930s. The term swastika is first attested in English in 1871, and first refers to the Nazi emblem in 1932. Background File:MatildeMoisant.jpg|thumb|180px|The aviatrix Moisant (1878-1964) wearing a swastika medallion in 1912. The symbol was popular as a good luck charm with early aviators. A swastika was also painted on the inside of the nosecone of the Spirit of St. Louis.The discovery of the Indo-European language group in the 1790s led to a great effort by archaeologists to link the pre-history of European peoples to the ancient Aryans (variously referring to the Indo-Iranians or the Proto-Indo-Europeans).Following his discovery of objects bearing the swastika in the ruins of Troy, Schliemann consulted two leading Sanskrit scholars of the day, Burnouf and Mller. Schliemann concluded that the Swastika was a specifically Indo-European symbol, and associated it with the ancient migrations of Proto-Indo-Europeans. He connected it with similar shapes found on ancient pots in Germany, and theorized that the swastika was a significant religious symbol of our remote ancestors, linking Germanic, Greek and Indo-Iranian cultures.(Schliemann, H, Troy and its remains, London: Murray, 1875, pp. 102, 119-20)(Sarah Boxer. One of the worlds great symbols strives for a comeback. New York Times, July 29, 2000.)  Later discoveries of the motif among the remains of the Hittites and of ancient Iran seemed to confirm this theory, but the symbol was also known for its use by indigenous American Indians as well as Eastern cultures.These discoveries, and the new popularity of the swastika symbol, led to a widespread desire to ascribe symbolic significance to every example of the motif. In Germanic countries examples of identical shapes in ancient European artifacts and in folk art were interpreted as emblems of good-luck linked by academics to the Indo-Iranian meaning. By the early 20th century it was widely used worldwide and was regarded as a symbol of good luck.The swastikas world wide use was well documented in a 1894 publication by the Smithsonian.(Wilson, Thomas Swastika the Earliest Known Symbol and its Migrations) The symbol appeared in many popular, non-political Western designs from the 1880s to the 1920s, with occasional use continuing into the 1930s.Western use of the motif, along with the religious and cultural meanings attached to it, was subverted in the early 20th century after it was adopted as the emblem of the Nazi Party (). This association occurred because Nazism stated that the historical Aryans were the forefathers of modern Germans and then proposed that, because of this, the subjugation of the world by Germany was desirable, and even predestined. The swastika was used as a conveniently geometrical and eye-catching symbol to emphasize the so-called Aryan-German correspondence and instill racial pride. Since War II, most Westerners have known the swastika as solely a Nazi symbol, leading to incorrect assumptions about its pre-Nazi use in the West and confusion about its sacred religious and historical status in other cultures.By countryArgentinaSeveral columns at the train station of Retiro in Aires are decorated with joint swastikas. The Retiro opened in 1915.AustraliaSydney has two notable buildings using the swastika as an architectural element. The 1920s-era Dymocks Building in George Street, Sydney includes a multi-level shopping arcade, the tiled floors of which incorporate numerous left-facing swastikas. A brass explanatory sign, probably dating to World War 2, is affixed to the wall near the elevator doors on each floor of the building, and refers to it as a fylfot, emphasising that its use in the building pre-dates any Nazi connotations or usage. In nearby Quay, the Customs House also has swastika tiles in the front entrance area dating from the same period, with a plaque to explain the symbols.(TimeOutSydney.com.au, Why does Customs House have Nazi swastikas on the floor?, December 26, 2007 - January 22, 2008.)Canada140px|thumb|73 Troy Street in Verdun, MontrealSwastika is the name of a small residential community in northern Ontario, Canada, approximately 580 kilometres north of Toronto, and 5 kilometres west of Lake, the town of which it is now part. The town of Swastika was founded in 1906. Gold was discovered nearby and the Swastika Mining Company was formed in 1908. The government of Ontario attempted to change the towns name during World War II, but the town resisted and many posted signs The hell with Hitler. We came up with our name first!. The Swastika United Church is located in Ontario, as is the Swastika Public School, Swastika Fire Hall and Swastika Laboratories, which provides  assaying services for the mining industry.  The town celebrated its 100th anniversary in June 2008.(Swastika 100th Anniversary, website.)In Windsor, Scotia, there was the Swastikas hockey team from 1905 to 1916, and their uniforms featured swastika symbols. There were also hockey teams named the Swastikas in Edmonton, Alberta (circa 1916), and the Swastikas in Fernie, Columbia (circa 1922).The Travellers Hotel in downtown British Columbia, has a faade decorated with brickwork swastikas. Further north on Island, the Japanese cemetery in Cumberland has several grave markers decorated with swastikas.A repeating pattern of swastikas appeared on a few Canadian postage stamps that were produced by commercial airlines from 1924-32.(Tony Brown, The Swastika on Canadian and Newfoundland Stamps, March 2003.)There used to be a swastika brick pattern located outside at the top of a house located at 75-81 Troy Street, in Verdun, a borough of Montreal, Quebec. A picture of this house appears on page 138 of Hlne-Andre Biziers Une Histoire du Qubec en photos (2006, ditions Fides).The swastika was also used as border art for the weekly pet health column in the Herald newspaper in the early years of the 20th Century.(Calgary Herald issues, 1914-1922)DenmarkIn the first part of the 20th century, the Danish brewery Carlsberg had a swastika as its logo.( )()  Today the swastika is still visible on one of the elephants by the brewerys gate. Finland In Finland the swastika was used as the official national marking of the Defence Forces between 1918 and 1945 and also of the Air Force, anti-aircraft troops as a part of the air force and tank troops at that time. The swastika was also used by the Svrd organisation, Finnish paramilitary organization for women, which was dissolved in 1944 according to the terms of the Armistice.The Finnish Airforce units still wear a swastika on their colours.(Finnish Airforce FAQ referenced on 17 November 2006.)(Puolustusvoimat: Ruotuvki -uutislehti) In addition, the shoulder insignia of the Airforce Headquarters bears a swastika design.(Kunniakas hakaristimme Virtualpilots.fi  Referenced on 17 November 2006.) In 1945 the Air Force changed its national emblem to a roundel but the use of swastika in some other insignia was continued. In 1958, the of Finland Kekkonen inaugurated the colours of the Air Force units which feature a swastika design. The latest colour of this pattern was inaugurated by president Halonen 25 October 2005 for the newly formed Air Force Academy.( Also the Jaeger Regiment, responsible for training special forces, bears a swastika - like emblem on its colour.The swastika has not disappeared in Finnish medals and decorations. The decorations of the of the Cross of Liberty, designed by Gallen-Kallela - he also designed the emblem of the Finnish Air Force and the Finnish flight mark in 1918 -, bears a swastika laid on a Georges Cross. The President of Finland uses a Cross of Liberty in the personal flag. However, in the flag is only the Cross of Liberty of 3rd Class and overall, the highest Finnish decoration is the Grand Cross of the White Rose with Collar.GermanyProto-nazi movements such as the Freikorps used the symbol as well. For example, the Bundesarchiv has photos from the Putsch labeled with the name of the Ehrhardt freikorp.IcelandThe Icelandic Steamship Company, Eimskip (founded in 1914) used a swastika in its logo.IndiaImage:Triseal crop A.jpg|thumb|250px|A seal from the Valley Civilization recovered at Dholavira in India. The second character from the right is a swastka.Image:IndusValleySeals swastikas.JPG|thumb|175px|Seals from the Valley Civilization preserved at the MuseumImage:swastika doorstep crop.jpg|thumb|175px|Swastika on the doorstep of an apartment in Maharashtra, IndiaThe Swastika is an extremely popular religious symbol in India, used as a good luck symbol. It is very common in modern day Indian culture, sometimes as a geometrical motif and sometimes as a religious symbol. It also remains widely used in Eastern/Dharmic religions such as Hinduism, Buddhism and Jainism.IrelandIn Dublin, Ireland, a laundry company known as the Laundry existed for many years in Dartry and Ballsbridge (both on the river Dodder) on the south side of the city. It was founded in 1888 as the Dublin Laundry Company.() Upon the outbreak of the Second World War in 1939, the companys customers were concerned about the companys name. Accordingly, it was changed to Swastika Laundry (1912) Ltd. The companys fleet of electric delivery vans were red, and featured a black swastika on a white background.(The business started in the early 20th century and continued up until recent times. The Laundrys tall chimneystack was emblazoned with a large white Swastika, a protected structure,() which was clearly visible from the surrounding streets. The name and logo eventually disappeared when the laundry was absorbed into the Spring Grove company.In his Irisches Tagebuch the future Nobel Laureate, Bll writes about a year spent living in the west of Ireland in the 1950s. While in Dublin before heading to Co. Mayo, hewas almost run over by a bright-red panel truck whose sole decoration was a big swastika.  Had someone sold Beobachter delivery trucks here, or did the Vlkischer Beobachter still have a branch office here? This one looked exactly like those I remembered; but the driver crossed himself as he smilingly signalled to me to proceed, and on closer inspection I saw what had happened. It was simply the Swastika Laundry, which had painted the year of its founding, 1912, clearly beneath the swastika; but the mere possibility that it might have been one of those others was enough to take my breath away.(Irish Journal translated by Leila Vennewitz (Abacus, London, 1983) pp.21-2)LatviaIn Latvia, too, the swastika (known as Fire Cross, , or Thunder Cross, ) was used as the marking of the Air Force between 1918 and 1934, as well as in insignias of some military units.(Dov Gutterman, Latvia: Aircraft Marking, June 20, 2004.) It was also used as a symbol by the Latvian fascist movement Prkonkrusts, as well as by other organizations.Latvian left-facing swastika or Thunder Cross dates back to Bronze Age. It is widely seen scratched on the surfaces like rocks, weapons and pottery as a protector sign. To avoid diplomatic embarrassment, Latvian officials were asked by NATO not to put swastikas on mittens and other gifts to delegates at a summit in the country in 2006.(Laura Sheeter No swastikas for Nato mittens BBC News)NorwayThe iron gate of Oslo lysverker from 1931, right beside the Institute in Oslo, is decorated with several swastikas.The iron balconies of the building facing Veiten in Bergen are also decorated with swastikas. One may think they date back from the war, as they face the old Gestapo headquarters in Bergen, but they are actually twenty years older.(Kjell Tjensvoll http://www.flickr.com/photos/tjensvoll/3597182327 Flickr Image)PolandImage:2PSP.jpg|thumb|240px|left|A military parade held in 1936 to commemorate the regimental feast of the 2nd Podhale Rifles Regiment; Sanok, Polandthumb|110px|right|The highlander cross was the sign of Polish 21st and 22nd Mountain Infantry DivisionsSince the early Ages the sign of the swastika was well established among all Slavic lands. Known as swarzyca, it was primarily associated with one of the Slavic gods named Svarog.Image:Denar rys mieszko1.png|thumb|150px|Swastiks on the Denarius of I of Poland, 970-992With time the association with Slavic gods faded, but the swastika was preserved both as a personal symbol of various personalities, such as the Coat of Arms, and in folk culture, for example, in the region of Podhale, where the swastika was used as a talisman well into the 20th century. As a solar symbol, it was painted or carved on various parts of houses in the Mountains and was thought to save the household from evil.Image:Herb Boreyko.jpg|thumb|right|110px|Coat of ArmsThe ancient symbol used by the Gral societies was adopted by the Polish mountain infantry units in the 1920s.thumb|Karlowiczs stone in the Tatra Mountains, 2006It was adopted as a regimental insignia by the artillery units of the 21st and 22nd Infantry Divisions, as well as by the soldiers of the 4th Legions Infantry, the 2nd and the  4th Podhale Rifles. A distinctive blue swastika was a background emblem of Air defence and Anti-gas League (19281939, LOPP), which had circa 1.5 million members in 1937.Outside of the military traditions, the mountaineers swastika also influenced a number of other symbols and logos used on Polish soil. Among such was the logo of the IGNIS publishing company (est. 1822), and the personal symbol of Karowicz, a notable composer and admirer of the Tatras. After his death in the mountains in 1909, the place of his death was marked by a memorial stone and a swastika http://www.idn.org.pl/medykon/tatry/pomnik.htm. Finally, it was also used as a personal logo and ex libris by Eljasz-Radzikowski of Coat of Arms, a Polish author who was also strongly influenced by the Polish mountaineers and had a swastika on the dust jackets of all his books and letters.Image:ASEA logo pre 1933.jpg|thumb|125px|right|ASEA logo used from the late nineteenth century until 1933RussiaThe Russian Provisional Government of 1917 printed a number of new bank notes with right-facing, diagonally rotated swastikas in their centres.(World Banknotes, Russia)SwedenIn a painting of the Norse god Thor fighting jotner, by the Swedish artist Eskil Winge from 1872, a swastika is clearly visible in his belt.The Swedish company ASEA, now a part of Brown Boveri, used the swastika in its logo from the 1890s to 1933, when it was removed from the logo.United KingdomGerman POW Christmas postcard.jpg|thumb|left| A Christmas greeting card issued to German POWs in the UK in 1918. Note the left facing symbol partially obscured by the helmeted head profileImage:Kipling swastika.png|frame|right|Logo from a 1911 edition of Kipling.The British author Kipling, who was strongly influenced by Indian culture, had a swastika as his personal moniker on the covers and flyleaves of many editions of his books until the rise of Nazism made this inappropriate.  One of Kiplings So Stories, The Crab That Played With The Sea, had an elaborate full-page illustration by Kipling including a stone bearing what was called a magic mark (a swastika); some later editions of the stories blotted out the mark, but not its captioned reference, leaving readers wondering what the mark was.During War I, the swastika was used as the emblem of the National War Savings Committee.(House of Commons Hansard Debates for 12 Jun 1996 (pt 41). Image)The swastika was also used as a symbol by the Boy Scouts in the United Kingdom, and worldwide. According to Johnny Walker,(C.R. Johnny Walker. The Fleur-de-lis and the Swastika. Johnny Walkers Scouting Milestones Pages. November 2003.) the earliest Scouting use was on the first Thanks Badge introduced in 1911. Robert Baden-Powells 1922 Medal of Merit design adds a swastika to the Scout fleur-de-lis as good luck to the person receiving the medal. Like Kipling, he would have come across this symbol in India. During 1934 many Scouters requested a change of design because of the use of the swastika by the Nazis. A new British Medal of Merit was issued in 1935.A bank in Bolton has refused to remove swastika mosaic tiles from the entry of a branch office constructed in 1927. A bank spokesperson replied to critics noting that At that time, these symbols were commonly used as architectural decoration.(Benjamin Joffe-Walt, The unfortunate Bolton swastika, Guardian Unlimited, April 27, 2006.)Located on the Crag, on the Northern edge of Moor in Yorkshire there is a swastika shaped pattern engraved in a stone, known as the Stone. IMAGE. In the figure in the foreground of the picture is a 20th century replica; the original carving can be seen a little further away, at the centre-left of the picture. http://homepage.ntlworld.com/mjpowell/Photo_Archive/England/England_3.htmThere are both left- and right-facing swastikas on the war memorial at the entrance to Balmoral castle in Scotland.(Balmoral Castle War Memorial)The druids in the mid 1920s adorned their dress with swastikas.(http://itwasjohnson.impiousdigest.com/luciferianism.htm)(Detailed in the 2004 documentary The Occult History of the Third Reich)There is a Fylfot made into the brickwork on a building inside the Aerospace factory in Broughton in Wales. It is unknown why the Fylfot was put on a brick but it has been suggested it was done so because it was an ancient Asian peace symbol. The current Broughton site which makes wings for the Airbus has a history of fighter plane construction going back to WWI.The Air Forces Squadron adopted a cruciform fylfot as opposed to the Nazi Swastika which was a reversed fylfot, which it used as a squadron badge. It was around since the earliest RAF in 1918 and I understand was an emblem for the Ceylon Fighter Defence in 1939.(http://www.parliament.the-stationery-office.co.uk/pa/cm199596/cmhansrd/vo960612/debtext/60612-41.htm)(http://www.raf.mod.uk/history/h273.html)Many Churches and Cathederals in the UK feature Swastika motifs.(http://www.fylfotfile.co.uk/)(http://nikarevleshy.blogspot.com/2011/07/odinism-and-importance-of-fylfot.html)United StatesThe swastika symbol is extremely polarizing in the United States, although the Amendment to the United States Constitution protects most uses of it.(Associated Press, Federal appeals panel strikes courthouse ban on biker colors, August 27, 2002) Many older buildings, built before the swastika became associated with Nazism, have swastikas built into their architectural decorations. Some of these building are listed in the Register of Historic Places.Displayed with Christian and Jewish symbolsSeveral examples of U.S. architectural decoration feature swastikas displayed alongside other religious symbols.The Bah House of Worship for the American continent, located in Wilmette, Illinois, depicts religious symbols on each of its 9 outer pillars. The symbols are arranged in chronological order-from bottom to top-on the pillars. Thats why the swastika is at the base, with the Star of David above it...(Sandra Swanson, Chicagomag.com, The Annotated: Bahai Temple) The design dates to 1920 but construction was not completed until 1953.  The largest Bah House of Worship in the world, the white domed building has been listed on the Register of Historic Places since 1978.The Golden Rule Window in the Transfiguration Episcopal Church in New York City features medallion symbols depicting world religions, with Buddhism represented by the flyflot cross near a Jewish menorah.  Built in 1849 with several modifications through 1926, the church was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1973. During the Civil War the church worked for abolition of slavery and harbored runaway slaves.(New York Architecture Images - Gramercy park, Transfiguraiton (Episcopal) - aka The Little Church Around The Corner Top Ten New York Churches.)A student union at the of Michigan includes a 1929 chapel with stained glass windows that feature religious symbols. A swastika with right-facing arms is included, along with a Christian cross, Hebrew star and others.(Michigan Council for Arts and Cultural Affairs,Michigan Stained Glass Census website.)The Observatory in Geneva Lake Wisconsin, established in 1897 by the of Chicago, includes ornate decoration.   The rotunda includes a swastika symbol adjacent to a Star of David.(Yerkes Observatory Virtual Tour, see plaster owl at bottom of page.)As a Native American symbolFile:Basketball team on Home 1 Steps, 1909 - NARA - 251717.tif|thumb|Indian Agricultural School basketball team in 1909.Because this was a popular symbol with the people, the Department of Transportation marked its state highways with signs featuring a right-facing swastika superimposed on an arrowhead.(Maps, arizonaroads.com, accessed June 5, 2011.) In 1942, after the United States entered World War Two, the department replaced the signs.The swastikas use by the Navajo and other tribes made it a popular symbol for the United States. Until the 1930s, blankets, metalwork, and other Southwestern souvenirs were often made with swastikas.thumb|left|Arizona state highway marker from late 1920s.Shortly after the beginning of World War II, several Native American tribes (the Navajo, Apache, Oodham, and Hopi) published a decree stating that they would no longer use the swastika in their artwork. This was because the swastika had come to symbolize evil to the tourists who purchased their crafts. This decree was signed by representatives of these tribes. The decree states:The original Penobscot Building in Michigan, completed about 1906, was named after the Penobscot Indian tribe and region of Maine, the boyhood home of one of the investors. An interesting feature in the Indian-themed detail of the building is the occasional appearance of a swastika, a symbol important to the Penobscots long before it was adopted by the Nazi party.( Merit Network Inc Website) The decorative symbols feature right-facing arms and are tilted in the same manner as  the Nazi flag, leading to confusion over their origin.Use by the militaryThe 45th Infantry Division of the States Army used a yellow swastika on a red background as a unit symbol until the 1930s, when it was switched to a thunderbird.(From Swastika to Thunderbird. 45th Infantry Division Museum.)~(Brigadier General Ross. H. Routh (Ret.) From Swastika to Thunderbird. The M38A1 Restoration Site. History of the 45th Infantry Division)  The American Division wore the swastika patch while fighting against Germany in War I.thumb|right|Original insignia of the 45th Infantry Division (from the American Indian symbol).The Escadrille squadron flew War I fighters against Germany from 1916 to 1918, first as volunteers under French command and later as a US unit.(www.wwiaviation.com Escadrille Americaine) The official squadron insignia was a Native American with a swastika adorned headdress.  Some of the squadron planes also bore a large swastika in addition to the squadron insignia.(See photo: an American plane decorated with a swastika and Indian chief head, symbol of the escadrille Flying for France Hero Tales of Battles in the Air, Told by James R. McConnell, Sergeant-Pilot in the French Flying Corps, With the American Escadrille at Verdun.)Among the Lafayette Escadrille members who were killed in action was Bluethenthal of North Carolina, who is buried in a Jewish cemetery with a grave marker that includes the squadron insignia, complete with swastika(New Hanover County Public Library, Wilmington in pictures Louis T. Moore Collection, Photograph Number 35, Oakdale Cemetery - Hebrew Cemetery - Grave of Arthur Bluethenthal.)The Army 12th Infantry Regiment coat of arms includes a number of historic symbols.  A tepee with small, left facing swastikas represents the units campaigns in the Indian Wars of the late 19th century.  The Regiment fought German forces during World War II, landing on D-Day at Beach, through five European campaigns and received a Presidential Unit Citation for action during the of the Bulge.Government useSwastikas and the similar Greek key symbol appear in decorative features of a number of  U.S. federal, state and local government buildings including schools and county courthouses.Swastikas surround the exterior window iconography at the Marriner S. Eccles Federal Reserve Board Building in Washington D.C. on Constitution Avenue between 20th and 21st Streets. The building was designed by Philippe Cret and completed in 1937. Cret fought against Germany during War I while serving in the French army. He was awarded the de Guerre and made an officer in the of Honor.The Nevada Post Office features both left and right facing swastikas, along with other designs typical of Zig Zag Moderne style, later known as a variation of Art Deco.  It was designed in 1932 by Joseph DeLongchamps, who had previously served as the Nevada State Architect.(National Park Service, Cultural Resources, Links to the Past, US Post Office, Reno Main) The building was financed in part by the federal Works Administration and was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1990.The six-story Federal Building in downtown New Mexico features a Mediterranean style and decorative Native American design motifs.  Built in 1930, its decorative features includeRadiators set in each wall of the foyer that are hidden by brass grilles in a swastika design.(National Register of Historic Places Inventory - Nomination Form.) It has been listed on the Register of Historic Places since 1980.The third Crosse County, Wisconsin courthouse was built in 1903 and razed in 1965. Numerous swastika patterns are visible in photographs of a mosaic tile floor.  The symbols have shortened arms pointing to the left.(A. Toepel, County Judge, A History of What Was the third Court House in Crosse, Wisconsin 1903-65, November 11, 1965, printed by Crosse Public Library.)The DeKalb County Courthouse in Illinois, built in 1905, includes swastika decorated railings.  The Classical Revival style courthouse was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1978.Swastikas are a minor feature in painted murals in the Allen County Courthouse in Wayne, Indiana, completed in 1902. They are described as a Native American symbol for joy.(Andrew Jarosh, Restoration of rotunda murals recaptures their strange beauty and grandeur., The News-Sentinel, 2007.)  The murals were restored beginning in 1994 as part of an eight-year, $8.6 million dollar project. The courthouse was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1976, and as a National Historic Landmark in 2003.(Allen County Indiana, Courthouse Preservation Trust website, 2005.)Mosaic swastika tile patterns decorate the floor of the Washington County Courthouse in Ohio, designed by Cincinnati architect Samuel Hannaford and built in 1901.  The tiles are described as an adopted Indian symbol for good luck and prosperity.(Brad Bauer,First county courthouse built in 1798, Marietta Times, January 5, 2008.)The Laguna Bridge in Arizona was built in 1905 by the U.S. Reclamation Department and is decorated with a row of swastikas with right-facing arms. Their symbolism is doubly confusing. Native Americans used the symbol in the southwest U.S., but the bridge was a unique design from the country of India.(Darin Fenger, Symbol of luck, swastika adorn Yuma dam, Yuma Sun newspaper, Arizona, September 25, 2005.)(Walter Smoter Frank, Swastika on the Colorado, 2004)The U.S. Navy base at California has four L-shaped buildings laid out in a pattern that appears to be a swastika when viewed from above.(Matthew Alice, Swastika Building, Kidnap, Tire Dust, San Diego Weekly Reader, April 8, 2009.)Other government buildings with swastika decorative features are listed in the Swastika Tiles section.PlacenamesSwastika Park is the name of a housing subdivision in Miami, Florida, created in 1917.(Swastika Park Irks Residents Miami Community was Named in 1917, Associated Press, April 20, 1992, Page 7F, San Jose (Ca) Mercury News.)  An upscale subdivision in Denver is named Swastika Acres. Its name has been traced to the Denver Swastika Land Company, founded in 1908.(Swastika Acres Predates Nazism, But Still Offensive, Cincinnati Post (Cincinnati, Ohio)), December 4, 1997.)  Swastika York, located near the Park Preserve in the northeast corner of the state, is adjacent to Swastika Road.  The public access area of Fish Lake near Minnesota is named Swastika Beach.  The Swastika Trail is a historic auto trail in Iowa.  The state department of transportation web site explains When this route was designated, the Swastika symbol was recognized for its attributes as a charm or amulet, as a sign of benediction, blessing, long life, good fortune, and good luck.(Iowa Department of Transportation, Historic Auto Trails, Iowa Non-Registered Routes)Commercial useThe Motor Car Company, Michigan built cars from 1909 to 1915 with a radiator badge that featured a right-facing white swastika on a blue background.(Bill Strong, flickr photograph, 1913 Krit 5-passenger touring car with swastika radiator badge.)The Crane Valve Company manufactured steel valves in the 1920s and 30s in the U.S. with swastika markings, using a symbol with the arms pointed to the right.(United Valve, Valve History website.)The Buffum Tool Company of Missouri manufactured High Grade Tools for High Grade Workmen from about 1909 to 1922. The Buffum companys trademark was a swastika with right facing arms.  During World War I it made bayonets and airplane parts. The companys logo was the Good Luck/Blessing/Swastika Cross and many of the products, sold nationwide, had the good luck cross on them.(Buffum Tool Company, Pike County Genealogical Society website.)(BUFFUM TOOL CO. HISTORY, The Winchester * Keen Kutter * Diamond Edge Chronicles, Hardware Companies Kollectors Klub.)The Washington Charcrete Company manufactured laundry trays (concrete utility sinks) with an imprinted logo bearing a swastika. Some examples survive (see pictures(Picture of laundry tray bearing Washington Charcrete Co logo, Wikipedia)(Rubbing of Washington Charcrete Co logo featuring a swastika taken from a laundry tray, Wikipedia)), but the date of their manufacture is unknown. The company did business in the states of Washington and Oregon and is mentioned in a 1914 ruling by the Supreme Court of Washington State.(Washington Charcrete vs Campbell et. al, Reporter, via Google)The Duplex Adding Machine Company of Louis, Missouri issued stock certificates in 1910 that show the companys logo, a swastika with right-facing arms and math symbols.(Scripopyily.com Duplex Adding Machine Company 1910 - Swastika Logo.)thumb|180px|Logo of Washington Charcrete Co, early 20th centuryFlour was sold under the brand name Swastika, The Lucky Flour by the Federal Milling Co., Lockport, N.Y. as advertised in 1909,(Souvenir History of St. Dominics Church 1822-1909, page 34.) and by the Monte Vista Milling and Elevator Company of Colorado, which registered the name in 1910.(Quipu, A Newsletter Published By The New Mexico State Records Center and Archives, Fe, New Mexico, Vol. 9.1, April 2004, page 2.)The Downtown Historic District in New Mexico, listed on the Register of Historic Places, includes the Swastika Coal office and Swastika Hotel buildings.The mining town of Lakeview Idaho featured a Swastika Hotel in 1910, owned and operated by the Swastika Mining Company.(The Spokesman-Review, Swastika Beat Neo-Nazis to NIdaho, Sept 4, 2009.)The St. Louis, Rocky Mountain and Pacific Railroad Company operated with cars and locomotives emblazoned with the red swastika symbol adopted as the roads trademark.  The symbol featured right facing arms and was tilted at an angle.  The 105-mile Swastika Line operated from about 1902 to 1915, with major stops at Raton and New Mexico.  The tracks were torn up for scrap during War II when Swastika Line iron was used to fight a different kind of swastikas in Europe.(Bob Hyman, The Other Cimarron, http://members.cox.net)A Swastika Theater operated in California in the early 20th Century.(Sausalito Historic District Buildings and Sites California Historical Society.) Another Swastika Theater operated in Indiana(Indiana Division of Historic Preservation and Archeology, theater survey.)Swastika Boards were built using laminated redwood and balsa wood by legendary surfer Whitey Harrison in Angeles from 1931  until 1939 when they were renamed Waikiki Surfboards(Multi-Wood Surfboards, Pacitic System Homes Surfboard, from WoodSurfboards.com Surf History Preservation Collection.)  Swastikas became the most widely used production solid board of the period leading into World War II.(Malcolm Gault-Williams, Legendary Surfers, A Definitive History of Surfings Culture and Heroes, John Heath Doc Ball, October 2004.)Use in popular cultureSwastika quilt patterns were popular in America prior to World War II.(Nevada Department of Cultural Affairs, Swastika quilt)  In 2010 the Greeley Museums in Colorado received a donated quilt covered in 27 swastikas, believed to date to around 1900.  The swastika quilt-block pattern is also known as the Battle X of Thor, Catch Me If You Can, Devils Dark Horse, Whirligig and Zig Zag according to the museum registrar. The quilt was not put on general display while museum officials considered how to provide context.(Monte Whaley, Swastika quilt donated to Greeley Museums is quirk of history, Denver Post, June 28, 2010.)A quilt with swastika-like pattern dating to 1927 was removed from display from a Montana museum in December 2010 after complaints from the public. A group of residents of the Bears Paw Mountains had embroidered their names in the historic quilt, a gift for an ill neighbor. It was a very, very nice quilt and the story behind it was absolutely heartwarming according to a member of the museum foundation.(Tim Leeds, Swastika-like display causes controversy. Symbol on 1920s quilt misinterpreted, Havre Daily news, January 11, 2011.)Metal typeface Swastika borders were used by U.S. printers in the early 20th century.(Steven Heller, Jeff Roth, The Swastika, Symbol Beyond Redemption?, Allworth Press, 2000, page 87.) Controversy arose in 1937 when they appeared on New Jersey sample election ballots. The printer responded Ive used the swastika emblems for ballot borders long before the world ever knew Hitler.(The New York Times, September 16, 1937, quoted in Heller, page 80)Use by non-political clubs and organizationsThe Home Journal sponsored a Girls Club with swastika membership pins, swastika-decorated handkerchief and a magazine titled The Swastika. Their version of the symbol was square with right facing arms.  The club was formed around the 20th century to encourage young women to sell magazine subscriptions.(Vintage KidStuff Online Museum)The 1939 State University yearbook lists a Swastika Club among womens student organizations.  The group focused on literature, scholarship and clear and straight thinking.  Tennessee State is the only state-funded historically Black university in Tennessee.(Walter M. Kimbrough, Black Greek 101: The Culture, Customs and Challenges of Black Fraternities, August 2003.)The yearbook for College in North Carolina, first published in 1927, was known as the Swastika, after a native American design pattern found in the original tile of a campus administration building.  The name was changed in 1941.(Catawba College website, About the Sayakini (yearbook)) The liberal arts college was established by the United Church of Christ in 1851.The Society, founded in New York in 1875, incorporated the Swastika into its seal because of the Hindu and Buddhist associations of the symbol, combining it with a of David, Ankh and Ouroboros.At least one league baseball team used the name: the Caon City Swastikas represented City, Colorado in the Class D Rocky Mountain League in 1912. The team moved to New Mexico mid-season, then disbanded along with the league.The Swastika Club of Freedom Township was formed in 1923 in rural Iowa, a social club serving farm women. The group produced a Swastika Club Cookbook in 1934.  Its name was changed to the Freedom Township Womens Club in 1942.(Iowa Womens Archives, University of Iowa Libraries, Freedom Township Womens Club)  Another Swastika Club for women met in Howell County Missouri in the 1920s.(Missouri University of Science and Technology, Western Historical Manuscript Collection, 1921 Pamphlet.)The Swastika Canoe Club, of Village competed with other canoe clubs in the eastern U.S.(Eastern Canoe Races, New York Times, July 11, 1915.)  A website on area history explains:  For the record, the Swastika Canoe Club had no relation whatsoever to the Nazi Party;  the swastika was long before considered a sacred symbol in Eastern philosophies.(Pawtuxet Village Historic Homes & Buildings, September 2007.)Coins, tokens and watch fobsCollectors have identified more than 1,400 different swastika design coins, souvenir or merchant/trade tokens and fobs, distributed by mostly local retail and service businesses in the United States.  The tokens that can be dated range from 1885 to 1939, with a few later exceptions. About 57 percent have the swastika symbol facing to the left, 43 percent to the right.  Most promise good luck or feature other symbols such as a horseshoe, four leaf clover, rabbits foot, wishbone or keys.(Gary Patterson, United States Swastika 1907-1936)According to one collector: Swastika tokens have nothing to do with Herr Hitler and his ill-fated Third Reich.  The swastika is an ancient symbol of good luck adopted and promoted by advertising token salesmen during the first quarter of the 20th Century in the U.S.  The swastika is found together with other symbols of good luck in stock reverses on many merchant tokens and commemorative medals such as used to celebrate the 1932Washingtons birthday centennial.(C&D Gale Buy Page, Wilmington DE, 4/19/07.)In 1925, Coca-Cola made a lucky watch fob in the shape of a swastika with right-facing arms and the slogan, Drink Coca Cola five cents in bottles.  The Gasoline Engine Company of Iowa offered a Good Luck token featuring a left facing swastika in addition to a four-leaf clover, horseshoe, wishbone and Plains Indian emblem.  The company was sold in 1918 and became known as the Deere Tractor Company.(Brenda Kruse, A surprising symbol in John Deeres past, Sept 25, 2000.)  Harvard University Library has a 1908 leather watch fob with a brass swastika that was created for the presidential campaign of Jennings Bryan.(Frederick Lieder political button collection, Harvard University, Cambridge, MA, website 2003.)The 1917 War I good luck medal was produced in the US with an American eagle superimposed by a four-leaf clover and a swastika - an ancient symbol of good luck.  The medal was designed by Adam Pietz, who served as Assistant Engraver at the States Mint in Philadelphia for nearly 20 years. Today this golden bronze medal is very rare, in part because so many of the Doughboys marching off to the trenches of Eastern Europe lost their lives and their good luck medals on the battlefields.(Daniel M. West, So-Called Dollars: H&K-895 WWI Good Luck Medal, Willamette Coin Club website, Portland Oregon)Some Boy Scout good luck tokens issued by the Excelsior Shoe company feature the swastika on the reverse.(Craig Murray, Good Luck Scout Tokens)Architectural useNo one should be alarmed to find swastikas in ornamentation, Its one of the oldest and most universal symbols around, although meanings change across cultures. Swastikas appear on Germanic artifacts long before the days of the Nazis. that according to the author of The Architectural Guidebook to New York City.  The comments were in response to questions about a New York City building, built in 1916 for a German piano manufacturer, that features a variety of symbols including swastikas with right facing arms.(Francis Marrone, quoted in Whats up with that, Time Out New York)The Garfield Monument in Ohio, dedicated in 1890 as a tomb and memorial for assassinated U.S. President A. Garfield, contains swastika tile patterns throughout the floor.(Cleveland State University, The Cleveland Memory Project, Garfield Monument at the Lake View Cemetery.)(Sandy Mitchel, The Garfield Monument Lakeview Cemetery, About.com)  The  building was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1973.(Emporis.com James A. Garfield Memorial)A small swastika is visible in the elaborate carvings representing several cultures above the main entrance to the University Library(Flickr, posted by floeverstate, Sterling Memorial Library, Main facade, Left Entryway)Swastikas are featured in the entryway of the Montana Club in Montana.(Patty Dean,  Unique and Handsome: Cass Gilberts Designs for the Montana Club, Drumlummon Views, Spring/Summer 2006, page 11.)  Rebuilt in 1905 using a design by architect Gilbert, the site is the oldest social club in the northwest and in a historic district listed on the Register of Historic Places.( Discover Helena, Treasure of the Treasure State, Helena Convention and Visitors Bureau website.)  Gilbert is also credited with designing the state capitols of Minnesota, West Virginia and Arkansas and the US Supreme Court Building.The KiMo Theatre in New Mexico, built in 1927 in the Pueblo Deco style and restored in 2000, is owned and operated by the city, which describes it as an architectural gem. The building includes Native American design elements, including swastikas with right facing arms.(New Mexico, Official City Website, swastikas) It was nearly torn down in 1977, the same year the KiMo was listed on the Register of Historic Places.In 1907, the Palace in South Dakota, featured a design that had a swastika on one of the towers. Each year the exterior is covered with elaborate murals made of South Dakota corn, grain and grasses. The building is the centerpiece of a historic district that is listed on the Register of Historic Places.In City, South Dakota, there are swastikas in the lobby of the Hotel Alex Johnson, which opened in 1928.  They are decorations honoring the Native American culture of Western South Dakota. The hotel is listed on the Register of Historic Places.The original 1936 patented design (no. 98,617) for the Motel in Arizona, called for four swastikas to encircle each tepee shaped motel room.At the of Maine, in Maine, three dormitories resemble swastikas when viewed from   satellite images.  UMAINE mapThe Weston building on the campus of College in Massachusetts features left facing, tilted swastika brick patterns.  The building was originally a fraternity with a charter that banned Jews and non-Caucasians.  The college uses it for language classes to ensure regular use by different cultures, and built a Jewish religious center behind it.(Weston photo and comments on flickr.com)The Shaffer Hotel in New Mexico features both right and left facing swastika designs among its many Native American graphics.  It has been listed on the Register of Historic Places since 1978.The Perelman Building is regarded as one of the finest Art Deco structures in Philadelphia.(Philadelphia Museum of Art, Building : Building History http://www.philamuseum.org/information/45-289-292-103.html) Completed in 1928 as the headquarters of the Fidelity Mutual Life Insurance Company, it is now part of the Museum of Art. Swastikas are visible in the elaborate decorative scheme, credited to Lawrie, whose work also adorns the Center, of Congress and the National Academy of Sciences. Listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1973, the building was named to the Philadelphia Register of Historic Places in 1980.(Krista Walton, Preservation Online, Philadelphia Museum of Art Expands into 1927 Office Building, May 8, 2007.)The Entrance to the Museum of Art features a walkway frieze with a swastika meander pattern. The first section of the current building was completed in 1928.(Servando Gonzalez, The swastika and the Nazis)The Society Headquarters and Library, built in 1916 in the Desert in California, includes Native American swastika designs.(Augustan Society, Inc. News Page, October 28, 2002.)  The non-profit is An International Genealogical, Historical Heraldic and Chivalric Society.The 1926 Pueblo RevivalSpanish Colonial RevivalRevival Style architecture of the Orcutt residence is decorated with Native American swastikas. It is located at the Ranch Horticulture Center in Hills, Los Angeles, California. The property has been designated a Angeles Historic-Cultural Monument.Both right and left facing swastikas appear in disks near the top of columns on the & Baldwin building in Hawaii, built in 1929 and added to the Register of Historic Places in 1979.(Acclaim Images, Posters and Art Prints - Poster Print of Ornate Facade With Swastika on the Alexander & Baldwin Building)A swastika design is visible on the exterior of the Michigan downtown public library, built in 1931.  A local website notes They were a popular item in certain Deco designs, and many are used in architecture throughout Downtown Detroit. They also can be seen quite often on floor tiles in church buildings.The First Chinese Church of Christ in Hawaii, dedicated in 1929, features wooden pews with swastika carvings.  The symbols have right-facing arms and are tilted at an angle, similar to the Nazi flag. The churchs official website indicates The symbol on the pews is an ancient one which represents eternal blessedness.  The churchs design was the result of an architectural competition that resulted in a blend of western and old Chinese features.(A Short History of the First Chinese Church of Christ In Commemoration of it 90th Anniversary, Mrs. Ah Jook Ku, web page dated June 16, 2006.)The Memorial Presbyterian Church of Augustine, Florida was built in 1889 in Venetian Renaissance style, by a founding partner of Standard Oil Company.  The elaborate building is unique among Presbyterian churches, worldwide.  Among its decorative features   ...the pattern of the Sienna marble floor tiles, occasionally mistaken for the Nazi swastika-style design although its meaning of peace lies in the Hindu religion and is often repeated in Hopi Indian designs.(Society for the Preservation of Historic Flagler Memorial Presbyterian Church, A Fathers Memorial to His Daughter.)The Carlton Apartments in Texas, built in 1918, features an entryway framed by tiles with various patterns including the swastika.(Houston, an architectural guide, Houston Chapter AImerican Institute of Architects)Efforts to remove historical SwastikasMore than 900 cast iron lampposts decorated with swastikas remain in place in downtown California.  The lampposts were manufactured in Ohio and installed in the 1920s. In 1995 the city responded to complaints that the lampposts should be removed. The city attorneys response included ...research has revealed that the symbol itself was not uncommon in Judaism. The symbol itself has been found to appear in ancient synagogues as well as being found as a symbol appearing on sarcophagus in Roman catacombs.(Scott H. Howard, City Attorney, California City of Glendale Interdepartmental Communication, August 17, 1995.) Cost to replace the lampposts was estimated at $3-million dollars.(JewishJournal.com Glendale Discusses Future of Swastika Lampposts, October 11, 2002.)  The Glendale Historical Society has recommended preservation of the lampposts to the maximum extent possible.The California State Historical Resources Commission nominated the Los Gatos Union High School for listing on the National Register of Historic Places in 2003. Historic Architect A. G. Dill thanked the commission.  Ms. Dill stated that her office was galvanized in 1999 when the new school principal attempted to chisel off the Greek key design because it had a swastika pattern. The school was built in 1925 prior to the Nazis taking over the symbol. Educators need to be educated.(Quarterly Meeting of the STATE HISTORICAL RESOURCES COMMISSION, May 9, 2003, page 6.)The Mexico State University yearbook continued under the name The Swastika in honor of the traditional meaning of the symbol.  The University has an archive of a 1983 campaign to change the name, including correspondence with the League.In January 1999, Civil Rights groups asked the County, Alabama Commission to remove nine swastikas carved into stone pillars at the county courthouse in Alabama.  The building was completed in 1931 with symbols featuring both left and right facing arms.  A commission aide said officials would not consider the request unless there were an awful lot of folks worrying us.(Columbus Ledger-Enquirer (GA), Fight Promised For Removal of Swastikas, January 15, 1999.)The restored Balboa Park Hospitality House in Diego, California became controversial when swastika symbols were discovered on five light fixtures.  The design dates to 1935.  Park officials welded metal plates over the swastikas after a protest by the League.(Donald H. Harrison, Symbol problems: cross and swastika spark city controversies, Jewish Sightseeing, June 26, 1998.)  The San Diego Historical Society notes that the lamps were donated by a German American group and were intended to represent Nazi symbols.(Richard Amero, History of the House of Hospitality Building in Balboa Park)  The nearby Balboa Park tea house had previously featured swastika decorations in 1915.(Panama-California Exposition, Chapter 4: East Meets West in Balboa Park.)A hand-carved wooden horse with swastikas on its saddle http://www.iinet.com/~englishriver/LewisClarkColumbiaRiver/Regions/Places/jantzen_beach_carousel.html has been removed from a classic carousel at a shopping center in Oregon following complaints by the public. The carousel was built in 1921 and installed in California and later was a featured ride at Beach Amusement Park which opened in 1928 as the largest amusement park in the US.(  Lyn Topinka, Jantzen Beach Carousel, Portland, Oregon, see section on Hector, the carousel horse with swastika saddle, from The Columbia River, A Photographic Journey, English River Website, October 2006.)  The Parker Four-Row Park Carousel was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1987. It is the only surviving carousel out of four made from the design. The original was created for the 1904 Louis Worlds Fair.Swastika tilesCeramic tiles with a swastika design were produced by a number of North American manufacturers in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.  They were often installed in repeating patterns or in combination with related ancient symbols.  In western architecture, pre-War II swastika tiles are typically a minor decorative element and have only become prominent when their original intent or symbolic meaning has been re-interpreted.Swastika tiles adorn the Jersey Statehouse in Trenton, in a room built in the 1930s. A newspaper article in Press of Atlantic City notes that the statehouse tiles were created by the local Mueller Mosaic Company.(John Brand, Swastika tiles in Statehouse symbolize luck, not genocide, Press of Atlantic City website pressofatlancitcity.com, October 2, 2005.) Led by Carl Mueller, the firm used an innovative technique that combined glazing and deep carving to create a photographic-like sense of depth. The tiles were installed throughout the US and Canada. The swastika design was only one of many different symbols featured in the Mueller catalog.Reprints of tile catalogs, including the 1930 Mueller Mosaic Faience Tile Inserts catalog are available from the non-profit California  based Tile Heritage Foundations website.  Swastika tiles are also featured in the 1920 catalog from Wheatley Pottery Company of Cincinnati Ohio, the 1928 catalog from the Cambridge-Wheatley Company of Kentucky, which marketed Wheatley tiles and a 1930s catalog from the Franklin Pottery Company of Pennsylvania.The Mueller tiles with swastika design can be found at the St. James Episcopal Church (1927), and the Immanuel Presbyterian Church (1928) in Los Angeles.(The sixth-grade students of CityLife Downtown Charter School Los Angeles, The Sacred Spaces of Wilshire Boulevard, A Guide for Kids, by KidsCopyright 2005, CityLife Downtown Charter School and the Los Angeles Conservancy.)In May 2006, five terra cotta tiles were removed from St. Marys Cathedral in Cloud Minnesota, which serves the oldest parish in the community.(Dave Schwarz photograph, St. Cloud Times photo gallery, May 3, 2006, showing removal of 1920s era terra cotta swastika tile.)  The upper church, constructed in the late 1920s, included a number of decorative tiles including a series of ten that depicted ancient forms of the cross.(History of Saint Marys Cathedral, Cathedral of St. Mary, Cloud, Minnesota website, author not identified, History of the Luminous Disks, July 9, 2006.) Located near the eaves, the tiles represented the crux gammata, also known as the Gammadion, hooked cross.  The five swastika tiles alternated with a related design featuring the Lauburu or Basque cross.(Swastika - The Symbol of the Buddha (website) The Baskian Swastika Lauburu, its symbolic meaning and history)  The upper churchs final design was created by the local architectural firm of Nairne W. Fisher, who had fought against Germany during War I(Ann M. Harrington and Prudence Moylan, Mundelein Voices, page 32.)  The Italian Romanesque style includes Deco features, including the ancient symbols, sunburst brick patterns and zig zag details.Three of the tiles were destroyed in the process of removal, one was put on permanent display at the church.  The removal was prompted in part by criticism from some current and former faculty at Cloud State University, where the universitys electronic diversity newsletter featured a series of articles, including a history of the swastika that claimed  by 1920 it was already the symbol of Aryan conquest and mastery.(Robert Lavenda, A History of Swastikas, Insights For A Diverse Campus Community, St. Cloud State University, Volume II, Issue 4, Spring 2005, page 3 .) The article references small, obscure and secret European organizations with anti-Semitic views.  It makes no mention of the use of swastikas in the US at the time the church was designed. In a book about Holocaust, an art history professor noted that Hitler chose the swastika in 1920 and ... the swastikas of St. Cloud would follow shortly.(Nancy Weston, Absence/Presence: Critical Essays on the Artistic Memory of the Holocaust, 2005, Syracuse University Press, page 54) At the time of construction, St. Marys was under the control of the Benedictine Monks at Saint Johns University in Collegeville, who arrived in Central Minnesota in 1851 from Pennsylvania.(Patricia Kelly Witte, St. Marys Mother Church of St. Cloud, Sentinel Printing, 2004, pages 56-61.)  Saint Johns is best known, architecturally, for its Abbey church designed by Jewish architect Breuer, who fled Nazi Germany in the 1930s.(William Morgan, Earth Wood Stone, Central Minnesota Lives and Landmarks,2008, page 116.)According to documents at the Stearns History Museum in St. Cloud, approximately ten years before St. Marys was designed, there were more than 2000 local residents from the heavily German Catholic area serving in the US military, fighting against Germany.(Dunn, Mary Irene, Stearns County in the World War, An Honor Roll of the Men and Women of this Community Who Served Their Country in the Period from April 6, 1917 to November 11, 1918, Compiled From State and National U.S. Military Records,manuscript dated 1932, Historical Society, St. Paul.)  President Wilson wrote a letter to the local Catholic bishop thanking him for his support of the war effort(Wilson, photocopy of letter on House stationary with note Original in Chancery Archive vault, to Rt. Rev. J. F. Busch, Bishop of St. Cloud, January 26, 1918. Stearns History Museum.  The museum in St. Cloud is one of only five in Minnesota accredited by the American Association of Museums.)The removal coincided with the sesquicentennial anniversary for the city, St. Johns University  and St. Marys parish. St. Cloud is a Preserve America Community. An SCSU professor produced a documentary film about the removal of the ceramic disks.(St. Cloud State University News Release, Symbol to premiere April 27)Other Catholic Cathedrals that include swastika tiles among their decorations include:  Saint Joseph Cathedral, West Virginia, a Romanesque design by architect Edward J. Weber of Pittsburgh, completed in 1925. St. Colmans Cathedral, built between 1868 and 1925 overlooking the port city of Cobh Ireland.  Christ Church Cathedral, Zealand, constructed in the 1880s.  The Cathedral of Tamaulipas, completed in the late 19th century with additional remodeling (see Tour By Mexico website for photograph of swastika tile floor, click on fifth camera icon).   The floor at Cathedral in France features a right-facing swastika pattern with shortened arms, similar to the St. Cloud tiles. A popular tourist destination, Amiens is protected as a UNESCO Heritage site.The Plummer House in Minnesota includes swastika tiles.  The five-story home was constructed beginning in 1917 by Dr. Henry Plummer, a prominent figure in the history of the Clinic.(Jay Furst,  When is a swastika not a swastika?, Rochester Post-Bulletin, January 3, 2006.) The home was designed by Thomas Ellerbe, a second generation architect whose firm is now known as Becket.(The Ellerbe Tradition, Seventy Years of Architecture & Engineering, Thomas F. Ellerbe, 1980, page 30.)  It has been listed on the Register of Historic Places since 1975.(  Plummer House History & Facts, City of Minnesota Park and Recreation Department website.)Swastika floor tiles with left-facing arms will be left in place at a Minnesota elementary school built in 1929.  A member of the Citys Native American Commission noted that the nine tiles at the school entrances have roots in Native American symbolism. It has different meanings. Sometimes people say its a good luck symbol. It has absolutely nothing to do with the Nazi symbolism.(Duluth, MN - Swastika-Like Tiles at Congdon School Will Stay, Duluth Tribune, August 20, 2008.)St. Columbas Catholic Church in Pennsylvania, was designed by Pittsburg architect John T. Cornes and completed in 1914 as a territorial church for English speaking immigrants.(Johnstown Area Heritage Association, Historic Cambria City Walking Tour Guide)  Various forms of the cross are represented in the sanctuarys mosaic floor, including swastika designs. A local art enthusiast notes People dont realise that the swastika was not always a sign of hatred and horror; it originally symbolized good lock and fortune(Cynar, 1987, The Architecture of St. Columba Church, Offerings of Stone University of Pittsburg at Johnstown.)Swastika floor tiles were removed from the St. Lawrence Catholic Church in Indiana in March 1996, after they were discovered during renovation of the church entrance. The church was built in the early 1920s.(Associated Press, Toledo Blade, March 23, 1996)The Arizona Department of Agriculture building in Arizona, built in 1930, features swastika tiles in a pattern near its roofline.(Arizona Capital Times,  Hate or rolling logs? Meaning changes for symbol, November 17, 2006. Requires subscription for access.)thumb|left|100px|HPER swastikasthumb|right|100px|HPER swastikasThe Health, Physical Education and Recreation Building (HPER) at Indiana University contains decorative Native American-inspired swastika tilework on the walls of the foyer and stairwells on the southeast side of the building.  In response to a complaint about the tiles, The president of the university sent a letter to the student, which explained the history of the symbol and the context in which it was placed in the HPER building when it was built in 1917, prior to use of the symbol by the Nazis.  The student appreciated the response.(Office of Student Ethics and Anti-Harassment Programs, University of Indiana,   report July 1, 2001 through June 20, 2002.)thumb|right|100px|Placard regarding the HPER swastikas.Swastika floor tiles appear in Breidenbaugh Hall, at College in Pennsylvania, built in 1927.(Ragno, Sergio J. A. III, Hidden in Plain Sight: The Remnants of a Shard of Hope Tainted by the Shadow of Evil, Spring 2006.)In November 1998 the New York Sentinel newspaper reported that swastika tiles were removed from the Gansevoort Elementary School where they had survived on a school floor for 84 years.  The newspapers editorial(Our Opinion Editorial, Lost Chance to Educate, Daily Sentinel, Rome, NY, November 5, 1998.)  responded: School officials lost a chance to enlighten the public. A recommendation earlier this year by a committee of Gansevoort staff and parents to leave the floor as is and install a display about the history of the swastika was ignored. Instead, at the risk of being viewed by a small, uninformed segment of the community as being politically incorrect, they knuckled under to pressure rather than educate. How unfortunate!The same Sentinel editorial also notes that similar tiles were left untouched at a Jewish synagogue, Temple Beth El, in nearby New York because the connotation to the Jewish congregation is not that of the Third Reich.In 1991, the Wisconsin school board voted to remove tiles with swastika engravings from their high School physical education building.(Thom Hemmann,Removal of Tiles Approved, Milwaukee Sentinel, Dec 11, 1991, page 4A.)The Reuters News Agency reported in 1990 that the seaside community of Massachusetts voted to remove swastika tiles from their town hall floor, built in 1923, after complaints from the England Director of the Defense League.(Massachusetts Town Votes To Remove Indian Swastikas, Reuters, January 14, 1990.)  The removal went forward in spite of opposition from a local Jewish synagogue.(David Grossack, Donkeys in Brownshirts, Tinytown Gazette Newspaper and Advertising Company, October 4, 2006, Page 10.)Multicolored swastika tiles are visible on the exterior of a Chinese restaurant at the Country Club Plaza in City Missouri.  The building dates to the early 1930s. The editor of a local Jewish publication reacted by saying You know, the swastika does predate Nazism. Short of any Nazi context, I dont think you should find it offensive.(Eric Barton, No, Its Not the Plaza Nazis, The Pitch, Kansas City News Blog, April 27, 2007.)The foyer of Central High School in Colorado features right-facing swastikas set into the tile floor. The school was built in 1906 and was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1979.The Bonneville County courthouse in Idaho has  swastika floor tiles that have been alternately covered up and painted over. An architectural historian for the Idaho State Historical Society noted that the symbols could be removed even though the courthouse is listed (since 1979) on the Register of Historic Places. But she said they should stay and that people need to see the symbols in their historical context.  In September 2009, court officials decided to leave the tiles in place.(The Associated Press, 9/3/09 Idaho court wont remove pre-Nazi swastika tiles.)The San Mateo County History Museum, a regional history center in City, California is housed in the former county courthouse, built in 1910 and designed to look as impressive as San Francisco City Hall..  The mosaic tile floor in the rotunda includes swastika designs.(Watch your step, Oakland Tribune, Jul 6, 2005.) The building is listed on the Register of Historic Places and the museum is accredited by the American Association of Museums.The A.K. Smiley Public Library in California, built in 1894, includes a swastika tile floor design. The building is has been listed on the Register of Historic Places since 1976.(ESRI GIS and Mapping Software website, Redlands Guide, Public Library | http://www.esri.com/company/redlands/heritage_library.html)Swastika tiles are visible at the Diego Mission Beach Plunge swimming pool, which opened in 1925.The and Players Theatre, built in 1912 in Pennsylvania, has colored swastika floor tiles. The theatre was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1973.(Sarah M. Hyson, A Preliminary Survey of the Historic Plays and Players Theatre: Preservation Issues to Be Addressed, of Pennsylvania Theses (Historic Preservation), 2005. See color photograph: Figure 11, Decorative Tile in Lobby, Page 28.)In the 2007 film 1408 based on the Stephen King story of the same name, there is a scene in the fictional Dolphin Hotel lobby in which a Swastika can plainly be seen in the tiles in the floor.A York City Subway station at University featured a 1904 ceramic mosaic design with a border of swastikas.The League Law Enforcement Resource Network describes the swastika in its visual database of extremist symbols, with only a vague reference to its use by religious groups, but specifics about left and right facing symbols.When shown in a counterclockwise direction, an ancient religious symbol that represented a sign of good luck.Prior to the Nazis co-opting this symbol, it was known as a good luck symbol and was used by various religious groups. Hitler made the Nazi swastika unique to his party by reversing the normal direction of the symbol so that it appeared to spin clockwise.Using the definition the ADL has provided to law enforcement agencies, most of the historic tiles listed above could be classified as extremist symbols because their arms are not in what the ADL calls the normal orientation, regardless of their date of origin.(Hate on Display: A Visual Database of Extremist Symbols, Logos and tattoos, Swastika/Nazi Party Flag, League, Law Enforcement Agency Resource Network.)Miscellaneous useFile:The Library of Congress - Becker jury going to luncheon (LOC).jpg|thumb|The jury in the 1912 murder case leaving for lunch in a car adorned with the symbol.*The 44-foot luxury yacht Lady Isabel is the centerpiece of the Wisconsin-Built Boat Gallery at the Wisconsin Maritime Museum in Manitowoc. Built in 1907, it was known for decades as the Swastika, meaning Well Being.(Burger Boat Cruiser Lady Isabel has a Unique Story to Tell, Wisconsin Maritime Museum, Anchor News, Winter 2004.) Swastika symbols are visible on the front of a building in the historic area of Manitowoc, built in 1894 that originally served as a hardware store.(Celebrate Historic Preservation brochure, Herald Times Report, Lakeshore Chronicle, May 18, 2005.)*The Swastika Series is a name given to a soil type in Mexico by the US National Cooperative Soil Survey.*In December 2007, the Institute of Arts displayed a period room decorated for Christmas that included candlesticks with swastika motifs.  The rooms interior design had been preserved since 1905 and was created by a Minneapolis decorator. The symbols as seen in the Duluth Room have no Third Reich connotations, but rather refer to the ancient symbol.(Jennifer Komar Oliverez, associate curator, Architecture, Design, Decorative Arts, Craft and Sculpture, Tribune Dec 23, 2007.)*Jewish artist Edith Altman, whose family fled Germany in the late 1930s, has produced a traveling exhibit entitled Reclaiming the Symbol. The work strives to reclaim the star, the cross and the swastika to their positive use..(Edith Altman, Reclaiming the Symbol/The Art of Memory, Installation, 1988-1992.)(Stephen C. Feinstein, Witness and Legacy, Center for Holocaust Genocide Studies, University of Minnesota website.)  The exhibit features excerpts from the book Swastika the Earliest Known Symbol and its Migrations written by Thomas Wilson and published by the Smithsonian. Wilsons book is frequently cited by other authors.  It was the most comprehensive U.S. reference on the subject in the early 20th Century.* The Smithsonians National Air and Space Museum in Washington D.C. displays the original propeller spinner from Charles Lindberghs airplane of St. Louis, manufactured in early 1927. A swastika, leftpointing, was painted on the inside of the spinner cone along with the names of all the Ryan Aircraft Co. employees that built the airplane, presumably as a message of good luck prior to Lindberghs solo Atlantic crossing.(of St. Louis Nose Cone 1.jpg cone, inside)*University faculty at Catholic Jesuit St. Louis University voted to remove a painting by Italian priest Renato Laffranchi in 2004. The painting symbolized four rivers flowing from the Garden of Eden, with gardens in four quadrants.  The rivers have the shape of a clockwise swastika with shortened arms. One unnamed faculty member commented today, a swastika means only one thing. That is hate, intolerance and genocide. Another pointed to differences between the paintings design and the Nazi symbol. Look it up in the history books. Its not the same symbol.  The universitys president refused to remove the painting prior to its scheduled annual rotation.(Katie Childs, Biondi refuses to remove paintingDenies student, faculty requests The University News, St. Louis University, April 15, 2004.)See also* Bn* Lauburu* cross* Triskelion* Swastika* ValknutReferencesExternal links*Photograph of swastika tile floor in Allston a section of Boston, Massachusetts, HappyScrappy blog, October 13, 2006.
8430775
Deforestation_during_the_Roman_period
The rise and fall of the Empire encompasses the time when Rome was the leading contributor to deforestation in the Mediterranean. Whereas the Mediterranean was largely prehistoric in 1000 BC, it was definitely historic by 500 AD.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 62.) Roman geographical and population expansion spread methods of agricultural and economic development which encouraged the clearing of forested land. The spread of Roman practices had unintended devastating effects on the environment.CausesHousing and buildingThe most basic building supply in the Roman time period was wood. Trees were cut to house increasing populations throughout the Roman Empire. While some Mediterranean houses were built with brick and stone, roof structures, covered with tiles, as well as floors were often made of wood.(Hughes, J. Donald. (1994) Pans Travail. Maryland: Johns Hopkins, 157.) At one point it is estimated that the Roman Empire had a population of 60 million people, and an estimated one million or more in Rome alone (a population that was not matched in size in Europe until London in the 19th century). With such a large population increase, coupled with an enhancement of exuberant lifestyles and a high standard of living for the urbanized communities of the Roman world, resource consumption became exponentially extensive.FuelWood was a primary source of heating and used extensively in industry. Wood fuel constituted about 90 percent of the consumption overall, and was a major factor in the Roman deforestation epidemic. Wood was essential fuel in industries like mining, smelting, and the making of ceramics.(Hughes, J. Donald. (1994) Pans Travail. Maryland: Johns Hopkins, 192) Wood and charcoal were the primary ancient fuels in public facilities, households, public baths and industries that produced light and heat. Forest areas around mining centers were deforested first, consuming all natural resources around the area of work. Once all the natural resources around the area of production were consumed, wood was then shipped and carried in to supply the furnaces and smelters for the mining centers. Eventually, these centers would shut down and move to areas within Roman territory to repeat the same cycle of deforestation, supplying an ever-growing population and consumption demand.AgricultureAgriculture was the economic base for the Roman Empire. With an ever-increasing population, the clearing of land for crops was a primary cause of initial deforestation. Human hands gave way to the iron plough and the use of animals to clear dense forests to utilize the rich topsoil.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 63.) Agriculture produced commodities that contributed to the economic prosperity of the Romans, who relied on the crops produced from the slaves/landowners. As a result, in 111 BC law allowed anyone who occupied public land of up to  to keep it, provided it was brought into cultivation.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 68.) This type of policy created widespread clearing and reflected the importance of agriculture to not only the affluent, but to citizens, the military and to merchants engaged in trade with other regions.In Chapter 5 (Roman Soil Erosion) of the book Reconstruction by Way of the Soil by Theodore Wrench, the author describes the devastating effects which widespread deforestation and the subsequent overworking of the land to grow increasing amounts of grain for the Roman Empires burgeoning population had on the land:Animals and overgrazingA major contributor to the degradation and barrier to the regeneration of forests was the grazing of animals. Animals grazed and destroyed land areas unsuitable for cultivation.(Hughes, J. Donald. (1994) Pans Travail. Maryland: Johns Hopkins, p.77)The consumption of hillside plants and young trees caused erosion, stripping hillsides of soils and eventually exposing bare rock. Silt and gravel would wash down off the hills and mountains creating other problems such as flooding, siltation, and filled-in marshlands.(Hughes, J. Donald. (1994) Pans Travail. Maryland: Johns Hopkins, p.190)MilitaryWith natural resources dwindling, maintaining a strong military for the conquering of new lands was vital in Roman times. Military campaigns devastated the countryside. Some farmers were forced to fight instead of caring for the land. When natural resources were depleted in already occupied regions of the Roman Empire, the military was sent to not only to defend lands of the Romans, but also to accumulate other areas of interest that had a plentiful supply of timber to accommodate the needs of the Roman economy.Caesar himself ordered troops to cut down forests to prevent sneak attacks.(BBC, 2004.) Deforestation ensured that the forests could not provide cover and camouflage for Romes enemies. The size of the army was about 300,000 and increased to 600,000 toward the late empire period.(Chew, Sing. (2001) World Ecological Degradation. Walnut Creek: AltaMira, 92) legions deforested areas where they camped or marched to reduce the cover where their adversaries could hide and or mount a sneak attack.( The military utilized these resources and built fortresses, along with tools and transportation to carry supplies where needed.ShipbuildingShipbuilding was a major contributor to deforestation and was of great economic and military significance. The importance attached to the supply of timber for building ships cannot be denied; ships were crucial to the burgeoning economic life of the Mediterranean, and sea power was vital in the exercise of political control.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 71.) Warships had priority over merchant vessels in competition for materials.(Hughes, J. Donald. (1994) Pans Travail. Maryland: Johns Hopkins, 86.) Thousands of ships were built during this classical period. At times of war, hundreds could be built within a month. This put tremendous pressure on supply of usable timbers. Consequently, one effect of shipbuilding centers was the scarcity of timber in their immediate areas. Then, after immediate areas were depleted of wood resources, the transportation of wood timbers from other areas was the next option. Transportation was expensive, but increasing numbers of ships were needed to maintain  naval dominance.UrbanizationEarly urbanization of Rome and surrounding areas was focused around the ability to obtain natural resources. Lowland areas and areas close to water transports were highly urbanized first, but as population increased along with trade and manufacturing, imperial expansion and colonization of conquered territories was needed. The environment underwent drastic degradation as pollution from the burning of fuelwood filled the air and smelters that used wood as fuel transmitted heavy metals into the atmosphere.The creation of large cities contributed to deforestation in the classical world. Overcrowding forced citizens to move to the hillsides where forests once stood to build their homes.( Wood was needed to not only build homes, but also theaters, public buildings, chapels and other fixtures of modern cities as well as keep them heated. Urbanization and the resulting degradation of the environment ultimately weakened the Roman Empire.Consequences of deforestationSoilWith an increased demand for resources and food, constant pressure was put upon the land and soil to provide food for a growing economy. Regular clearing and plowing exhausted existing soil, which eventually became infertile. Runoff from deforested hillsides increased the amount of silt and impeded the flow of water into agricultural areas. Eventually, due to the climate and the increased depletion of soil nutrients from hundreds of years of harvesting, yields diminished.(Hughes 2004, 138) Rainwater that had been locked into the soil through vegetation and forests was now running off too quickly, with each raindrop unprotected by plants or by a litter layer.(Delano Smith, Catherine. (1996). The wilderness in Roman Times. In Shipley, Graham & Salmon, John. Human Landscapes in Classical Antiquities. New York: Routledge, 159.)Flooding/harbors and portsErosion accelerated up to twentyfold in the 3rd century, creating unusable marshlands, which spread diseases such as malaria. Flooding from runoff disrupted water supply to natural springs and rivers, but also increased siltation to coastal areas and harbors at deltas. Rains washed away the unprotected earth and greatly altered coastlines, in some cases, pushing them many miles farther out to sea as in the case around the mouths of the River.(Hughes (2004) p.84) The washing away of topsoil and deposits of silt and gravel meant that harbors and ports needed to be moved, causing further burden upon the economy. Even in the city of Rome, floods covered the lower parts of the city and backed up the sewers. The first such flood was noted in 241 BC; records indicate increased flooding of the river from that time onward.(Hughes (2004) p.83)Reflections and awarenessClearing for agricultural needs and for heat was a necessity for long-term survival in Roman times, though there is a debate as to whether the Romans understood the implications of deforestation. Richard Grove said, states will act to prevent environmental degradation only when their economic interests are shown to be directly threatened. The Romans did have some forms of ecological conservation though. Recycling of glassware was practiced along with design that utilized heating. Forests were also under government regulations and protected for future resources.(Chew, Sing. (2001) World Ecological Degradation. Walnut Creek: AltaMira, 97.) Unfortunately, these attempts may have been too little too late.In the 5th century BC Plato complained that the loss of timber had denuded the hills and plains surrounding Athens and caused massive soil erosion.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 74.) Cicero also noted we (humans) are the masters of what the earth produces, and all things in this world which men employ have been created and provided for the sake of men.(Chew, Sing. (2001) World Ecological Degradation. Walnut Creek: AltaMira, 96.) Tainter argued that deforestation did not cause the Roman collapse,(Tainter, Joseph. Archeology of Overshoot and Collapse. Annual Reviews of Anthropology. http://www.annualreviews.org May 10, 69.) but one could make a case as to being a part of it. As Williams wrote, it is more likely that constant war, ravaging epidemics, rebellion, invasion from outside, a declining population, and an excessive degree of urbanization, separately or in combination, operated on the land in an empire that had extended beyond its means.(Williams, Michael. (2006) Deforesting the Earth: From Pre-History to Global Crisis. An Abridgement. Chicago: University of Chicago, 80.)Alternative viewSome argue that almost all of the above is based on an unhistorical projection of present concerns, onto the past. This alternative view argues that there are immense complexities of time, space, climate, geology and topography which, when combined with our extremely fragmentary information, makes generalizations almost impossible. Tree crops, dates, figs, olives, chestnuts etc, played a very important role in Roman agriculture. Grains were often intercultivated with these tree crops. Almost all species of trees grow again when cut down. Cutting down a wood does not, by itself, destroy woodland. Coppicing is one way in which wood could be harvested on a sustainable basis for example. Hypocausts were pre-adapted to burn poor quality fuels like straw as awell as coal. There is good reason to believe that both straw and coal were important fuels in antiquity, especially in Roman Britain where coal was abundant in many areas. A great deal of protection against soil erosion arises from terracing hillsides. We do not know how extensive terraces were in antiquity but a good deal of the soil erosion, here assumed to be caused by the Romans, may well date to the dark ages when the maintenance of terraces broke down. Changes in tree cover may well arise from differences in climate, which are still not well understood. But there is some evidence that the decline of the Roman West is linked to climate change.(F. L. Cheyette 2008 The disappearance of the ancient landscape and the climatic anomaly of the early Middle Ages: a question to be pursued Early Medieval Europe vol 16 no.2 pp127-65)(http://www.amherst.edu/~flcheyette/Publications/Transformation%20for%20web.pdf) Slash and burn agriculture, associated with lower populations than the Roman period, can be at least as responsible for deforestation and soil erosion as Roman agriculture. Coastal marshes can be caused by sea level changes quite as much as soil erosion. There may be reasons to believe that tree diseases as early as 6,000 years ago(http://www.geus.dk/departments/environ-hist-climate/posters/rasmussen97-uk.htm) caused the elm decline but that this tree decline was related in some complex way to the practices of neolithic farmers.Further reading*Collapse: How Societies Choose to Fail or Succeed*The First Eden: The Mediterranean World and Man*Duncan-Jones, Richard. (1974) The economy of the Roman Empire. Great Britain: Cambridge*Hughes, J. Donald. (2001) An Environmental History of the World. New York: Routledge*Role of Deforestation in the Roman Empire (2004, March 23) Available: http://www.bbc.co.uk/dna/h2g2/A2184473References
8442223
Fred_Kohler
 academyawards  Fred Kohler (April 20, 1888 &ndash; October 28, 1938) was an American actor known for his heavy style of character.CareerFred Kohler was born in City, Missouri. As a teen, he began to pursue a career in vaudeville, but worked other jobs to support himself. He lost part of his right hand in a mining accident during this time. Eventually he was able to join a touring company, and worked steadily in show business for several years. As with many actors of his day, Americas budding film industry drew a 20-something Kohler to Hollywood, where he made his start in films. His first role was in the 1911 short The Code of Honor, and he had an uncredited role in 1917s Joan the Woman, but a steady stream of parts did not begin until 1919s The Tigers Trail. Kohlers imposing 6-foot physique and stern features earned him a niche playing villains. His 1924 role as Bauman in The Iron Horse is a notable example. With the advent of the talkies, Kohler reprised many of his silent roles in remakes with sound, particularly in Westerns based on novels by Gray. In 1929 he appeared in the Dwan film of Empire alongside Adoree and another rugged cowboy Tom Keene.DeathKohler died of a heart attack on October 28, 1938 at age 50.Selected filmography* the Woman (1917)* Tigers Trail (1919)* of the Yukon (1922)* Stanley in Africa (1922)* Trimmed (1922)* Flame of Life (1923)* of Hudson Bay (1923)* The Iron Horse (1924)* Prairie Pirate (1925)* Bar-C Mystery (1926)* Old Ironsides (1926)* Underworld (1927)* Blood Ship (1927)* The Showdown (1928)* Dragnet (1928)* of Empire (1929)* Hells Heroes (1930)* Caravans (1931)* Woman Hungry (1931)* Little Man, What Now? (1934)* Collars (1935)* Mississippi (1935)* Vigilantes Are Coming (1936)External links* *PLACE OF DEATH  Hollywood, California USAKohler
8453546
Open_Regulatory_Annotation_Database
The Open Regulatory Annotation Database (also known as ORegAnno) is designed to promote community-based curation of regulatory information. Specifically, the database contains information about regions, factor sites, regulatory variants, and haplotypes.    Overview  Data ManagementFor each entry, cross-references are maintained to EnsEMBL, dbSNP,Entrez Gene, the NCBI Taxonomy database and PubMed.  The information within ORegAnno is regularly mapped and provided as a UCSC Genome Browser track.  Furthermore, each entry is associated with its experimental evidence, embedded as an Evidence Ontology within ORegAnno.  This allows the researcher to analyze regulatory data using their own conditions as to the suitability of the supporting evidence.Software and data accessThe project is source - all data and all software that is produced in the project can be freely accessed and used.Database contentsAs of December 20 2006, ORegAnno contained 4220 regulatory sequences (excluding deprecated records) for 2190 transcription factor binding sites, 1853 regulatory regions (enhancers, promoters, etc), 170 regulatory polymorphisms, and 7 regulatory haplotypes for 17 different organisms (predominantly melanogaster, sapiens, musculus, elegans, and norvegicus in that order).  These records were obtained by manual curation of 828 publications by 45 ORegAnno users from the gene regulation community.  The ORegAnno publication queue contained 4215 publications of which 858 were closed, 34 were in progress (open status), and 3321 were awaiting annotation (pending status). ORegAnno is continually updated and therefore current database contents should be obtained from www.oreganno.org.RegCreative Jamboree 2006The RegCreative jamboree was stimulated by a community initiative to curate in perpetuity the genomic sequences which have been experimentally determined to control gene expression.  This objective is of fundamental importance to evolutionary analysis and translational research as regulatory mechanisms are widely-implicated in species-specific adaptation and the etiology of disease.  This initiative culminated in the formation of an international consortium of like-minded scientists dedicated to accomplishing this task.  The RegCreative jamboree was the first opportunity for these groups to meet to be able to accurately assess the current state of knowledge in gene regulation and to begin to develop standards by which to curate regulatory information.In total, 44 researchers attended the workshop from 9 different countries and 23 institutions. Funding was also obtained from ENFIN, the BioSapiens Network, FWO Research Foundation, Genome Canada and Genome British Columbia. The specific outcomes of the RegCreative meeting to date are:* Prior to the RegCreative Jamboree, attendees were asked to participate in an interannotator agreement assessment.  Two ORegAnno mirrors were established with identical sets of publications to be annotated in their queue.  In total, 33 redundant annotations from 18 publications were collected.  (79 annotations for 31 papers and 60 annotations for 21 papers were collected on servers 1 and 2, respectively.)  This effort was used as a baseline from which to establish annotator efficiency.  * Hands-on annotation activities occurred during the first 2 days of the 3-day workshop.  In total, 39 researchers contributed 184 TFBS and 317 Regulatory Regions from 96 papers.  Many of these researchers were also trained on the ORegAnno system, significantly increasing its experienced-user community.  The contribution of these annotations to individual species was 339 annotations in sapiens, 42 annotations in musculus, 72 annotations in melanogaster, 24 annotations in intestinalis, 14 annotations in norvegicus, 6 annotations in Halocynthia roretzi, 2 annotations in Ciona savignyi and 2 annotations in HIV.  Within these annotations, one new dataset was added to ORegAnno; 274 human enhancers were programmatically annotated by Maximillian Haessler, Institute Alfred Fessard, from Visel et al., Nucleic Acids Research, 2006.  In total, 130 scientific studies were examined in depth.   The annotated papers were pre-selected from expert-curated publications in the ORegAnno queue that had full-text available through Press.  * There exists an immediate need for improved data standardization and development of associated ontologies.  Specifically, this should include the open access development and integration of transcription factor naming conventions and sequence, cell type, cell line, tissue, and evidence ontologies.  The groundwork for addressing and prioritizing these needs was accomplished in several ways during the meeting:**  Transcription factor naming issues were addressed through discussion of integration of transcription factor prediction pipelines, such as DBD or flyTF, which have been supplemented with manual curation versus solely manual curated implementations like TFcat.** Marc Halfon, University at Buffalo, led a breakout session to improve the Sequence Ontology from existing ORegAnno and REDfly database conventions within the framework being developed as part of the Biomedical Ontologies.  A preliminary version of these improvements can be found on the ORegAnno wiki.** Learning-based ontology development was widely regarded as an essential feature of the annotation process.  Such that, annotators are not restricted from annotating based on the limitations of the controlled vocabulary and that these exceptions can be used to further develop the backbone ontologies.** Ontology development should be decentralized from the ORegAnno annotation framework.  Specifically, it is planned that the ORegAnno evidence ontology will be removed and made available to broader community development.** Renewed focus on integrating species-specific resources with annotation framework.* A specific focus of the workshop was addressing the role of text-mining in facilitating regulatory annotation.  Sessions were led by Dr. Lynette Hirschman, MITRE, and Dr. Martin Krallinger, CNIO, to formulate where text-mining can help.  A short term object of text-mining based analyses was formulated around both populating the ORegAnno queue and using the expert-curated portion of the ORegAnno queue to validate text-mining-based publication acquisition.  The latter objectives are being led by Dr. Stein Aerts, University of Leuven.References* * External links*ORegAnno*RegCreative Jamboree 2006
8459847
Kenneth_Yablonski
Kenneth Yablonski (1934  September 8, 2002) was a noted attorney with the firm of Yablonski, Costello and Leckie in Pennsylvania.Kenneth Yablonski was born in 1934 to Joseph Jock and Ann Huffman Yablonski. He obtained a degree from College in 1956 and received his J.D. from Virginia University College of Law in 1959.In 1961, he co-founded the firm of Yablonski, Costello and Leckie, and remained with the firm for the rest of his life.In 1964, Yablonski won a precedent-setting case involving benefits to survivors of a mine disaster.  A mine explosion occurred at U.S. Steels Robena No. 3 Mine in County, Pennsylvania on December 8, 1962. A total of 37 miners lost their lives. Yablonski won a court order forcing the local coroner to perform an inquest, which subsequently provided evidence that helped the families win expanded survivors benefits from the Pennsylvania Workmens Compensation Board.Fathers murder and union activismIn the 1960s, Yablonskis father, Jock, made a number of attempts to reform the Mine Workers of America (UMWA).  Jock Yablonski ran for the presidency of UMWA in 1969 against A. Boyle and lost in an election. He sued to overturn the election with the assistance of labor attorneys Joseph Rauh and Daniel Edelman, and sons Kenneth and Chip Yablonski.  Jock Yablonski brought five suits alleging that Boyle and UMWA had denied him use of the unions mailing lists as provided for by law, that he had been removed from his position as acting director of Labors Non-Partisan League in retaliation for his candidacy, that the UMW Journal was being used by Boyle as a campaign and propaganda mouthpiece, that UMWA had no rules for fair elections and printed nearly 51,000 excess ballots which should be destroyed, and that UMWA had violated its fiduciary duties by spending union funds on Boyles re-election.(These charges and their resolution are outlined in Kenneth J. Yablonski and Joseph A. Yablonski v. United Mine Workers of America et al., 466 F.2d 424 (August 3, 1972).)On December 31, 1969, Jock Yablonski, his wife, and his 25-year-old daughter Charlotte were murdered by three assassins hired by Boyle and paid for with embezzled union money. Worried that he had not heard from his family since Christmas, Ken Yablonski and a friend drove to the Yablonski home in Pennsylvania on January 5, 1970 and discovered the bodies of his slain family.In the aftermath of his familys murders, Kenneth Yablonski joined with his brother and other miners to form Miners for Democracy, a reform movement within UMWA. Lou Antal, president of UMWA District 5, hired Kenneth Yablonski to represent him as he attempted to overturn his districts 1970 election results (which had been rigged by Boyle).The ensuing outcry over the murders led to the 1969 election being overturned and miner Miller unseated Boyle in 1972.Continuing legal workAlthough he later ended his relationship with Miller due to differences over Millers leadership of the international union, Yablonski continued to serve as an attorney with his fathers old District 5, advising on workers compensation issues and acting as counsel until 1981. Yablonski continued to represent individual miners in various cases throughout his life.  In the 1980s, he won several lung disease cases, overcoming employer objections to providing medical and financial benefits for stricken miners and their families.In 1982, Yablonski won a precedent-setting Supreme Court case concerning attorneys fees.  United Steelworkers reformer Sadlowski ran for president of the international union in 1977 and for District 31 president in 1973.  He lost both times, and filed election fraud petitions with the States Department of Labor (DOL).  DOL found evidence of fraud and sued to overturn the 1973 election.  The Steelworkers union settled the case out-of-court.  Sadlowski then sued the union to recover his legal fees, incurred by Yablonski, Joseph Rauh and two others. On December 16, 1981, the U.S. Supreme Court agreed that the union must cover the cost of legal fees up until the time Sadlowski filed his DOL fraud claim. The award was a major victory for individuals who successfully sue their labor unions over corruption.MembershipsYablonski was a director of the Yablonski Memorial Clinic.  The clinic was founded in 1955 by UMWA to bring health care to mining families in rural areas of Pennsylvania. Originally called the Centerville Clinic, it was renamed the Yablonski Memorial Clinic in honor of his father. Yablonski served as chairman of the board of directors of the clinic until his death.Personal lifeIn 1965, Yablonski married his wife, Shirley. They had three sons.LegacyKenneth Yablonski appears in documentary filmmaker Kopples film, County, USA, which won the 1976 Award for Documentary Feature. He is shown making an emotional public statement, saying We brother and I loved and admired our father. We respected him, and my brother and I would like to carry him to his final resting place. But we deem it proper to do otherwise. My brother Joseph with our cousins from my mothers family will carry our mother, and I with our cousins from my fathers family will carry our sister Charlotte. We entrust our father to the coal miners, whom he loved so much.(Yablonski, K. (1976). In: B. Kopple (dir.). Harlan County U.S.A..)NotesReferences*Carelli, Richard, Chicago Steelworker Wins Bid on Lawyers Fees, Associated Press, October 4, 1982*Deaths, Washington Post, September 14, 2002*Deaths Elsewhere, The Baltimore Sun, September 11, 2002*Sabatini, Patricia, Kenneth J. Yablonski; Champion of Miners, Son of Slain Reformer, Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, September 11, 2002External links**Yablonski, Costello and Leckie
8470338
Finsch_diamond_mine
Image:Diamond - South Africa - Finsch Mine.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Natural diamond crystal in kimberlite from Finsch Diamond MineThe Finsch Mine is an underground diamond mine, located near Acres, 160km northwest of Kimberley, is one of seven operations managed by Beers Consolidated Mines (DBCM), formed in July 2004. The Finsch mine is a traditional diamantiferous kimberlite pipe, extending around 17.9ha. Reserves are sufficient for another 23 years. Underground development started in 1978 and the shaft was commissioned in 1982.  External links * Mining Technology description of Finsch mine* Finsch diamond operationdiamond mine
8474730
Faculties_and_departments_of_the_University_of_Alberta
This article is a list of the faculties and departments of the of Alberta.Main CampusAgriculture* Faculty of Agricultural, Life and Environmental Sciences http://www.ales.ualberta.ca/ (AFHE)** Department of Agricultural, Food and Nutritional Science http://www.afns.ualberta.ca/ (AFNS)** Devonian Botanic Garden http://www.devonian.ualberta.ca/** Department of Human Ecology http://www.hecol.ualberta.ca/** Department of Renewable Resources http://www.rr.ualberta.ca/** Department of Rural Economy http://www.re.ualberta.ca/Arts* Faculty of Arts http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/arts/** Department of Anthropology http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/anthropology/** Department of Art and Design http://www.ualberta.ca/ARTDESIGN/** Arts Resource Centre http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/arc/** CSL Community Service-Learning http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/arts/CSLhome.cfm** Department of Drama http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/drama/** Department of East Asian Studies http://www.arts.ualberta.ca/~Eeastasia/** Department of Economics http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/economics/** Department of English and Film Studies http://www.humanities.ualberta.ca/english/** Department of History and Classics http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/historyandclassics/** Office of Interdisciplinary Studies http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/arts/ois.cfm*** Comparative Literature Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/complit/*** Humanities Computing Program http://huco.ualberta.ca/ (HUCO)*** Middle Eastern and African Studies Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/meas/ (MEAS)*** Peace and Post-Conflict Studies Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/peacepostconflict/index.cfm*** Religious Studies Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/rs/*** Science, Technology and Society Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/sts/ (STS)** Department of Linguistics http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/linguistics/** Department of Modern Languages and Cultural Studies http://www.humanities.ualberta.ca/MLCS/ (MLCS)** Department of Music http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/music/** Department of Philosophy http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/philosophy/** Department of Political Science http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/polisci/** Department of Psychology http://www.psych.ualberta.ca/** Department of Sociology http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/sociology/** Womens Studies Program http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/womensstudies/Business* School of Business http://www.bus.ualberta.ca/** Department of Accounting and Management Information Systems http://www.bus.ualberta.ca/Accounting-MIS/ (AMIS)** Department of Finance and Management Science http://www.bus.ualberta.ca/Finance-MgmtSci/ (FMS)** Department of Marketing, Business Economics, and Law http://www.bus.ualberta.ca/MBEL/ (MABEL)** Department of Strategic Management and Organization http://www.bus.ualberta.ca/smorg/ (SMORG)Education* Faculty of Education http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/education/** Department of Educational Policy Studies http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/edpolicystudies/** Department of Educational Psychology http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/edpsychology/** Department of Elementary Education http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/elementaryed/** Department of Secondary Education http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/secondaryed/** Division of Technology in Education http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/dte/ (DTE)Engineering* Faculty of Engineering http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/engineering/** Department of Chemical and Materials Engineering http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/cme/ (CME)** Department of Civil and Environmental Engineering http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/civil/*** School of Mining and Petroleum Engineering http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/civil/smpe.cfm** Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/ece/ (ECE)** Department of Mechanical Engineering http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/mece/** Engineering Co-op Program http://www.engineering.ualberta.ca/coop/Extension* Faculty of Extension http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/** Applied Sciences Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/appliedsciences/index.aspx** Business Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/business/index.aspx** Adult and Continuing Education Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/cace/index.aspx** Communications and Technology Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/mact/index.aspx (MACT)** English Language Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/elp/index.aspx (ELP)** Government Studies Programs http://www.govsource.net/govstudies/corporate/govstudies.nclk** Liberal Studies Programs http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/liberalstudies/index.aspx** Medical Acupuncture Program http://www.extension.ualberta.ca/acupuncture/index.aspxGraduate Studies* Faculty of Graduate Studies and Research http://www.ualberta.ca/gradstudies/ (FGSR)** Professional Development Programs http://gradfile.fgsro.ualberta.ca/profdev/** University Teaching Program http://gradfile.fgsro.ualberta.ca/utp/ (UTP)** University of Alberta Outreach http://www.ualberta.ca/OUTREACH/Law* Faculty of Law http://www.law.ualberta.ca/Library Studies* School of Library and Information Studies http://www.slis.ualberta.ca/ (SLIS)Medicine* Faculty of Medicine and Dentistry http://www.med.ualberta.ca/** Division of Anatomy http://www.anatomy.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Anaesthesiology and Pain Medicine http://www.med.ualberta.ca/departments/anesthesiology/netscape/index.htm** Department of Biochemistry http://www.biochem.ualberta.ca/home.php** Department of Biomedical Engineering http://www.bme.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Cell Biology http://www.ualberta.ca/CELLBIOLOGY/** Centre for Neuroscience http://www.neuroscience.ualberta.ca/** Division of Critical Care Medicine http://www.med.ualberta.ca/critical/** Department of Dentistry http://www.dent.ualberta.ca/** Department of Family Medicine http://www.familymed.med.ualberta.ca/** Health Ethics Centre http://www.ualberta.ca/BIOETHICS/** Department of Laboratory Medicine & Pathology http://www.lmp.ualberta.ca/** Department of Medical Genetics http://www.medicalgenetics.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Medical Microbiology and Immunology http://www.ualberta.ca/~mmi/** Department of Medicine http://www.departmentofmedicine.ualberta.ca/** Department of Obstetrics & Gynaecology http://www.obgyn.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Oncology http://www.oncology.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Ophthalmology http://ophthalm.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Paediatrics http://www.pediatrics.ualberta.ca/** Department of Pharmacology http://www.pmcol.ualberta.ca/** Division of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation http://www.pmrdivision.ualberta.ca/** Department of Physiology http://www.physiology.ualberta.ca/** Department of Psychiatry http://www.physiology.ualberta.ca/** Department of Radiology and Diagnostic Imaging http://www.radiology.med.ualberta.ca/** Department of Surgery http://www.surgery.ualberta.ca/Native Studies* Faculty of Native Studies http://www.ualberta.ca/nativestudiesNursing* Faculty of Nursing http://www.nursing.ualberta.ca/Pharmacy* Faculty of Pharmacy and Pharmaceutical Sciences http://www.pharmacy.ualberta.ca/Recreation* Faculty of Physical Education and Recreation http://www.physedandrec.ualberta.ca/Public Health* School of Public Health http://www.publichealth.ualberta.ca/** Alberta Centre for Injury Control & Research http://www.acicr.ualberta.ca/** Centre for Health Promotion Studies http://www.chps.ualberta.ca/** Department of Public Health Sciences http://www.phs.ualberta.ca/Rehabilitation* Faculty of Rehabilitation Medicine http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/rehabmed/** Department of Occupational Therapy http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/rehabmed/ot.cfm** Department of Physical Therapy http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/rehabmed/PhysicalTherapy.cfm** Rehabilitation Research Centre http://www.rehabmed.ualberta.ca/rrc/** Department of Speech Pathology and Audiology http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/rehabmed/spa.cfm** Centre for Studies in Clinical Education http://www.rehabmed.ualberta.ca/csce/ (CSCE)** Institute for Stuttering Treatment and Research http://www.istar.ualberta.ca/ (ISTAR)Sciencethumb|right|250px|The Earth Sciences buildingthumb|right|250px|The Biological Sciences Building* Faculty of Science http://www.uofaweb.ualberta.ca/science/** Department of Biological Sciences http://www.biology.ualberta.ca/** Department of Chemistry http://www.chem.ualberta.ca/** Department of Computing Science http://www.cs.ualberta.ca/** Department of Earth & Atmospheric Sciences http://easweb.eas.ualberta.ca/** Department of Mathematical and Statistical Sciences http://www.math.ualberta.ca/index.html** Department of Physics http://www.phys.ualberta.ca/** Department of Psychology http://www.psych.ualberta.ca/Campus Saint-Jean* Facult Saint-Jean http://www.csj.ualberta.ca/ (FSJ)Augustana Campus* Augustana Faculty http://www.augustana.ca/** Department of Fine Arts http://www.augustana.ca/programs/finearts/** Department of Humanities http://www.augustana.ca/programs/humanities/** Department of Physical Education http://www.augustana.ca/programs/physed/** Department of Science http://www.augustana.ca/programs/science/** Department of Social Sciences http://www.augustana.ca/programs/socialsciences/Affiliated colleges* St. Josephs College http://www.ualberta.ca/~stjoseph/* St. Stephens College http://www.ualberta.ca/ST.STEPHENS/External links* University of Alberta* Faculties and Departments
8485140
Newchapel
Newchapel is a hamlet in the of Newcastle-under-Lyme, close to Kidsgrove in Staffordshire, England.Newchapel was originally named Thursfield. It was mentioned in the Book in 1086 as Turvoldesfeld. After the Reformation in the 17th century the land reverted to private ownership, the new owner built a stone Chapel and the village was renamed Newchapel.From 1894 to 1904 Newchapel formed part of Rural District.  After re-organisation of boundaries, from 1904 to 1974 it was part of  Kidsgrove Urban District; following the Government Act 1972, it was absorbed into the of Newcastle-under-Lyme.Newchapel was served by a railway station (shared with Goldenhill), Newchapel and Goldenhill on the Potteries Loop, which was opened by the Staffordshire Railway on 1 October 1874 and closed on 2 March 1964.The canal engineer Brindley (1716 &ndash; 27 September 1772) died at his Turnhurst estate in Newchapel, within sight of his unfinished Tunnel. On 30 September 1772, just nine days after the completion of his Birmingham Canal, he was buried in the churchyard of Newchapel; the present church, St. James, is dedicated to his memory. The grave is marked by a bronze plaque.(http://www.churchonhill.org.uk/History.html)During the excavation work for the first Tunnel, large amounts of coal were discovered underground.  This led to the development, initially by the Duke of Bridgewater and then by Robert Heath and Sons of a significant mining and coal by-products works known as Birchenwood(http://www.harriseahead.com/Birchenwood_Colliery.htm).  Growing from the Birchenwood Colliery Company founded in 1893, this was the largest industrial site that the Newchapel area has ever known and provided employment for several thousand people in its heyday. Newchapel as seen today was born as a result of the success of Birchenwood, and the first houses built were to provide homes for the workers and their families.(http://www.btinternet.com/~newchapelvillage/newchapelvillage/birchenwoodhistory.htm) External links * Newchapel Village Newchapel Village History and photo gallery* Harriseahead and Newchapel: a brief moment in time A brief History of Harriseahead and Newchapel  * Thursfield History History of Newchapel and the Thursfield family 1500-2000. References pl:Newchapel
8496326
Burnbank_Fell
 long_d-3.375Burnbank Fell is a small hill in the west of the English District. It is the most westerly of the Fells, a group of low grassy hills lying just south of Loweswater. The hill is predominantly grassy with sprawling flanks and a broad ridge connecting it to Fell. It can be climbed from Lamplugh in the west, or from Waterend on the lakeshore.TopographyThe Fells occupy a triangular sector of the Lake District, bordered by the River Cocker to the north east and Wasdale to the south east. Westwards the hills diminish toward the coastal plain of Cumberland. At the central hub of the high country are Gable and its satellites, while two principal ridges fan out on either flank of Ennerdale, the western fells in effect being a great horseshoe around this long wild valley.(Wainwright: A Pictorial Guide to the Lakeland Fells, Volume 7 The Western Fells: Westmorland Gazette (1966): ISBN 0-7112-2460-9) Burnbank Fell and the other Loweswater Fells form the extremity of the northern arm.The Loweswater Fells have been compared( to the digits of a hand, radiating out south westward from the palm centred on Loweswater village. From the west these are Burnbank Fell, Blake Fell, Fell, Comb and Mellbreak, the thumb.Burnbank Fell marks the north western perimeter of the Lakeland Fells, its feet set on the boundary of the National Park. Beyond lie the valley of the River Marrom and the industrial towns of the coastal plain. Beyond the park boundary is the low double top of Mockerkin How (810 ft), standing above Mockerkin Tarn. This is a natural waterbody, known for its water lillies and stocked with eel, pike and perch. It is associated with several local legends, including that of a sunken town.(Blair, Don: Exploring Lakeland Tarns: Lakeland Manor Press (2003): ISBN 0-9543-9041-5)The north eastern flanks of Burnbank Fell are much steeper, with some crags on the upper slopes overlooking Loweswater. Lower down the fellside is Holme Wood, an attractive background to views across the lake. Holme Beck runs down through the trees, forming the boundary between Burnbank Fell and Blake Fell to the south. High up in the woods is Holme Force, an attractive parallel pair of waterfalls.(Blair, Don: Exploring Lakeland Waterfalls: Lakeland Manor Press (2002): ISBN 0-9543-9040-7)A west ridge drops from the summit across an easy grassy saddle to Owsen Fell (1,342 ft). This is generally considered a part of Burnbank Fell ( although some guidebooks differ.(Birkett, Bill: Complete Lakeland Fells: Collins Willow (1994): ISBN 0-0021-8406-0) Owsen Fell descends to the village of Lamplugh, conifer plantations being operated on the lower slopes. All drainage from Owsen Fell and the western slopes drains to the River Marron and ultimately the Derwent.Geology and MiningThe summit area is composed of the laminated mudstone and siltstone of the Kirk Stile Formation. The eastern slopes show outcropping of the Loweswater Formation of greywacke sandstone turbidities.(British Geological Survey: 1:50,000 series maps, England & Wales Sheet 29: BGS (1999))The Survey Explorer map series show abandoned mine levels above Wisenholme Beck and some surface extraction near the summit. Wainwright shows a further old level on the eastern slopes.(Summit and ViewThe top of Burnbank Fell is a rounded grassy dome, the summit marked by an old fence post and small cairn. The Lakeland view is greatly restricted by Blake Fell although there is a vista of the Northern and Western Fells. Loweswater is hidden by the slope although Water comes into view a few paces to the north east. The view of the coast, of Man, Firth and Criffel is uninterrupted.(AscentsFrom Lamplugh the obvious line is up Owsen Fell, although there is doubt over right of access. From Waterend at the head of Loweswater, the route starts via Hudson Place farm and passes into Holme Wood. Various paths can then be taken to the summit. Two paths contour the fell on this side, one on the lakeshore and another terrace above the woods. Both provide pleasant walking in their own right. Fangs Brow farm can be used as an access point to the terrace path from the north.((References(
8514003
St_Pirans_Day
St Pirans Day ( is the national day of Cornwall,()()() held on 5 March every year. The day is named after one of the saints of Cornwall, Piran, who is also the patron saint of tinminers. Origins St Pirans Day started as one of the many tinners holidays observed by the tin miners of Cornwall. Other miners holidays of a similar nature include Day and Thursday. There is little description of specific traditions associated with this day. However, many observers noted the large consumption of alcohol and food during Perrantide. The day following the St Pirans Day was known by many as Mazey Day, a term which has now been adopted by the revived Golowan festival in Penzance. The phrase drunk as a perraner was used in 19th century Cornwall to describe people who had consumed large quantities of alcohol. Modern celebrations The modern observance of St Pirans day as a national symbol of the people of Cornwall started in the late 19th and early 20th century when Celtic revivalists sought to provide the people of Cornwall with a national day similar to those observed in other nations. Since the 1950s, the celebration has become increasingly observed and since the start of the 21st century almost every Cornish community holds some sort of celebration to mark the event. Pirans Flag is also seen flying throughout Cornwall on this day.St Pirans day is also celebrated annually in Valley, California, States, to honour the Cornish miners who participated in the areas mining history beginning in the mid 19th century.()St Pirans Day Bank Holiday proposalIn 2006, Cornish MP Rogerson asked the government to make the 5th of March a public holiday in Cornwall to recognise celebrations for St Pirans Day. More recently, there has been a petition for the holiday. Some council workers in Bodmin were granted the holiday in 2006,() and there have been other calls and petitions for a Cornish public holiday on the 5th of March. From 2009 Penzance Town Council will offer its employees a St Pirans Day Holiday following a campaign by the Celtic League.(Celtic League - St Piran bank holiday) See also *Thursday another tin miners celebration.*Day another tin miners celebration.References( External links *St Pirans Day on the BBC*BBC St Piran holiday call for Duchy*St Pirans Day images from Newlyns fishing industry*St Pirans Day Events 2011  Peran
8526404
Jeanmarie_Simpson
 years_active            1972present Jeanmarie Simpson (born November 20, 1959) is an American activist and theatre/film artist. Early life Simpson was born in Ray, Arizona. Her parents are Maria Luisa Jugo, a Venezuelan immigrant, and Donald Leroy Simpson, an American mining engineer. Jeanmarie Simpson was raised in rural Arizona. Her familys move to Toronto, Canada in 1970 led to her theatre training.(http://asinglewomanmovie.com/jeanmarie-simpson-crew.html)(http://korepress.org/CIHAbout.htm) Career She was founding artistic director of the Shakespeare Company, from which she retired in 2008.(http://nevada-shakespeare.org/Theatre_Company/About_NSC.html)Simpson appeared in the American premier of the one-woman play, Will, by Canadian playwright, Thiessen. The production was presented by Theatre 40 in Hills, California, and was produced by Nimoy.(http://www.leonardnimoy.de/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&id573:shakespears-will&catid28:producer&Itemid16)File:Jeanmarie Simpson and Judd Nelson.jpg|thumb|upright|Jeanmarie Simpson with actor Nelson on the set of A Single Woman, the film. She starred in the film version of her play, A Single Woman, based on the life of first US Congresswoman and lifelong pacifist, Rankin. The film was produced by Heroica Films and directed by Lopez, a cousin of Simpsons. Though the project includes the voices of many celebrities, including Sheen, Coyote, Nelson and Arquette and includes in its soundtrack the iconic Mitchell songs Woodstock and Game, the film has not been picked up by a distributor, nor has it had a theatrical release.(http://asinglewomanmovie.com) In November 2008, Simpson was interviewed on the radio show, Insight, hosted by Jeffrey Callison on Capitol Public Radio, Sacramento, Californias NPR affiliate. During the interview, Simpson disclosed that she had retained an attorney because of issues between herself and Lopez. (http://capradio.org/programs/insight/default.aspx?showid5466) In February 2010, she was quoted in the Reno News and Review saying, Terrible movie. Its just badly, badly conceived, badly done. The director made a mess of it. Its really too bad because its a fantastic story, and its a wonderful, worthy subject, as you know. But it justthe film is a disaster.(http://www.newsreview.com/reno/content?oid1369507) In October of 2011, Simpson is quoted in the Post saying of the film,Thats probably the biggest disappointment of my life.(http://www.huffingtonpost.com/dylan-brody/jeanmarie-simpson_b_985669.html)In September of 2009, Simpson opened in Arizona in the one-woman show, Coming In Hot, based on the book Powder: writing by women in the ranks from Vietnam to Iraq. The show subsequently toured extensively, and garnered praise and also a fair amount of criticism by peace activists who thought it glorified war.(http://www.newsreview.com/reno/content?oid1861571)(http://www.huffingtonpost.com/dylan-brody/just-the-facts-maam-a-rev_b_761525.html)(http://www.tucsonsentinel.com/arts/report/092310_cominginhot)(http://wildcat.arizona.edu/wildlife/coming-in-hot-designed-to-spark-discussion-1.1572491?MModetrue)(http://www.prlog.org/10866546-boulder-actress-is-coming-in-hot.html)As of February 2011, Simpson toured with readings of Marys Joy - the anatomy of a martyr, her play based on the life of Dyer, the first colonial woman to be executed in the New World. Dyer was hanged June 1, 1660, for being a Quaker and refusing to stay out of Massachusetts. (http://mediaroots.org/interview-with-artivist-jeanmarie-simpson.php) Activism Jeanmarie Simpson is a Lifetime Member of the International League for Peace and Freedom (WILPF), sitting on the National Board of the US Section as of June, 2006. She has been a pacifist and human rights/peace activist since 1984, when she observed the disparity between the wealthy and socio-economically challenged members of society while working as a Special Projects Coordinator for Consolidated Agencies of Human Service in Nevada.(http://www.newsreview.com/sacramento/Content?oid33060)After 11, 2001, Simpson, a self-described artivist, retreated from traditional theatre and began creating biographical works, political in nature, based on the lives of historical women.(http://www.prlog.org/11271512-interview-with-an-artivist.html)(http://ondemand.azpm.org/videoshorts/watch/2009/10/8/kuat-coming-in-hot/)(http://www.huffingtonpost.com/dylan-brody/jeanmarie-simpson_b_985669.html)For the 10th Anniversary of 9/11, Simpson created an audio of her play about Jeannette Rankin. The video is titled Flight of the Dove, and is accompanied by visual art by Gene Hall and music by Vicki Brown. The video is based on the book with the same title, presented by Pink on their website, and can also be seen on Simpsons homepage.(http://www.huffingtonpost.com/dylan-brody/jeanmarie-simpson_b_985669.html)(http://codepink.nationbuilder.com/flight_of_the_dove)(http://jeanmariesimpson.wordpress.com/flight-of-the-dove-an-audio-of-the-play-with-images/)Her political commentaries can be found on Common Dreams. (http://www.commondreams.org/view/2008/10/20-3)(http://www.commondreams.org/view/2008/10/28-3)(http://www.commondreams.org/view/2008/10/14-0) Personal Life Simpson has been legally married three times. She was first married at 16, but that lasted only 5 months and was later annulled. From 1995 through January of 2007, she was in a relationship with Cameron David Crain, a waiter-turned actor who is now a drama teacher. They had a wedding ceremony in 1996, however they were never legally married. She is now married to artist and entomologist, Gene Hall, a contributor to the of Life Web Project. Simpson is the mother of Domenic Francis Stockton, Donald Paul Stockton and Emily Maria Harbaugh. She is the grandmother of Casey Joel Stockton. Current activities She now resides in Arizona and is theatre project specialist for the award-winning feminist publishing company, Press.(http://korepress.org/cominginhottourpage.htm) References  External links * Official Website* 
8534500
Crown_King,_Arizona
blank1_info               May 15, 1954Crown King is an unincorporated community in Yavapai County, Arizona, States, located at an elevation of 5,771 feet (1,759 m).(  Crown King has a Code of 86343; in 2000, the population of the 86343 ZCTA was 133.(http://factfinder.census.gov/servlet/SAFFPopulation?_eventSearch&_zip86343) The site of a former mining town, Crown King is 28 miles west of 17 on Highway, high in the Mountains. The community is named after the Crowned King mine, but the name was shortened to Crown King in 1888. Basin Lake resides 6.5 miles southeast of Crown King on Crown King Rd/Forest 259 Rd.An estimated US$2,000,000 in gold was taken from the Crowned King Mine alone; the mines have been closed since the 1950s and for the past half-century tourism has been the only reliable source of income in the area.HistoryThe first recorded gold claim in Crown King was Buckeye and was filed by Rod McKinnon on July 1, 1875. Over the next 40 years, more than 15 mines or claims were made in the area.At its height, the town had 500 buildings, including several company stores and boarding houses, two Chinese restaurants and a post office. The town was electrified by 1897 and had one telephone at that time.While an active mining town, Crown King was served by the Mountain Railroad. Rail service to the area began in 1904 upon completion of Impossible Railroad  a series of switchbacks and trestles that ascended the mountain terrain between Cleator and Crown King.Crown King was the terminus (19041926) of the railroad, built by M. Murphy to serve the mines of the southern Mountains. However, these mines were never very productive, and the BMRR was a financial failure. The line was abandoned in 1926. Much of the road to Crown King uses the old railbed.(John W. Sayre, 1985, Ghost Railroads of Central Arizona, Boulder, Colo.: Pruett, ISBN 0-87108-683-2)Of the buildings still standing and in use in Crown King, the Crown King Restaurant and Saloon has become the center of activity in the town. The building itself has an interesting history. It was originally constructed in the nearby mining town of Oro Belle (now also a ghost town) and having been brought to Crown King in 1910 in pieces, on the backs of mules, when Oro Belle closed. The building was home to a brothel and bar in both towns.  The red one-room schoolhouse was built in 1917 and still serves seven K-8 students today.The post office was established on July 29, 1888, and was discontinued on May 15, 1954.() It has since reopened inside the Crown King General Store.ReferencesFurther reading*Bruce M. Wilson, Crown King and the Southern Bradshaws: A Complete History, Mesa, Crown King Press, 1990, 104 pages. ISBN 0-0927573-0-6External links*Community website*Arizona Ghost Towns websiteKingKing, ArizonaKing
8544619
Thomas_Liddell,_1st_Baron_Ravensworth
Thomas Henry Liddell, 1st Baron Ravensworth (8 February 1775 &ndash; 7 March 1855), known as Sir Thomas Liddell, 6th Baronet, from 1791 to 1821, was a British peer and Tory politician. Life accountLiddell was the son of Henry Liddell, 5th Baronet and his wife Elizabeth Steele. His younger brother Henry Liddell, Rector of Easington (died 1872) was father of a younger Liddell, co-author (with Robert Scott) of the monumental work Greek-English LexiconHe succeeded his father in the baronetcy and to the family estates at Ravensworth Castle and Park and to extensive coal mining interests in 1791. He was Sheriff of Northumberland in 1804 and served as Tory of Parliament for County Durham between 1806 and 1807. On 17 July 1821 he was raised to the peerage as Baron Ravensworth, of Ravensworth Castle in the County Palatine of Durham and of Eslington Park in the County of Northumberland.At Ravensworth he demolished the old 1724 house in 1808 and replaced it with a substantial mansion in the Gothic style designed by architect John Nash. He also employed Stephenson from 1804 at his Killingworth colliery and encouraged and financed him in the development of steam power which was vital for the improvement of the efficiency of the wagonways which transported coal from the pit to the Tyne.He died in March 1855, aged 80, and was succeeded in his titles by his son Henry, who was created Earl of Ravensworth in 1874.Marriage and childrenOn 26 March 1796, Thomas married Maria Susannah Simpson. She was a daughter of John Simpson and Anne Lyon. Her maternal grandparents were Lyon, 8th Earl of Strathmore and Kinghorne and Jean Nicholsen. They had twelve children:*Thomas Liddell, 1st Earl of Ravensworth (10 March 1797 &ndash; 19 March 1878). *Maria Liddell (20 April 1798 - 20 October 1882). Married Phipps, 1st Marquess of Normanby. *Thomas Liddell (September 1800 - 9 March 1856). Married Caroline Elizabeth Barrington, daughter of Barrington, 5th Viscount Barrington.*Anne Elizabeth Liddell ( 1 November 1801- 4 November 1878). Married Hedworth Williamson, 7th Baronet. *Jane Elizabeth Liddell (29 September 1804 - 22 March 1883). Married Keppel Barrington, 6th Viscount Barrington. *Elizabeth Charlotte Liddell (17 August 1807-15 April 1890). Married Edward Ernest Villiers, a son of George Villiers and grandson of Villiers, 1st Earl of Clarendon. Their daughter Edith Villiers married Bulwer-Lytton, 1st Earl of Lytton.*Robert Liddell (24 September 1808 - 29 June 1888). Married Emily Ann Charlotte Wellesley, a daughter of Gerald Wellesley and granddaughter of Wesley, 1st Earl of Mornington*Susan Liddell (11 January 1810-22 November 1886). Married Yorke, 4th Earl of Hardwicke.*George Augustus Frederick Liddell (28 July 1812 - 14 December 1888). Cecil Elizabeth Jane Wellesley, another daughter of Gerald Wellesley and granddaughter of Garret Wesley, 1st Earl of Mornington.*Charlotte Amelia Liddell (1 February 1814 - 16 July 1883).  Married Captain John Trotter (2nd Lifeguards) of Dyrham Park and had issue.*Adolphus  Frederick Octavious  Liddell (15 January 1818 - 27 June 1885). Married Frederica Elizabeth Lane-Fox, daughter of George Lane-Fox and Georgiana Henrietta Buckley. Georgiana was a granddaughter of West, 2nd Earl De La Warr. *Georgiana Liddell (13 April 1822 - 21 May 1905). Married John Arthur Douglas Bloomfield, 2nd Baron Bloomfield.External links*His profile in Peerage.com*
8554912
Randolph_Bedford
Randolph Bedford (born George Randolph Bedford() 27 June( 1868  7 July 1941) was an Australian poet, novelist, short story writer and Queensland state politician.  Early lifeBedford was born in Camperdown, Sydney, the son of Alfred Bedford, who during 1859 migrated from Yorkshire, England and obtained work as a house painter. Educated at the Newtown state school. At 14 he was working with a Sydney solicitors firm as office-boy(. At 16 years of age he was working in the western district of South Wales, shooting rabbits. He carried copies of Carlyles French Revolution, Shakespeare and the Bible. He worked for a year as a clerk in Hay and in Wagga Wagga joined up with a repertory company run by Edmund Duggan.(Literary careerBedford had a short story accepted by Bulletin in 1886, the first of many contributions. In 1888 he worked for a time on the Argus (Hill, NSW), and in 1889 on The Age, Melbourne for about two years.Freelancing followed, verse, short stories and sketches, written while travelling in Australia searching for payable mining fields. From 1901 to 1904 Bedford was in Europe and wrote a series of travel sketches. In 1916 these were collected and published under the title of Explorations in Civilization. His first novel, True Eyes and the Whirlwind, appeared in London in 1903, and his Snare of Strength was published two years later. Three short novels appeared afterwards in the Bookstall series, Billy Pagan, Mining Engineer (1911), The Silver Star (1917) and Aladdin and the Boss Cockie (1919), the latter also adapted into a play in four acts. He had also made a collection of his Bulletin verse in 1904, however the unbound sheets were all burned during a fire at the printers, except about six copies which were bound without title-page and apparently given to friends. A few years before his death, Bedford stated that he did not regret the fire as some of the verses included could only be excused on account of his extreme youth at the time of writing. He was then preparing a selection of his verse for the press which, however, was not published. Other short stories included: Fourteen Fathoms by Quetta Rock and The Language of Animals.With Australian authors Lawson and Daley et al., he was a member of the elite and Dusk Club.Political careerIn 1917 Bedford entered the Legislative Council, on a platform to secure its abolition (which occurred in 1922). In 1923 he was elected as Labor candidate to the Legislative Assembly for Warrego, a seat which he held until his resignation in 1937 to contest the Maranoa seat for the Federal House of Representatives. He was defeated, but was again elected to his old seat in the Legislative Assembly. He had an impatient streak and was not elected to cabinet.BibliographyNovels*True Eyes and the Whirlwind (1903)*The Snare of Strength (1905)*Sops of Wine (1909)*Billy Pagan Mining Engineer (1911)*The Mates of Torres (1911)*The Lady of the Pickup (1911)*The Silver Star (1917)*Aladdin and the Boss Cockie (1919)Non-Fiction*Explorations in Civilization (1914)Autobiography*Naught to Thirty-Three (1944)ReferencesAdditional sources listed by the Dictionary of Australian Biography::The Courier-Mail, Brisbane, 8 July 1941; The Bulletin, 16 July 1941; The Worker, Brisbane, 8 July 1941; E. Morris Miller, Australian Literature; Nettie Palmer, Modern Australian Literature; See also, Randolph Bedford, Naught to Thirty-three.(Additional sources listed by the Australian Dictionary of Biography::G. Blainey, Mines in the Spinifex (Syd, 1960); C. Lack (ed), Three Decades of Queensland Political History, 1929-1960 (Brisb, 1962); N. Lindsay, Bohemians of the Bulletin (Syd, 1965); L. A. Lindsay, Comedy of Life (Syd, 1967); R. Lindsay, Model Wife (Syd, 1967); Overland, no 26, 1963; Bulletin, 12 Feb 1894, 4 Jan 1912; Australasian (Melbourne), 30 Oct 1920; Sydney Morning Herald, 4 June 1924, 26 Oct 1929, 18 Nov 1933, 9 Feb, 28 July 1934, 6 Feb, 30, 31 May 1935; Bedford papers (State Library of Queensland); Alfred Deakin papers (National Library of Australia); A1 and A3 series lists (National Archives of Australia).
8567712
River_Carron_(Forth)
The River Carron (Gaelic: Abhainn Carrann) is a river in central Scotland.  This river has given its name to towns in Falkirk, a variety of regional features, a type of cannon, a line of bathtubs, two warships and an island in the Hemisphere.River CarronThe river rises in the Fells before flowing into Reservoir.It passes by Denny, then between Larbert and Falkirk past the village of Carron before flowing into the of Forth near Grangemouth.()Carron BridgeThe Carron Bridge (also called Carronbridge as evidenced by the name of the local Carronbridge Hotel) crosses the Carron at the eastern extremity of Strathcarron Forest.  It was built in 1695 to replace a ford that had existed for many hundreds of years as part of an old road from Kilsyth to Stirling.  This bridge, with its two span stone arches, looks larger than it needs to be because the river was much larger before Carron Dam was built to create a reservoir in the 1930s.Historical referencesThe river is thought by some to be the Itys described by Ptolemy in Geographia, his extensive 2nd century compilation of geographical knowledge.(A historical perspective, drawn from the Ordnance Gazetteer of Scotland: A Survey of Scottish Topography, Statistical, Biographical and Historical edited by Francis H. Groome and originally published in parts by Thomas C. Jack, Grange Publishing Works, Edinburgh between 1882 and 1885.)Nennius, the Welsh historian of the 9th century, believed the name of the Carron was derived from Carausius, the 3rd century Roman commander who declared  himself emperor of Britannia and northern Gaul.(William Nimmos History of Stirlingshire, Chapter XXXII  Rivers and Lochs originally published in 1777 and revised by R. Gillispie in 1880 edition.)According to the Ossian poems of Macpherson, the waterways name is Gaelic in origin and means winding river.  Another etymology which is just as plausible is that the rivers original name was is derived from the Brythonic word Caeravon meaning river of the caers alluding to the Roman fortifications built on its banks as a barrier between their territory and that of the Picts.(In the 17th century, William Nimmo described the river and region as follows:The whole length of its course, from west to east, is some 14 miles, the first half of which is spent among bleak hills and rocks, but, when it has reached the low grounds, its banks are fertile and wooded, and, as it advances, the neighbouring soil increases in richness and value. ..The stream is small comparatively, yet there is no river in Scotland whose surroundings have been the scene of so many memorable events....A short distance from its source, the river enters the Carron Bog. This vast plain and meadow... is Considerably elevated above the ocean, it occupies part of the table-land between the eastern and western coasts. It has, probably, been a lake at no very distant period, and gradually filled by the hill brooks washing down debris. Part, indeed, is a swamp scarcely passable at any time, but nearly inundated by every heavy rain....in the division called Temple Denny, the Carron, having worn a hollow channel in the rock, forms a beautiful cascade, by pouring its contracted stream over a precipice above 20 feet in height. ..When the river is in flood, and a triumphant torrent sweeps down the glen, this cascade is unsurpassed among Scottish streams for the grandeur of its storm of spray. ..Over the serpentine road down-hill to Denny the spirit of beauty everywhere prevails. The intervening district, indeed, is famous for its pastoral undulations; and from almost every breezy brae-top a charming view is got of the wooded banks of the river  foliage which, even in the present green-tide, displays all the variety of autumnal richness.(The river is also referred to in the language song Lads O the Fair:For ye can see them a, the lads o the fairLads frae the Forth an the Carron WaterWorkin lads an lads wi gearLads thatll sell ye the provosts dochterSogers back frae the German WarsPeddlers up frae the Border(Lads O the Fair by Brian McNeill  Some recorded versions have slightly different words but all include the Carron Water reference.)Strathcarron areaAs mentioned above, the terrain in and around Strathcarron is rough and scenic.  Munros and Corbetts jut skyward from the landscape.  As such, the region attracts birdwatchers, anglers, geocachers and orienteering enthusiasts, hikers, hill and mountain climbers, hunters bikers, photographers and sight-seers.Strathcarron Loch / Carron Valley ReservoirThe  Strathcarron Reservoir, completed in 1939 is one of the most scenic trout fisheries in central Scotland.  Situated high in the Fells yet only twenty minutes from Stirling and half an hour from Glasgow, the loch offers scenic vistas and fishing for a combination of wild trout and trout stocked by Carron Valley Fishery.(Carron Valley Fly Fishing)The reservoir has proved to be an ideal habitat for the Carrons indigenous trout population.  Thriving on the rich feeding of the newly flooded strath and with easy access to its many excellent spawning and nursery streams, the wild brownies of Strathcarron Reservoir are numerous.(The Carron WorksThe Company (also known as the Carron Works) was an ironworks established in 1759 on the north bank of the River Carron two miles north of Falkirk.  This company was at the forefront of the Revolution in the Kingdom.(Watters, Brian & Donald, John.  Where Iron Runs Like Water! A new history of Carron Iron Works 1759-1982, 1998.)(One might assume that Verney-Carron, Frances number one manufacturer of hunting guns, acquired Carron Companys munitions interests.  However, as explained in the  History of that company, (...) This event marked the beginning of the firm renamed Verney-Carron in 1830, after Claude Verney married Antoinette Carron, herself a daughter and grand-daughter of gunsmiths, (...) that it is simply the surname of this very old companys founders and owners and is unrelated to the company in Falkirk.)The companys local coal mining operations were known as the Carron Collieries.  The villages of Carronhall and Carronshore contained dwellings for miners and factory workers.  This area was serviced by the Carron Branch Railway.(Through the factorys products, the rivers name passed to the naval cannon called the carronade.  These big guns were used during in Wars in melees such as the of Trafalgar as well as various naval battles during the Civil War.(Cannons and Carronades) Carron Company was broken up in 1982 and various parts of the company closed down, Carron Bathrooms Ltd http://www.carronbathrooms.com who manufacture Acrylic Baths and shower trays, and Carron Phoenix http://www.carron.com who manufacture kitchen sinks, are still in existence.WarshipsHMS Carron was planned as a class frigate but the design was changed and she was renamed HMS Gerrans Bay in mid-construction.  Completed in 1944, she served in War II and eventually ended up as HMS Surprise, a class frigate.(Loch Class Frigate Association)The USS Carronade (named after the cannon that was named after the river), was a ship of the Navy that was completed in 1955.  Finished too late to serve in the War, she was taken out of service but re-commissioned for the War.  She was decommissioned again in 1969.(USS Carronade - IFS 1)Carronade IslandIn July 1916,  was on wartime patrol and came to a small island on the northern coast of Australia.  The crew discovered two bronze cannons standing six feet apart and pointing into the air.(Maritime Archaeology Department of the Western Australian Maritime Museum An investigation of one of the two bronze guns from Carronade Island, Western Australia)(Green, Jeremy N. The Carronade Island guns and Australias early visitors. Great circle, Vol.4, no.1 (1982), p.73-83.)Since at the time these guns were erroneously thought to be carronades, the island on which they had been found was named Island after this discovery.  Several 20th century observers misconstrued the origin of these guns and they were long thought to give weight to the of Portuguese discovery of Australia.  However, scientists at the Australian Museum in Fremantle have recently made a detailed analysis and have determined that these weapons are almost certainly of Makassan, rather than European, origin.((See also*Company*of Sites of Special Scientific Interest in Falkirk and Clackmannan*of Sites of Special Scientific Interest in Nithsdale*Stenhousemuir*Community WoodlandNotesReferences**External links*Carron Bridge Area* Forth District Salmon Fishery Board* River Forth Fisheries Trust* River Carron Regeneration page* website to become active October 2010 Communities Along the Carron Associationpl:Carron
8575803
Ford_Castle
Forde Castle is a Grade 1 listed building and a Scheduled Ancient Monument situated at a shallow crossing point on the Till, Ford, Northumberland, England.The castle dates from about 1278. The owner Sir William Heron was granted a licence to crenellate the castle in 1338.  It was captured by the Scots in 1385 and dismantled by them.  However by the beginning of the 16th century it had been rebuilt and refortified.  It was taken by IV of Scotland on the eve of the of Flodden Field in 1513. The castle passed from the Heron family to the Carr family by marriage in 1549 and again by marriage passed to Sir Francis Blake of Cogges, Oxfordshire in the 1660s.Blake built a substantial mansion in Tudor style within the castle in 1694. On Blakes death in 1717 the Ford estate passed to the husband of his late daughter Mary and then in 1723 to her son Blake Delaval (1693&ndash;1752). In 1761 Delaval, 1st Baron Delaval (1728&ndash;1808) rebuilt the Hall with the assistance of architect George Ruffield in a Gothic style.left|thumb|Ford Castle gateOn his death the property passed to his granddaughter Susannah who had married the of Waterford. In 1862 Louisa, Dowager Marchioness of Waterford (d 1891), widow of the 3rd Marquess, restored and substantially remodelled the Hall.The castle was acquired in 1907 by the coal-mining magnate Joicey, 1st Baron Joicey and it remains in the ownership of his family, although since 1956 it has been leased to County Council as a Young Persons Residential Centre.References*Ford Castle 1*  Images and History of Ford Castle*Ford Castle 2*  Gazetteer Historical Castles*Fry, Plantagenet Somerset, The David & Charles Book of Castles, David & Charles, 1980. ISBN 0-7153-7976-3
8585501
Antoine_Marc_Gaudin
Antoine Marc Gaudin (August 8, 1900  August 23, 1974) was a distinguished American mineral engineer, a professor at the Institute of Technology, and a founding member of the Academy of Engineering.Gaudin was born in Smyrna, Turkey, where his father was a railroad general manager and archaeologist. He was educated in Haifa, Versailles, and Toulon, then attended universities in Paris and Aix-en-Provence from which he received his bachelor degrees in 1916 and 1917, respectively. He followed his father to the United States in 1917 to enter the School of Engineering and Applied Science, from which he received his Engineer of Mines degree in 1921. After brief interludes in industry, Gaudin returned to Columbia in 1924 as a lecturer. In 1926 he became an American citizen. From 1926-1929 he taught at the of Utah, and from 1929-1939 was professor at the Montana School of Mines. He then assumed a professorship at MIT in 1939, which he retained until his retirement in 1966. In War II and subsequently, Gaudin led an MIT team extracting uranium from low-grade ore.For his distinguished career in education, Gaudin was awarded several of the highest honors bestowed by the American Institute of Mining, Metallurgical, and Petroleum Engineers. References * National Academy memorial tribute
8585639
Ronald_F._Tylecote
Ronald Frank Tylecote (15 June 1916  17 June 1990) was a British archaeologist and metallurgist, generally recognised as the founder of the sub-discipline of archaeometallurgy.Education and professionThe son of doctor Edward Tylecote, he was born in Manchester and educated at School.  He obtained an MA from Hall, Cambridge in 1938, and an MSc from the of Manchester in 1942, and a PhD on the oxidation of copper from the of London in 1952.After a period in industry working as a welding research engineer, he became an ICI Research Fellow at of London.  In 1953 he was appointed as a lecturer at University, where he became a Reader in Archaeometallurgy, a post from which he retired in September 1978.  In 1976 he began teaching Archaeometallurgy at the of Archaeology, College London, which led to him becoming an honorary Professor there in 1979.WorkHis early publications on metallurgy include The solid phase welding of metals (1968).  He participated in his first archaeological excavation in 1939, and became known for combining the two interests. Tylecote investigated early mining and smelting sites around the world, including Timna in Israel and the Roman silver mines of Rio Tinto in Spain. He also excavated sites in Sudan, Nigeria, Turkey, Iran and Afghanistan. A notable study was The Wertime Pyrometallurgical Expedition of 1968. Other work included Metallurgy in Archaeology: a Prehistory of Metallurgy in the British Isles (1962), which became the standard reference work, and The Early History of Metallurgy in Europe(1987). In 1976 he published A History of Metallurgy, and completed the revised second edition just before his death.   In 1962, with G. R. Morton, he founded the Historical Metallurgy Group, initially as a group within the and Steel Institute, and edited its first Bulletin, published in April 1963.  He remained its editor for the rest of his life, as the group became the Historical Metallurgy Society, and the Bulletin became a journal, Historical Metallurgy.  He is commemorated in the R. F. Tylecote Library of Archaeometallurgical Literature at College, London, the R. F. Tylecote Fund at the same institution, and in the grant-giving R. F. Tylecote Memorial Fund of the Historical Metallurgy Society.  Following his death the Society published tributes to him from other scholars with whom he had worked, together with a list of his publications.(Professor Ronald Frank Tylecote, 1916-1990, Historical Metallurgy 25(1) (1991), 1-20.) Personal life Having originally married Angela (ne Lias, daughter of journalist and writer Lias) whom he divorced in 1950, he married his second wife, Elizabeth Cornelia Johanna (ne Reventlow) in 1958. Elizabeth was born in the city of Snderborg in 1912, which was then part of Schleswig-Holstein, but became part of Denmark after 1918. Having been born in Snderborg Castle, she had previously changed her name to Berndt, to avoid association with pro-Nazi elements of the aristocratic Reventlow family, and spent much of War II in Palestine and Egypt. Both Ronald and Elizabeth Tylecote maintained pro-Communist sympathies until the Russian invasion of Hungary in 1956. His son, Tylecote is an economist. References *Biography from Minnesota State University*R. F. Tylecote (1992) A History of Metallurgy Institute of Materials ISBN 0-901462-88-8
8598622
Coat_of_Arms_of_Lethbridge
right|thumb|300px|Coat of Arms of LethbridgeThe Coat of Arms of Lethbridge is an official symbol of the city of Lethbridge, Alberta. It was designed by Reverend John Stanley Chivers and adopted on September 16, 1907.()The shield is a roundel with three divisions, blue (azure), red (gules) and brown (ochre), with charges depicting a locomotive (for transportation), a sheave of wheat (for agriculture) and a hand with pickaxe (for coal mining) as the foundation of the early economy of the city. A circular scroll reads City of Lethbridge  1890  1906, the town and city incorporation years respectively.The compartment consists of a panoramic Alberta scene portraying strip farming and a mine tipple against a background of mountains and foothills. It rests on the city motto: Ad occasionis januam (Latin for Gateway to Opportunity).(A crown in the crest symbolises the city status and Canadas allegiance to the British crown.NotesExternal links*City of Lethbridge
8611840
Lingbao
Lingbao may refer to:* School (), branch of Taoism* City (), county-level city of Sanmenxia, Henan, China* Gold (), gold mining company headquartered in Lingbao City(homonymie)
8626826
Crosskeys_College
Crosskeys College is the largest part of Gwent and the campus is located next to Risca Road in Crosskeys, near Newport in Wales.  The college was previously a technical college and a mining college.  However, since the demise of heavy industry in the area over the past decades, the college has now become the leading further education establishment in the area. Many of the schools in the area are without a sixth-form and so they feed Crosskeys college with students.  The majority of students in Crosskeys are studying AS & A2 levels, of which there are over 30 to choose from.  There are also BTECs, National Diplomas, GNVQs and GCSEs that are available to study. It boasts a 100% pass rate on the vast majority of its courses.The main feeder schools for post-GCSE leavers are:*Comprehensive School*Comprehensive School*Comprehensive School*Comprehensive School*Community SchoolThere are however a number of students from High School, Comprehensive School, as well as a large, growing number of students from the Vale and Newport secondary schoolsExternal links*Crosskeys College Website*Coleg Gwent Website*Newbridge Comprehensive Website
8633879
James_Terry_Gardiner
James Terry Gardiner (May 6, 1842&ndash;September 10, 1912) was an American surveyor and engineer. Gardiner was born in New York, the son of Daniel Gardiner and Ann Terry Gardiner. He briefly attended Polytechnic Institute and the Scientific School.  In 1863 he traveled on horseback to California with his boyhood friend, King.  Upon his arrival in San Francisco, he worked for the United States Engineer Corp as a civilian assistant and participated in the construction of fortifications at Black Point (now Fort Mason) and Angel Island.In the spring of 1864 Gardiner joined the California Geological Survey under the leadership of  Whitney. His friend King was already working with the survey  as a field geologist.  That summer they participated in the first scientific survey of the Sierra Nevada high country.  During the next few years he remained with the survey and traveled through much of California.  In 1867 Gardiner joined the Fortieth Parallel Survey, led by King, and  then joined the Survey in 1872 serving as chief topographer until 1876.  Thereafter, Gardiner returned to New York where he was appointed director of the State Survey .  From 1880 to 1886 he was also a member of the state board of health and was instrumental in establishing proper sewage systems throughout New York.Meanwhile he became involved in the mining industry, writing a report on coal and iron in Colorado (1875); serving as vice-president of the coal companies belonging to the Erie Railroad; and becoming president of the Mexican Coke and Coal Company in 1899.Gardiner married Josephine Rogers of Oakland, California in 1868. She died four years later and in 1881 he married Eliza Greene Doane of Albany, New York.Gardiner in Canyon National Park was named in his honor by the California Geological Survey.(  )(  )The family named had been spelled Gardiner until his father dropped the i.  James used this form until mid-life when he returned to the earlier spelling. References *James Terry Gardiner. Dictionary of American Biography Base Set. American Council of Learned Societies, 1928-1936. *James Terry Gardiner. Footnote by Francis P. Farquhar, editor. Up and Down California in 1860-1864: The Journal of William H. Brewer.
8648022
Iron_and_Steel_Institute
#REDIRECT of Materials, Minerals and Mining
8660848
The_Tail_of_Beta_Lyrae
The Tail of Beta Lyrae is a 1983 game for the Atari family of computers, created by Price with music by Gilbertson, and published by Datamost.PremiseThe Tail of Beta Lyrae is a side-scrolling combat game that puts you in the role of a Wing Commander assigned to the Beta Quadrant.  Alien forces have occupied the mining colonies in the asteroid fields of the Lyrae binary star system, and its up to you to pilot your fighter through the fields, destroying the alien invaders and their installations.Creator Philip Price states that the tail in the games name came from a play on telling a tale and the setting of a binary star system which only had fragments of rock orbiting it because of the tidal forces brought on by the two suns; these fragments are the tail of the systems creation. http://www.dadgum.com/halcyon/BOOK/PRICE.HTMGameplayThough not strictly a clone, The Tail of Beta Lyrae closely parallels the concept and feel of 1981s popular Scramble arcade game and its successors.  As the landscape scrolls past, the player uses a joystick to move the ship around the screen, avoiding attacks from laser and missile emplacements and destroying buildings, power generators, vessels and alien miners.  The landscape and configuration of objects is generated pseudo-randomly (within both design and game play difficulty constraints), adding a degree of unpredictability to the game. Game design also added new objects to levels already played after the user had owned the game for a time in order to add new excitement to experienced areas.
8678798
Adelong,_New_South_Wales
Adelong is a small town in the Riverina region of South Wales, Australia and is a part of the Shire.  The Adelong district has a population of about 1400, while Adelong itself has a population of 829 people.()The town is situated about 160 kilometres west of Canberra.  It is on the Mountains Highway.  The towns name is said to be derived from an Aboriginal language meaning along the way or plain with a river.()It was settled about 1840 to 1850 before gold was found. The initial discovery of gold at Adelong by a Mr Williams took place in 1857, the find being located on the crest of Victoria Hill and representing the weathered capping of the Old Hill Reef. Alluvial gold, both in Adelong Creek and Golden Gully is also believed to have been discovered at about the same time, and the field quickly developed into an important producer. Adelong Post Office opened on 1 January 1859.()By 1859 a number of prominent lines of mineralisation were being actively exploited. The two most prominent lines of mineralisation, the Old Reef and the Victoria, produced some 3,798 kilograms of gold during the period 1857-1876. During the gold rush the population expanded to more than 30,000 people. Over 25 tonnes of gold was mined from 1857 to the close of the mine in 1914. Adelongs importance in Australias early mining history has been recognised by the National Trust of Australia with a large section of the main street as well as a number of impressive early buildings being classified.thumb|left|The Morts Dock built locomotive used on the tramwayA number of narrow-gauge tramlines were laid throughout the mine area. Adelong is one of the only two gold mining areas in New South Wales known to have employed a steam locomotive on its tramways.(The Perseverance Gold-mining Company Tramway Madden, Rod & Longworth, Jim Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, February, 1998 pp54-60) The gold ran out in the latter part of the 19th century and the pastoral industry became the principal activity. This was mainly Merino sheep and beef cattle, and continues now. Over the last 20 years a tourist industry has developed because of the pleasant scenery and gold mining history.During the gold rush many Chinese people worked in the mines, a lot of whom died and were buried in a special portion of the Adelong cemetery. Unfortunately the Chinese portion of the cemetery was obliterated in the early 1900s. One or two elderly Chinese and Indians still lived in Adelong in the 1950s. A community named Cornishtown existed about a mile to the west of Adelong till the 1940s.(http://www.historyaustralia.org.au/ifhaa/towns/adelong.htm Internet Family History Association of Australia Retrieved on 2008-10-01) The famous Adelong Falls, with its rich gold-mining past, is an ideal spot to have a leisurely picnic or to explore the unique surrounding area.Image:AdelongOldGoldOreCrusher.jpg|thumb|250px|left|Adelong - Old Gold Ore Crusher situated in the main streetNotesfr:Adelongnl:AdelongNew South Wales
8689044
Hoover_Medal
The Hoover Medal is an American engineering prize.It has been given since 1930 for outstanding extra-career services by engineers to humanity. The prize is given jointly by the Institute of Chemical Engineers, Institute of Mining, Metallurgical, and Petroleum Engineers, Society of Civil Engineers, of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and Society of Mechanical Engineers (which administers it). Past recipientsPast recipients include:* 1930 Hoover* 1936 Swasey* 1938 Frank Stevens* 1940 Dunn* 1941 Robert Yarnall* 1942 Swope* 1944 E. Flanders* 1945 Henry Harrison* 1946 Bush* 1948 Pirnie* 1949 B. Jewett* 1950 T. Compton* 1951 L. Batt* 1952 D. Howe* 1954 P. Sloan, Jr.* 1955 F. Kettering* 1956 Hoover, Jr.* 1957 Turner* 1958 A. Wheeler* 1959 T. Heald* 1960 D. Eisenhower* 1961 J. Kelly* 1962 Lee Cisler* 1963 Rhyne Killian, Jr.* 1964 Alexander McCone* 1966 Moller Gilbreth* 1967 D. Clay* 1968 Harold Hartley* 1969 F. Kaiser* 1970 Erik Jonsson* 1971 A. Ferr* 1972 R. Kappel* 1973 Joseph Hedley* 1974 Packard* 1975 Boyd* 1976 B. Fisk* 1977 C. Goldmark* 1978 C. Burnham* 1979 M. Brinckerhoff* 1980 D. Bechtel, Jr.* 1981 O. Beckman* 1982 T. Halbouty* 1983 J. Jacobs* 1984 A. Roe* 1985 C. West* 1986 P. Grayson* 1987 Goland* 1988 R. Gianelli* 1989 J. McKetta* 1990 M. Rodgers* 1991 F. Topsoe* 1992 W. Schmitt* 1993 G. Salvadori* 1994 J. Carroll* 1995 Kamen* 1996 Hasan Nouri* 1997 J. Helweg* 1998 Earl Carter, Jr.* 2001 H. Stanley* 2002 H. Thornton* 2003 K. Thacker* 2005 Shoja* 2007 Amadei* 2008 Abdul Kalam, Former President of India External links * Hoover Medal
8703527
Abdul_Taib_Mahmud
 website  http://chiefministertaib.sarawak.gov.my/Pehin Sri Haji Abdul Taib bin Mahmud (born 21 May 1936 in Miri, Sarawak) is the fourth and current Minister of Sarawak.() He is also the state Financial Minister and Planning and Resource Management Minister. Taib is the President of Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu (PBB), which is part of the Nasional coalition.(No Umno in Sarawak) He is of ethnic Melanau descent.Taib was four years old when the Second World War broke out. Soon after Japanese troops landed in Miri in December 1941, Taibs father decided to move to his ancestral home in Mukah, where he felt his young family would be safe.()Taib is informally known as Pak Uban, which translates into white-haired uncle. Among Chinese speaking communities he is known as Bai Mao () which means white hair.(Ready to ride out the storm) Another informal name for him, in reference to the British Brooke family that ruled Sarawak as Rajahs in the 19th and early 20th century, is the last white rajah or white-haired rajah.() Holding the post of the Minister of Sarawak since 1981, he is the longest serving Chief Minister in Malaysia. He assumed the Chief Minister post at the age of 45.(Abdul Taib still undecided to contest in state election)() Being a member of the Parliament for 38 years, Taib is also the second longest-serving parliamentarian in Malaysia after Razaleigh Hamzah.()()  Taib and his wider family are regularly accused of corruption and personally benefiting from Sarawaks natural and economic resources.()FamilyTaibs son Sulaiman Abdul Rahman is married to Anisa, who is the daughter of Deputy Chief Minister of Sarawak Datuk Patinggi Tan Sri Dr George Chan Hong Nam.()His daughter, Jamilah Taib and husband Sean Murray are involved in property development in Ottawa, Canada.()Taibs mother, Hajah Hamidah Yakub died in Normah Specialist Medical Centre when Taib Mahmud was hospitalised in Singapore and underwent surgery to remove a suspected cancerous lump in his colon on 11 January 2006.()On 29 April 2009, Taibs wife Laila died of cancer. She was buried at the Demak Jaya cemetery in Kuching the following day.()On 3 June 2009, Taibs four-year-old granddaughter, Celestia Lulua Mahmud Abu Bekir, died two days after slipping into the swimming pool at her home at Duta Nusantara Condominium in Lumpur. Celestia was admitted to the intensive care unit of the Kuala Lumpur Hospital after the accident. She was buried at the Kiara Muslim Cemetery.()On 18 December 2010, he reportedly married for the second time to a Lebanese women in her early 30s, according to a daily Utusan Malaysia; however the wedding ceremony was held in private, attended only by his family members and 200 invited guests.() On 8 January 2011, he was seen together with his newly wed wife, Puan Sri Ragad Waleed Alkurdi attending a wedding reception of a former MP in Kuala Lumpur. Both of them held a wedding reception sometime in the middle of January,and the reception were held at the New Sarawak State Legislative Building Complex.()Early life and educationBorn in impoverished circumstances in 1936, Taib can nonetheless trace an aristocratic link to the Royal Court of Brunei.(Rentap, L. (2004) How About Auditing Bigger Fish Instead?. Aliran Monthly. vol 24: 112. Accessed on 5 July 2010) Taibs uncle, Rahman Yakub raised Taib since he was a boy.(Ross. M.L (2001). In Timber booms and institutional breakdown in Southeast Asia. Cambridge University Press. p. 149-151, 153, 156. ISBN 0-521-79167-7. Google Book Search. Retrieved on 1 December 2009.) Taib undertook his early schooling at St Josephs Primary School in Miri and St. Josephs Secondary School in  Kuching. After school, he was persuaded by Rahman Yakub to take up law.() In 1958, his excellent performance in the Senior Cambridge Examination earned him a Shell scholarship, allowing Taib to further his studies at the of Adelaide in South Australia. He graduated with a of Laws from the university in 1960. Since then, Taib Mahmud has written and published several Islamic books and other works including Muhammad and His Mission, Islam and Utility of Mankind, Freedom of Thought of Islam, and Appropriate Strategy for Developing Countries in a Period of Resource Scarcity.()Early political careerOn returning to Sarawak, Taib worked in the Crown Council from 1962 to 1963.(Bumiputera Sarawak) He then joined the State Legislative Council of Sarawak on 22 July 1963, where he was appointed state minister for Communication and Works from 1963 to 1966 and Minister of Development and Forestry in 1967.( In 1964, he became the vice-chairman of Parti Berjasa, Sarawak. On several occasions, Taib Mahmud acted as Chief Minister. He was the vice-chairman of Parti Berjasa Sarawak in 1964. Taib was appointed Federal Assistant Minister for Commerce and Industry from 1968 until 1970.(SAUA) He represented Parti Bumiputera Sarawak (BUMIPUTERA), which was a component party of Sarawak Alliance, in general election, 1969.(Malaysian Mirror) During the 1970 parliamentary election for Sarawak, he was elected as the member of Malaysian parliament for Samarahan seat.(BERNAMA) He was later appointed to numerous portfolios including Deputy Minister in the Prime Ministers Department (19701972) and Natural Resources Minister (19721974).( In 1973, Taib was appointed deputy president of the newly formed PBB before subsequently becoming the president of the party.( Rahman Yakub was Taibs political mentor for 20 years.(Appointment as Chief MinisterAfter winning the Sebandi (now Asajaya) by-election in 1981, Taib was appointed as Sarawaks Land and Mines Minister before succeeding his uncle, Abdul Rahman Yakub, as the Minister of Sarawak.(The Malaysian Insider) He held the Sebandi seat until 1987, when he was elected as state assemblyman for the Asajaya constituency.(Klik 4 Malaysia) In 2001 state election, he decided to contest in Balingian. Taib served in many public and voluntary bodies and represented the government at various international conferences.(1987 Ming Court AffairAccording to Malaysiakini, dissatisfaction with the Taib leadership arose when a group of PBB politicians claimed that the interests of Bumiputeras were being neglected. The group claimed Taib Mahmud had exclusively favoured the Chinese and United Peoples Party (SUPP).(Aliran) The Dayaks in the Dayak Peoples Party (PBDS) were quite frustrated because the Chief Minister post has not been in their hands for 17 years. However, the main factor for upheaval in PBDS was the suspicion of Chief Minister Taib towards Leo Moggie, the PBDS president.() According to a doctoral dissertation written by David Walter Brown, fissures between the factions controlled by Taib and his uncle, Tun Abdul Rahman Yakub gradually developed after Rahman Yakub stepped down as Chief Minister. In 1985, Rahman Yakub was also removed from the office of governor by Taib himself.(Klik 4 Malaysia) This caused Rahman Yakub to launch a series of attacks against Taib in 1987, widely known as the Ming Court Affair.()Rahman Yakub headed a group of disappointed Sarawak politicians from National Party (SNAP) and PBDS to gather in Ming Court Hotel in Lumpur in order to move a motion of no confidence against Taibs leadership by signing letters collectively.  Daniel Tajem, a former deputy chief minister and Leo Moggie were the other main plotters of this affair. Seeing such a political crisis, Taib immediately called for a snap state election in 1987, which he narrowly won.(Kesavapany. K (2004). In Southeast Asian affairs 2004. Institute of Southeast Asian Studies. p. 163. ISBN 9812302387. Google Book Search. Retrieved on 17 November 2009.) His coalition won 28 out of 48 seats in the state assembly and later received another 8 defected assemblymen from PBDS, decreasing the original seats for PBDS from 15 to 7.(() PBDS remained in the opposition until it was readmitted into Sarawak BN in 1994. The internal bickering of SNAP and PBDS has benefited the rule of Taib in the years to come.(Progress and development in SarawakSince 1981, the Gross Domestic Product (GDP) has grown from RM 6.5 billion to RM 19.7 billion in 1995 and increased further to an estimated of RM 29.9 billion in 1999.(Rumah Panjai) In 1995, 31.9% of the population was living in poverty and 10% in hard-core poverty. By 1997, the incidence of poverty was down to 7.5% and hard-core poverty went down to 0.7%. In 1980, only 31.8% of people of Sarawak had water supply, but in 1995, the figure has reached 85% of the population.(But Sarawaks prosperity is not evenly shared across the socio-economic classes. Unlike the data above, academics and non-governmental organisations (NGOs) that are independent of Taibs PBB party revealed that the large disparity between urban and rural poverty remains a major challenge for Taibs three decades-old administration.(Hashim, S (1998). In Income inequality and poverty in Malaysia. Rowman & Littlefield. p. 112, 1745. ISBN 0-8476-8858-5. Google Book Search. Retrieved on 19 August 2010.)()Sarawak is one of the most visited islands in Malaysia and eco-tourism forms a major part of this states economy.(http://www.asiarooms.com/en/travel-guide/malaysia/sightseeing-in-malaysia/sightseeing-in-sarawak-malaysia.html) Taibs administration with the help of the Malaysian federal government, has made Sarawaks Heritage more accessible through the construction of the Borneo Highway.(http://www.e-borneo.com/cgi-bin/np/viewnews.cgi?category3&id1050893413) In recent years, the Sarawak economy has started to become more industrialised. Manufacturing, industrial, and tourism sector are particularly high growth sectors.(http://www.sarawaktourism.com/content.cfm/ID/11924171-3D1F-4330-90EDABF060BE28EE) High technology industries play a significant role into the economic expansion and creation of jobs in the state. As a result of Taib Mahmuds policy of development, Sarawak GDP growth exceeded national average in 1995.(http://www.adb.org/Documents/PCRs/MAL/20015-MAL-PCR.pdf) To balance the development between urban and rural areas, Taib Mahmud also endorsed town planning, natural resources planning, large-scale plantations, and native customary land (NCR) development.( However, cases of exploitation of NCR lands for logging, mining, and plantation purposes have also been reported.()(Tawie, J.) Sarawak is the first state in Malaysia to fully implement the e-government initiative while the Sarawak State Library is the first e-library in Malaysia.(Limkokwing University) The Corridor of Renewable Energy (SCORE) introduced by Taib is expected to further diversify the economy of Sarawak.()During his tenure, Taib has been able to unite() cooperation the political leaders of the different parties and reach stable political consensus. Taib Mahmud is also regarded as successfully integrating the different social and racial groups in Sarawak.(2030 vision for SarawakDuring the celebrations of Taibs 28th year in power as the chief minister of Sarawak, speaking at Dewan Suarah Bintulu Taib said that his vision for Sarawak was for it to become the richest state in Malaysia by the year 2030. It is the intention of Taib and his administration to develop more high-skilled jobs.()To achieve this, the state is investing money in developing new higher education institutions.(http://www.malaysia-higher-education.com/) This policy is intended to help move the economy away from industry which relies heavily on Sarawaks natural resources to a more skilled, serviced-based economy.(ConservationIn February 2011, the Government of Sarawak announced that it is intensifying wildlife conservation and protection activities as part of its commitment to sustainable development. Chief Minister Taib Mahmud said: We must plan our development in a sustainable manner, to ensure that the prosperity of the State will not only be sustained but can be handed down to our children and grand-children.(Wall Street Online)A programme has been put in place to save the flora and fauna affected by the construction of the Bakun Hydro Electric Dam. A total of 349 species of flora, 65 species of fauna, 27 mammals and 38 bird species were identified and relocated to higher ground. There is now a conservation programme in place in the Bakun Dam catchment area and it is anticipated that the growth in eco-tourism will provide economic opportunities for local communities.(Democrat.Gnome.es)Other programmes include the Heart 2 Heart orangutan campaign which invites the public to get involved with orangutan conservation; orang-utan and turtle adoption; protection of the dugong (a large marine mammal) and the Irrawaddy dolphin, which are both endangered species; and the Reef Ball project that will rehabilitate Sarawaks ocean ecosystem by placing artificial reef modules in the sea to form new habitats. Reef balls have also proven their effectiveness in protecting turtles in Sarawak. In the early 1990s, between 70 to 100 turtle deaths were reported every year. Now, the number of deaths has been reduced significantly to less than 15 reported cases. Reef balls also protect traditional fishing areas and are used to create recreational diving sites.(GTN News)Recently stated in his keynote address at Tomorrows Leaders Summit that he would continue to improve conditions of the Orang Utan One of them is of course the Lanjak Entimau Wildlife Sanctuary. We hope to develop it properly with Indonesia to make it the safest and biggest sanctuary for orang utansSarawak Cabinet reshuffleTaib announced his cabinet reshuffle on 8 November 2009.(My Sarawak) Six new parliamentarians were appointed as assistant ministers, while the portfolios of others were changed. Five out of the six new appointees were sworn in on 21 November 2009 before the state governor, Tun Datuk Patinggi Abang Muhamad Salahuddin in the state assembly. The remaining assistant minister, Abdul Wahab Aziz, was on a pilgrimage.() The new cabinet line-up took effect on 1 December 2009.(()Taib, who retained the Finance, and Planning and Resource Management Minister portfolios, said the reorganisation was meant to prepare Sarawak for new development policies and approaches that could take place some time in the 10th Malaysia Plan (10MP) or after the next state election. He also said that with the Corridor of Renewable Energy (SCORE) coming up, he would reform SESCO Berhad (SESCO) in the next one or two years.(On 28 September 2011, Taib again announced another cabinet reshuffle with the appointment of Senior Ministers in the cabinet and renaming some of the ministry. Taib also created new ministries that will focused on the welfare, women and family development. ()2011 state election and aftermathDespite being the target of an onslaught of attacks by the opposition Rakyat coalition,() Taib led PBB to a clean sweep of seats contested in the 2011 state election, winning an eighth consecutive term as chief minister.() However, the Barisan Nasional coalition suffered its worst performance ever in a Sarawak state election, with coalition partner United Peoples Party (SUPP) suffering badly due his poor standing among the Chinese community.()() Since the election, he has been under pressure from the BN national leadership to step down to avoid hurting BNs prospects during the next general election. Despite this, Taib has remained vague about his retirement plans.()ControversiesLogging industryThe involvement of Taib and his family in logging industry is specifically mentioned in a report published by Monitor. According to the report, the chief minister reserves his right to revoke timber licenses while no legal challenge is possible against the chief minister. This is to ensure that the anyone with logging interest is loyal to the chief minister. The report also notes that in general, mutually beneficial relationship between political elites and logging companies often results in corruption, bribery, and transfer pricing, where the financial details of transnational logging companies, including Malaysian ones, are difficult to track.() Based on a book written by Michael Lewin Ross, the political insecurity of Taib Mahmud from 1986 to 1991 has enabled him to accelerate the pace of logging in Sarawak. Taib is reported to have used timber concessions for personal and family enrichment.(In 2007, The Japan Times reported that nine Japanese shipping companies, which transported timber from Sarawak, had allegedly failed to report some 1.1 billion yen in income over a period of up to seven years. The report claimed the money was paid to Sarawak officials via a Hong Kong agent linked to Taibs family.() Taib, however, denied totally the Japan Times allegations by presenting a 10-page clarification in the state assembly. He said that he had no knowledge about the bribes given to Sarawak officials and the evading of the income from timber production.()In 2008, Indonesian newspaper Tribun Pontianak revealed that around 30 shipments of illegal Indonesian logs was imported into Sarawak and re-exported to other countries every month. Chief minister Taib Mahmud and the company Hardwood Sdn Bhd, a wholly owned unit of state agency Sarawak Timber Industry Development Corporation (STIDC), was implicated in this timber scam.()()()In 2009, the Malaysian 2008 annual auditor-generals report labelled the forest management in Sarawak by state government as unsatisfactory. However, Sarawaks Second Minister of Planning and Resource Management, Datuk Amar Awang Tengah Ali Hassan questioned the validity of the report as he claimed that the auditor-generals department did not have the expertise in forest management.()The indigenous community petitions and road blockades against logging in their ancestral lands has led to forceful dismantling of blockades, several deaths and violent coercion by the police and logging industry enforcers.()()According to Mongabay, Sarawak has lost 90% of its forests cover based on satellite images.() However, Taib Mahmud refuted the claim and said that there are still 70% of its forests remain intact and he also plans to invite independent investigations on Sarawak rainforest.(State open to forest verification  Taib)Allegations of nepotismTaibs son, Dato Sri Mahmud Abu Bekir Taib, was appointed as Group Executive Director of Mata Sarawak Berhad (CMSB) on 23 January 1995. He is currently the Deputy Group Chairman of CMSB.() Abu Bekir Taibs siblings, Datuk Seri Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib, Jamilah Hamidah Taib, Hanifah Hajar Taib and his late mother Laila Taib are substantial shareholders in the company.( Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib joined the board of CMSB when his brother Abu Bekir Taib, first became the Group Executive Director of CMSB. Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib was the Group Chairman of CMSB from May 2002 until June 2006, the former Non-Executive Director of CMSB,( ) and the former Bank chairman.()In the 2008 general election, Taibs son Datuk Seri Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib won the Samarahan seat in the Malaysian parliament previously held by his father() and became Deputy Tourism Minister in the new cabinet.() Prior to this, he did not have any political experience. On 14 December 2009, he resigned his deputy minister post due to personal reasons.()Taibs brother, Mohd Tufail bin Mahmud is the co-owner of Sanyan Group, one of the Sarawaks biggest timber companies.  In 2001, the Sanyan Group completed its construction of the 28-storey Sanyan in Sibu where the state government took up 8 office floors.(Achi Jaya Shipping is owned by Onn Mahmud and his immediate family. Onn Mahmud is Taib Mahmuds brother. Achi Jaya Shipping is alleged to continue demand payment from Japanese log carriers for transporting wood from Sarawak although the payments are actually kickbacks as stated in 2007 timber kickback scandal.()Taibs brother, Mohamad Arip bin Mahmud was appointed as a director of Jaya Tiasa Holdings Berhad (controlled by Hijau Group) on 13 April 1995. Taibs sister is also one of the Tiongs business partners.()Taibs cousin, Abdul Hamed Sepawi is the chairman of Naim Holdings Berhad, Sarawak Energy Berhad,() and Ta Ann Holdings Berhad. He was also on the board of Sarawak Timber Industry Development Corp and Sarawak Plantation Berhad.()Taibs brother-in-law, Tan Sri Datuk Amar Haji Abdul Aziz Bin Dato Haji Husain, was appointed state secretary by Taib in 2000 and when he retired in 2006, he was appointed as the group managing director of Sarawak Energy Berhad since 2007.() He also holds directorships for Eksons Corporation Berhad, Mlabs Systems Berhad, SESCO Berhad and other companies.()Taib Mahmud, denying any wrongdoings, told National News Agency (Bernama) that he did not ask anybody to do his sons a favour for the positions in CMSB and other companies.( He also insisted that his family made money through their own hard work.(Economic activityMata Sarawak Berhad (CMSB), the company controlled by Taibs family, has been awarded various government contracts including the maintenance of Sarawaks roads over the last 15 years.( These contracts also include construction of roads, supplying roofing materials for low-cost housing units, building hospitals, and upgrading airports.( In 2001, the Malaysian federal government allowed the CMS Groups banking unit Bank Utama to acquire Bank to become one of Malaysias 10 core banks.( The company, PPES Works (Sarawak) Sdn Bhd, which is 51% owned by CMSB, recently completed the construction of the Sarawak State Legislative Assembly Building in 2009.() CMSB is currently under the joint venture with leading aluminium producer, Tinto Alcan (RTA) to develop aluminium smelter in Similajau as part of the Corridor of Renewable Energy (SCORE).()A doctoral thesis written by Malaysia Sarawak (UNIMAS) lecturer, Dr Neilson Mersat, alleged that Taibs family wealth comes mostly from Sarawak state government contracts without tender, and profits were sent overseas to hide them.(Mersat, Neilson Ilan , Politics and business in Sarawak (19632004) / ANU PhD Thesis, 2005) Another lecturer in the faculty of Social Sciences at UNIMAS, Andrew Aeria, wrote a thesis which claimed that CMSB takeover of Bank Utama and other companies is an example where highly profitable business are only favoured between well-connected individuals.( The privatisation of state-owned companies deprived the state government of sources of income, thus raising the burden of taxpayers.(In 2000, the Sarawak cabinet had approved RM 551.02 million state contract to be awarded directly to Titanium Management Sdn. Bhd. Taibs son, Mahmud Abu Bekir Taib is a major shareholder in the company.( This contract allowed Titanium to repair or replace 384 old bridges in the state in 7 years. The Malaysian 2006 auditor general report stated that agreement in the contract was favouring the contractor. There was a cost overrun of 72% from the original cost. A survey conducted by auditor-general department on 12 sites of the bridges discovered that the design of bridges over narrow rivers do not meet actual needs and were not built economically.()()In 2008, the Sarawak government planned to build 12 dams in Sarawak in order to meet the future energy demand of industrialisation.() These dams are scheduled to be completed in 2020 although they need to be approved by environmental impact assessment. A memorandum of understanding was already signed between the Sarawak Energy Berhad and China Three Gorges Project Corporation on Dam project.()() A total of 51 dams  may be constructed by the year 2037. This controversial hydroelectric project is receiving fierce criticism because of catastrophic disasters that they may cause and the possible displacements of native communities. The opponents of the plans cited this project as corruption and capital cronyism because CMSB is expected to be benefited indirectly by supplying concrete material for the construction of dams and building of aluminium smelter that consume much of the generated electricity.() In March 2009, Jazeeras 101 East English programme was aired where the Sarawaks 12 dams issue and economic domination by Taibs family was discussed in great detail. Minister of Land Development, Dato Sri Dr. James Masing accepted the interview on this issue but the Chief Minister Pehin Sri Taib Mahmud declined the interview invitation.(James Masing, in an interview with Al Jazeera English, maintained that the contracts were awarded in a transparent manner either in open or closed tenders. He said that the state government gave the contracts based on the previous good track record of the companies, not because of the alleged political connections.(Personal wealthTaib owns a mansion in Demak Jaya which overlooks the Sarawak River. According to photos in the July to December 2006 newsletter of Naim Cendera Holdings Bhd, Taibs living room is decorated with gilt-edged European-style sofa sets.( Taib Mahmud is said to wear double-breasted suits, driving around in Kuching in his cream-coloured Rolls-Royce car.() Laila Taib and her children are the majority shareholders of Sitehost Pty. Ltd., Australia, which owns Adelaide Hilton Hotel, according to Aliran Monthly, the reformist Malaysian magazine.( Taib was described as flamboyant with expensive tastes(Dauvergne, Peter (1997). In Shadows in the forest:Japan and the politics of timber in Southeast Asia. MIT Press. p. 109. ISBN 0-262-54087-8. Google Book Search. Retrieved on 27 December 2010.) and had reportedly purchased a piano once belonged to late American showman Liberace for US$2 million.(Backman, M (2005). In Inside knowledge: streetwise in Asia. Palgrave Macmillan. p. 136. ISBN 1-4039-4237-4. Google Book Search. Retrieved on 5 July 2010.)Allegations by Sarawak ReportIn the latest expose, Taib is alleged to have established a real estate empire, Corporation in Canada worth a few hundred million dollars, under the name of his son-in-law, Sean Murray.() This company was founded by Taibs brother Onn Mahmud, Taibs daughter Jamilah, and Sean Murray.() Sean Murray and Taibs daughter has successfully won the trust of Canadian government departments to move into the their office spaces after an open and competitive lease search. The ORC briefings stated that the facilities owned by Sakto Corporation was built to high energy and environmental specifications and building is green in a number of ways.() Sarawak Report, run by Rewcastle Brown also alleged that Sakti International Corporation in United States which is also managed by the same couple, owns Abraham Lincoln building which houses the Bureau of Investigation (FBI) facility,() with Taib Mahmud as the ultimate owner of Sakti.(Unmasked! Taib The Godfather) Taib family is also alleged to own Properties in London.() Taib Mahmud admitted that his daughter owns properties in Canada and London but he denied that his daughters properties are operated using illegal money.(Taib declares he never lied and was not involved in dirty politics) The longest served chief minister in Malaysia has played denial to disclose his wealth further even with growing anger and public pressure. Therefore however Datuk Seri Najib Razak has traveled to Sarawak, Taibs legacy state, to exercise last minute duty for the coming state election on 17 April 2011.(http://election.thestar.com.my/sarawak/news/story.asp?file/2011/4/10/sarawakpolls/20110410220106&secsarawakpolls)Awards and recognitionIn July 2010, Taib was presented with the Lifetime achievement by Asia HRD Congress in order to commemorate his contributions towards developing the human capital in Sarawak especially for the establishment of Malaysia Sarawak (UNIMAS).()In December 2001, he was appointed an Honorary Officer of the of Australia, for service to Australian-Malaysian bilateral relations.(Its an Honour)Taib also holds honorary degrees from a number of universities including, an Honorary Degree from the University of Adelaide, Australia, an Honorary Doctorate from the University of Putra, Malaysia, Honorary Doctor of Technology Degree from Curtin University of  Technology, Australia, and in 1998, Taib was made the Honorary Fellow of Islamic Academy of Sciences at the Islamic Academy of Sciences, Amman, Jordan.(ReferencesTaib Mahmudzh:
8714604
John_A._Nejedly
John A. Nejedly (October 22, 1914-September 19, 2006) was a Republican Senator who represented Costa County, California from 1969 to 1980.Early lifeJohn Nejedly was born in CA in 1914 and was raised there while attending public schools.  He was a member of the Boy Scouts and went on to earn the rank of Eagle Scout.After high school, he attended the of California, Berkeley, where he received his B.S. in Administration in 1935.  In 1938, he purchased a parcel of hillside land in the then-unincorporated area of Creek, CA, which in 1946 would become his lifelong home.  He continued with his education and received his of Laws from Hall (the UC Berkeley School of Law) in 1941.From 1942 to 1946 he served with the States Air Force in War II as a Japanese language officer.  He was also the lone survivor of a plane crash during the war.Professional careerNejedly became a Deputy District Attorney for Contra Costa County in 1946, and in 1948 took on the additional role as the City Attorney for the City of Walnut Creek, both roles that he held until 1958.  While serving as City Attorney, he played a key role in the creation of the Little Master Plan, a land use and public improvement plan that called for the culverting of portions of Walnut, Las Trampas, and San Ramon Creeks within downtown Walnut Creek, for the purpose of flood control and commercial development.  This plan, which was adopted by the City in 1956, led to the expansion of Broadway Plaza and the creation of the portion of North Broadway between Lincoln Avenue and Mt. Diablo Boulevard.  A plaque commemorating the Little Master Plan can be found at the corner of Duncan Street and North Broadway, in downtown Walnut Creek.While working for the City of Walnut Creek, Nejedly engineered the annexation of the city into the Bay Municipal Utility District, thereby providing a more stable source of water (the city has since grown into areas that are served by the Costa Water District).  Nejedly was also successful in working to annex the city into the Contra Costa Sanitary District, which allowed the city to close its old sewer farm and to reuse the land for what is now the eastern portion of Civic Park (at the end of Carmel Drive, near the intersection of North Broadway and Civic Drive).Political careerIn 1958, Nejedly was elected to the post of Attorney for Contra Costa County, his first elected office and a position he held for the next decade.In the late 1950s and early 1960s Nejedly helped lead attempts by the Contra Costa Park Council to create a park system in Contra Costa County.  Ultimately he was a leader with local attorney Hulet Hornbeck in the successful 1964 campaign to expand the Bay Regional Park District to include much of the County.In 1969, Nejedly was elected to the office of State Senator for California State Senate District 7, a seat that was made vacant by the passing of George Miller Jr.  Serving Contra Costa County, he went on to hold this position for three consecutive terms, until his retirement in 1980.  It was also during this time that Nejedly donated  of wilderness land in the Sierra Nevadas for use as a summer camp for disabled and disadvantaged children.While in the State Senate, Nejedly gained a reputation as an environmentalist, and served as Chairman of the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Wildlife.  He took an active role in legislation related to water policy and environmental preservation, authoring or co-authoring environmental legislation that included the following:*Solid Waste Management and Resource Recovery Act of 1972 (creating the Solid Waste Management Board, requiring statewide solid waste plans, and encouraging increased recycling).*Forest Protection Act of 1973 (providing for forest resource management that balances timber production with watershed protection, fisheries and wildlife, and recreational opportunities).*Suisun Marsh Preservation Act of 1974 (providing for preservation of the Marsh).*Wilderness Act of 1974 (allowing the state legislature to designate state lands as wilderness areas and prohibit mining, logging, or road construction).*Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (requiring reclamation plans to minimize environmental impacts and to give consideration to values relating to recreation, watershed, wildlife, range and forage, and aesthetic enjoyment).*Urban and Coastal Park Bond Act of 1976 ($280 million bond used to purchase park lands).*Hazardous Substances Information and Training Act of 1980 (establishing an employees right to know about chemical hazards in the workplace).*California Parklands Act of 1980 ($285 million bond used to purchase, rehabilitate, and develop park lands).Nejedly was also active in the area of criminal justice, and authored the Determinate Sentencing Act of 1976, which mandated fixed sentences for most crimes.In 1972, Nejedly authored Senate Bill 25, to authorize the design and construction of the new Bridge in CA, which replaced a lift bridge that was constructed in 1926.  After its completion, the new bridge was named the Senator John A. Nejedly Bridge in his honor.  In 1979, nearby land was acquired for the Regional Shoreline with the support of Nejedly, and it was Nejedlys suggestion that some of the old bridges pillars be used for what is now a fishing pier.Post-retirement lifeAfter his retirement from the State Senate in 1980, and until his death in 2006, Nejedly was active in many community organizations related to the environment, water policy, criminal justice, healthcare, and childrens welfare.Throughout the early 1980s, Nejedly fought to prevent the construction of the Canal, a plan that would have diverted water from River around the River Delta and onwards to southern California.In 1988 Nejedly was co-chairman of the East Bay Regional Park Districts successful campaign in favor of Measure AA, a $225 million bond which has resulted in over 30,000 acres (120 km) being added to the Districts land holdings, now totaling almost 100,000 acres (400 km).In the mid-1980s, Nejedly was actively involved in supporting the construction of the Contra Costa Water Districts Vaqueros Reservoir to provide a more reliable source of clean drinking water to portions of central and eastern Contra Costa County.  The bond for this project was passed in 1988, and the dam was completed in 1994. In 2004 Nejedly was chairman of the campaign opposing CCWDs Measure N, an advisory measure asking voters for authorization of studies considering tearing down the recently completed Los Vaqueros dam and replacing it with a larger dam and reservoir.Nejedly died on September 19, 2006, a few days after suffering a massive stroke.HonorsIn 1978, the newly completed Antioch Bridge in Antioch, CA was named the Senator John A. Nejedly Bridge in his honor.In 1983, Nejedly was awarded the John Muir Conservation Award by the John Muir Memorial Association, for his efforts in protecting Mt. Diablo.In the early 1990s the East Bay Regional Park District dedicated the Nejedly Staging Area at the new Strait Regional Shoreline in the retired State Senators honor.  In October 2005 a trail leading from the staging area was named in honor of Hulet Hornbeck, Nejedlys good friend and collaborator in helping to extend the East Bay Regional Park District into Contra Costa County.References*Gledhill, Lynda (2006-09-22). John Nejedly -- environmentalist, San Francisco, CA: San Francisco Chronicle.*Vorderbrueggen, Lisa (2006-09-20). John Nejedly: A voice for parks, youths, Walnut Creek, CA: Contra Costa Times.*In a Nutshell - Official community newsletter of City of Walnut Creek (December/November, 2006). Remembering Walnut Creek political icon John A. Nejedly  1914 - 2006, Walnut Creek, CA: City of Walnut Creek.*Keeble, Pat (2006-10-31). John Nejedly dies at 91 - still at work for causes he believed in, Contra Costa County, CA: Contra Costa Insider.*The Background of John A. Nejedly, californiawatercrisis.org, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*Award Program - John Muir Association, johnmuir.org, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*John A. Nejedly, joincalifornia.com, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*http://www.dot.ca.gov/, dot.ca.gov, retrieved on 2011-07-16.*East Bay Regional Park District: Places To Go: Antioch/Oakley Regional Shoreline, ebparks.org, retrieved on 2011-07-16.*California Wilderness Coalition: Golden State Wilderness Campaign, calwild.org, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*SFBCDC - The Suisun Marsh Preservation Act, bcdc.ca.gov, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*California Public Resources Code - Sections 2710-2719, leginfo.ca.gov, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*California Public Resources Code - Sections 4511-4517, leginfo.ca.gov, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*California Public Resources Code - Sections 5096.141-5096.145, leginfo.ca.gov, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*California Ballot Propositions, 1970-1979, lib.ca.us, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*Contra Costa Water District: Los Vaqueros Project History, ccwater.com, retrieved on 2007-01-01.*Dam plan ignites water war, Measure N asks voters to approve study for enlarging Los Vaqueros Reservoir, San Francisco Chroicle, February 29, 2004, sfgate.com, retrieved on 2007-08-08.*Caltrans Facts - Bay Area, dot.ca.gov, archived on 2007-04-07 on archive.org, retrieved on 2007-08-08.
8722589
Sister_Mine
Sister Mine is a 2007 novel by the American writer ODell.Plot introductionIn the coal-mining country of Pennsylvania outside of Pittsburgh, the fictional locale of Jolly Mount is home to Shae-Lynn Penrose. Two years ago, five of her miner friends were catapulted to media stardom when they were rescued after surviving four days trapped in a mine. As the men struggle to come to terms with their ordeal, along with the fallout of their short-lived celebrity, Shae-Lynn finds herself facing her relationship with her brutal father, her conflicted passion for one of the miners, and the hidden identity of the man who fathered her son.Plot summaryShae-Lynn Penrose drives a cab in a town where no one needs a cabbut plenty of people need rides. A former police officer with a closet full of miniskirts, a recklessly sharp tongue, and a tendency to deal with men by either beating them up or taking them to bed, she has spent years carving out a life for herself and her son in Jolly Mount, Pennsylvania, the coal-mining town where she grew up.When the younger sister Shae-Lyn thought was dead arrives on her doorstep followed closely by a gun-wielding Russian gangster, a shady New York lawyer, and a desperate Connecticut housewife, Shae-Lynn is forced to grapple with the horrible truth she discovers about the life her sisters been living, and one ominous question: will her return result in a monstrous act of greed, or one of sacrifice?Tawni ODells trademark blend of black humor, tenderness, and keen sense of place is evident once again as Shae-Lynn takes on past demons and all-too-present dangers.External links*Authors website
8736138
Bourse_du_Travail
thumb|right|The Paris Bourse du Travail, May 1st 1906.thumb|right|Poster announcing the 1893 Nantes Bourse du Travail founding.thumb|right|A womens convention at the Troyes Bourse, c. 1900thumb|right|Sign in sheet at the Aubusson Bourse, c. 1920.thumb|right|The Bourse du Travail building, Paris, 2005.The Bourse du Travail (French for labour exchanges), a French form of the council, were working class organizations that encouraged mutual aid, education, and self-organization amongst their members in the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries.RoleLaborEarly Third Republic France was a time of dramatic social and economic change. With the tremendous growth of industrial capitalism in the last twenty years of the 19th century and the continued migration of workers to cities, the traditional system of meeting places for those seeking work was overtaxed.  Skilled  and unskilled trades alike had gradually developed systems to match those seeking work with employers, but the legalization of trades unions in 1884, helped formalise these structures.  Employers, too, were creating private labor placement offices.(Casey Harison. The Rise And Decline Of A Revolutionary Space: Paris Place De Greve And The Stonemasons Of Creuse, 1750-1900 - Critical Essay in the Journal of Social History: Winter 2000.)The Republican government of Gambetta relied upon the support of working class voters, and so helped create the first Bourses du Travail under the control of newly legalised labor unions.  Socialist and radicals, elected to city offices in some areas, made the funding of Bourses du Travail a priority.  As the system expanded, radicals in local government extended aid.  The loi du 14 mars 1904 mandated that every city of over ten thousand inhabitants had to create a bureau de placement, establishing job offices and undercutting employer run placement agencies.  These government offices were usually placed in the local Bourses du Travail.(David Rappe,La Bourse du travail de Lyon, Lyon, Atelier de cration libertaire, 2004.)With government support came government regulation. While there was no legal obligation for the state or the municipality to put in place these buildings, their construction helped both the movement and surveillance of its activities. Business interests and the police saw the formalisation of Bourses du Travail as a way to channel the labor movement away from revolutionary change or to keep an eye on those who promoted it.Role in revolutionary ideologyThe ideology behind the explosion in Bourses du Travail, popularized by revolutionary syndicalists like Pelloutier, intended to create  in them the key organizational component of radical economic transformation.  By acting as future co-ordinating bodies, facilitating communication between sydicates (unions), the Bourse du Travail would co-ordinate production and consumption in the absence of both the state and the private ownership of the means of production. These institutions were central to the notion of Revolutionary Syndicalism which dominated the Gnrale du Travail, Frances largest labor federation in the first twenty years on the 20th century. Pelloutier and other revolutionary syndicalists argued that the Boursessmall scale, local, self madewere the guarantee that the CGT would remain both directly democratic and revolutionary.(David Berry. Anarchism, Syndicalism and the Bolshevik Challenge in France, 1918-1926 Part III : Syndicalism and the anarchist diaspora. 2006 on pelloutier.net)  They saw labor organizations as interconnecting in three ways: a national federation uniting each specific union (traditional craft or trade unions); a national federation of all unions (in this case, the CGT); and all local workers, across union and political boundaries, united in the Bourse du travail.  Supporters of the Bourse movement believed this structure last should become the most important form of workers  association.(For close examination of these tensions see:*Kenneth H. Tucker.  French Revolutionary Syndicalism and the Public Sphere. Cambridge University Press (1996) ISBN 0-521-56359-3 For both the history of these tensions and theoretical examination.*Kathryn E. Amdur.  Syndicalist Legacy. University of Illinois (1986) ISBN 0-252-01238-0 for how the federation of unions and the federation of single trades in fact triumphed in two towns in the period after WWI.)CulturalThe other major change of this period was the Republican promulgation of laws, taking education out of the hands of the church, and eventually taxing and regulation Church institutions.  Bourses du Travail, like civil marriage or lay funerals, filled a communal role once played by local parishes.(See also on Wikipedia: French law on the separation of Church and State, Lacit#France, and Anti-clericalism#France.)Bourses du Travail were centers of working class culture.  Almost every one contained lending libraries, classrooms, meeting halls, and theaters.  Family and community celebrations took place here (away from the church), as did classes and political discussions, formal meetings and light entertainment.  The Bourses du Travail buildings are still often the place of theaters and concert venues.HistoryBirth in the Third RepublicThe idea of French labor exchanges far predates the institution.  In 1790, at the height of the Revolution, an abortive Bourse du Travail was established in Paris. The Le Chapelier of 1791 outlawed this and any other labor organization, and despite the brief legalization during the Second Republic, unions remained illegal until 1884. Adolphe Leullier presented in 1845 a similar project which he called the  Bureau central des ouvriers, and in 1875, workers petitioned the Paris municipal council to establish a Bourse du Travail, which was rejected.  Labor organizations had existed underground or by other names, but their new status an explosion of radical activity.  The French Revolutionary tradition was evolving into the economic sphere of union organizing, rather than the seizure of power (exemplified by Blanqui).The first Bourse du Travail, in Paris, was begun in 1887. A building on JJ Rousseau was donated by the Socialist municipal council, and a second on du Chteau deau was created in 1892.(Both survive and operate as union and community centers today. See:*la Bourse du Travail de Paris3 rue du chteau dEau - Mtro Rpublique.1982 Film on the history of la Bourse du Travail de Paris)  By this time there were 14 Bourses du Travail established around France, by 1902 83, with a further 75 created by 1914.( David Rappe, La Bourse du travail de Lyon, Une structure ouvrire entre services sociaux et rvolution sociale, ditions ACL (2004)  on increvablesanarchistes.org)Fdration des Bourses de travail and the CGTSee also fr:Confdration gnrale du travail, fr:Charter of Amiens and Anarcho-syndicalismThe Fdration des Bourses de travail (Federation of Workers Councils) was created in 1892 at the Congress of Saint-Etienne by Pelloutier to federate each citys workers organization. It was first led by Resset (1892), then Cordier, then Fernand Pelloutier (1895) and from 1901 to 1918 by Yvetot.The Federation of Workers Council merged in 1895 with the nationale des syndicats (National Federation of Trade-Unions), which had been created in 1886, giving rise to the gnrale du travail (CGT), which was dominated by a revolutionary syndicalist strategy until 1921.It was the FBT that, as much as any organization, created the CGT.  At their Nice congress in 1901 the fdration des Bourses du Travail formally proposed the creation of and fusion with the CGT which took place in 1902.(La Bourse du travail de Saint-Etienne on forez-info.com.)Many of the leaders of the Bourse du Travail went on to lead the CGT, and the FBT was a co-equal partner with individual unions in the CGTs founding.  Bourses have thus been called the mre des syndicat (the mother of unions) for their role.(Jean-Yves Martin.  Aux origines de la Bourse du Travail de St-Nazaire de 1892  la fin du sicle, in Cahier de lAREMORS n3 (1992))Structurally, individual Bourses comprised the building itself (and its social, education, and other practical resources), and the Bourse as a council of local unions.  Unions paid a fee to join the bourse, though CGT affiliated unions were often exempted, and sent representatives to regular meetings of all the local unions. The administration of the bourse was by elected representatives.  Contrary to Pelloutiers vision, these representatives came from a variety of ideological backgrounds which both represented the local political leanings of unions, but also the wider political left in the area.  In many towns there were socialist municipal councils and mayors, either in Guesdes Workers Party, the Jauresin possibilists of the Section of the Workers International (SFIO), or independent reformers of the Briand group.  This leaves aside the constellation of syndicalist focused socialists (like Allemanes Revolutionary Socialist Workers Party), cooperativists, and anarchist workers who sometimes played active roles in their local Bourse.  In most places anarcho-syndicalism was but one small faction in both the bourses and the CGT, and so the bourses took on roles of a reformist, or Marxist, or strictly trade unionist character which presaged the CGT split.(Kathryn E. Amdur, is especially good on teasing out the complexity and variation of this. See especially all of Chapter 2, pp57-64, pp. 126-133, and 196-198.)Rise of the PCF and decline of the BourseThe birth of the Communist Party began the decline of the Bourse du Travail movement. The CGT, which had regrouped the individual organizations, was swept up in the ideological tumult of the post war years.  It became, like much of the French left, dominated by the Communists ideological vision, which saw the loose federalism of Revolutionary Syndicalism as a reason for the failure of the 1918-1919 strike wave. In 1921, the CGT revised its structure, eliminating the local Bourses du Travail as constituent organization of the Union, and replacing them with a network of Unions Locales. From here on, the CGT followed a British and American model of local trade specific unions, federated into a single national structure.(David Berry. Anarchism, Syndicalism and the Bolshevik Challenge in France, 1918-1926 Part III : Syndicalism and the anarchist diaspora. 2006 on pelloutier.netAnd for the United States echo of this process, see William E. Forbath. Not So Simple - labor politics of Sam Gompers in Labor History: May 1999.)A split, eventually into three federations, created a Section of the Workers International (SFIO)-dominated CGT, the General Confederation of Labour (Confdration gnrale du travail - unitaire or CGTU), where communists cohabited with anarchists and revolutionary trade unionists, and the Trade Unionist General Confederation of Labour (Confdration gnrale du travail - syndicaliste rvolutionnaire or CGTSR) in 1923 when the communists gained control of the CGTU. (The CGT and CGTU reunited in 1936, and remained close to the Communist Party.)  Predictably, these often bitter party divisions in the labor movement made the local and inclusivist vision of the Bourses impossible.The Bourses du Travail survived, often as a single organization union hall, while the history of splits in the French labor movement saw the buildings pass from one hand to another, revert to municipalities, or disappear entirely.( The Bourse in Lille, for example passed to the Force Ouvriere union, while  the Troyes Bourse was abandoned.)TodayBuildings and communitiesBourse du Travail buildings and institutions remain in most large French cities.  Many are headquarters of the local unions which are federated into the nationale du travail, or of other unions which split from the Communist Party.   Many bourse were central as places of organizing and resistance during May 1968. In some places municipal governments have retained ownership, or community and radical groups have taken them over.  Some have simply been sold off for office space or torn down.In Lille, one of the earliest bourses remains as the home of five unions and a radical community center, and came center stage in the resistance to the deportation of immigrants, when 460 sans-papiers staged a 30 day hunger strike to oppose government policies.(French Wikipedia:Bourse du Travail de Lille)IdeologyThe Bourse du Travail concept has been central to Anarcho-syndicalists across the globe, and the model greatly influenced communism and other forms of communism.  Anarchists  of many stripes point to the Bourse du Travail as an example of a directly democratic, small scale federalist institutional structure.Outside FranceThe Bourse du Travail idea was exported along with French imperialism.  The FBTs full name was actually Fdration des Bourses du Travail de France et des Colonies, though in practice  this meant there were sections in the French settler dominated parts of Algeria.  These declined with their French counterparts, and did not survive the anticolonial struggle.(Albert Ayache. Essai sur la vie syndicale en Algerie, lannee du Centenaire (1930) in Le Mouvement social, No. 78, Special Issue: Le Mouvement Ouvrier Francais et lAfrique du Nord. (Jan. - Mar., 1972), pp. 95-114)In Subsaharan Africa, Bourses du Travail were implanted in two ways.  In French controlled regions, labor unions were organized by the CGT in the 1930s and 1940s.  Their labour halls were styled Bourses du travail, some of which remain as centers of union activity.( Guy Bertrans Wonkam La grve au Labogenie proccupe la Cstc in Le Quotidien Mutations (Yaound), 16 December 2003, for current bourses in the of Cameroon.)The rulers of Congo created a Bourse du travail at Katanga in 1910 as a state controlled hiring hall, in an attempt to lure labor to areas of planned industrial (mostly mining) concentration.  Attempts by local officials to recast this cynically created employment agency into a more worker run operation suggest that the idea of a Bourse du travail never lost its syndicalist connotations.(When Buttgenbach, managing director of the UMHK, proposed the creation of the BTK to the colonial minister Renkin, the minister promptly called an assembly of the major employers in Katanga, resulting in the creation, as a private enterprise, of the Bourse in July 1910. However, the administrations views on the functioning of the institution were inconsistent with the view of the BTK as a monopolistic, state-run and coercive labour bureau.Aldwin Roes. The Bourse du Travail du Katanga: A parastatal recruitment organisation with monopsonistic powers? State-capital relations in the mobilization of Katangas labour power, 1910-1914. London School of Economics, (2007).) See also *council*educationBibliographyHistorical Works*  Daniel Colson. Bourse du Travail et syndicalisme dentreprise avant 1914: les Acieries de Saint-Etienne in Le Mouvement social, No. 159 (Apr. - Jun., 1992), pp. 5783.*  Paul Delesalle. Les Bourses du Travail et la C.G.T., Bibliothque du mouvement proltarien, 64 pages, Rivire, 1912.* Robert Gildea. Review Article: La Vie quotidienne des anarchistes en France, 1880-1910 by Andre Nataf; Naissance des Bourses du travail. Un appareil ideologique dEtat a la fin du XIXe siecle by Peter Schottler; Souvenirs dun anarchiste by Maurice Joyeux; in The English Historical Review, Vol. 103, No. 409 (Oct., 1988), pp. 10001001.* Patrick H. Hutton (ed.). Historical Dictionary of the Third French Republic, 1870-1940. University of Michigan (1986) p. 122 ISBN 0-313-22080-8*  Jean-Yves Martin.  Aux origines de la Bourse du Travail de St-Nazaire de 1892  la fin du sicle, in Cahier de lAREMORS n3 (1992)*  Fernand Pelloutier.  Histoire des bourses du travail, (1901).*  Maurice Poperen. Creation des Bourses du Travail en Anjou 1892-1894 in Le Mouvement social, No. 40 (Jul. - Sep., 1962), pp. 3955.*  Jean Sagnes. Le mouvement ouvrier en Languedoc: Syndicalistes et socialistes de lHerault de la fondation des bourses du travail a la naissance du Parti communiste (Midi et son histoire). Privat(1980) ISBN 2-7089-8600-7*  Peter Schottler. Naissance des Bourses du travail. Un appareil ideologique dEtat a la fin du XIXe siecle by  (1987).* Michael Seidman. The Birth of the Weekend and the Revolts against Work: The Workers of the Paris Region during the Popular Front (193638) in French Historical Studies, Vol. 12, No. 2 (Autumn, 1981), pp. 249276.*  Danielle Tartakowsky.  Review article: Bourses du travail et federations dindustrie. Trois etudes in Le Mouvement social, No. 178, France-Belgique Fin de Siecle (Jan. - Mar., 1997), pp. 150151.Online Resources*  Fernand Pelloutiers Histoire des Bourses du travail, the complete text,  online at pelloutier.net (accessed 28-06-2007). Also at on anarkhia.org, and with biographic information and documents on kropot.free.fr*  Pierre Besnard. Bourse du Travail Encyclopdie anarchiste. 13 April 2005.*   la Bourse du Travail Fr:Wiikpedia on Anarchist Bourse du Travail in the 1930s*  des bourses du travail Fr:Wikipedia list of Bourse du Travail*  Loi relative  la cration des syndicats professionnels du 21 mars 1884*  Association Bourse du Travail Mmoire Vivante, Troyes* 1982 Film on the history of la Bourse du Travail de Paris*  FERNAND PELLOUTIER et les Bourses du Travail: Documentary Film.*  Timeline and history of the Bourse dutravail of Saint-Etienne.In Francophone Africa*  Albert Ayache. Essai sur la vie syndicale en Algerie, lannee du Centenaire (1930) in Le Mouvement social, No. 78, Special Issue: Le Mouvement Ouvrier Francais et lAfrique du Nord. (Jan. - Mar., 1972), pp. 95114* Aldwin Roes. The Bourse du Travail du Katanga: ?A parastatal recruitment organisation with monopsonistic powers?? State-capital relations in the mobilization of Katanga?s labour power, 1910-1914. London School of Economics, (2007)*  Guy Bertrans Wonkam La grve au Labogenie proccupe la Cstc in Le Quotidien Mutations (Yaound), 16 December 2003.Further reading*  A Bourse du Travail bibliography from the University of Nantes: Centre dhistoire du travailSome operating Bourses du TravailLyonBourse du travail 3 me Arr. B-Station Place Guichard.Paris (chteau dEau)Bourse du Travail3 rue du chteau dEau - Rpublique. AngersBourse du Travail14, place Louis Imbach49000 AngersCreilBourse du travailrue Fernand Pelloutier60100 CreilBordeauxBourse du Travail44, cours Aristide Briand33000 Bordeauxdu travail
8744984
Long_Meg_Mine
Image:Long meg signal box.JPG|thumb|right|Long Meg Mine Signal Box on the RailwayLong Meg Mine is a disused gypsum mine just north of Salkeld, Cumbria in the area known as Cave Wood Valley. It was operated between 1880 and 1976.HistoryThe Long Meg Plaster Company Ltd. was established in 1880, driving an underground drift upon which operations commenced in 1885. In 1886 a standard gauge extension line was connected to the site from the Railway (a distance of around 0.35 km). The workforce in this year is recorded as being 12 (all Surface), the name of the mine Long Meg Drift and agent A.K.Busby.(Cumberlands Mining Industry in 1896 - A List of Metalliferous Mines - Peak District Mines Historical Society Ltd: http://www.pdmhs.com/1896%20Lists/1896-34.htm)In 1902 the workforce is recorded as being 26 (12 Underground and 14 Surface). By 1914 however this figure had dropped to 6 (4 Underground and 2 Surface) and the mine was abandoned on an unknown date in 1914/1915. The operator at this time was the Carlisle Plaster and Cement Company Ltd.The mine was re-opened in 1922 for the extraction of anhydrite by the Long Meg Plaster and Mineral Company Ltd. This was purchased in 1939 by the British Plaster Board Ltd. (now known as British Gypsum). Until its closure in January 1976 its workforce fluctuated between 12 and 29 (4 and 22 Underground; 4 and 18 Surface).The 1 millionth tonne of anhydrite was shipped to the plant in Widnes on May 20, 1959 (Bureau of Mines / Minerals yearbook metals and minerals (except fuels) 1959Year 1959, Volume I (1960) - McDougal, Robert B.; Jensen, Nan C.Gypsum, page 530: http://digicoll.library.wisc.edu/cgi-bin/EcoNatRes/EcoNatRes-idx?typeturn&entityEcoNatRes005608720538&isizetext) and before closure over 5 million tonnes were extracted.The mine owned several locomotives used to shunt carts between the mine, the plaster mill and the Railway junction. A 0-4-0 Barclay locomotive named W.S.T. (after the plaster companys deputy chairman William Steuart Trimble) that was delivered to the site on the 10th June 1954 and was transferred in 1969 now resides at the Railway in and Wear.Present dayToday the mine is in a poor state of repair however much of the site can be viewed from the public footpath that runs along the banks of the River Eden to from Salkeld to Caves. The rail tracks have not been lifted in many places and the public footpath follows its path with metalwork and sleepers exposed. The signal box used for the branch line still exists but like the mines buildings has been left to decay. Various objects have been left on the site, including train carts. What appears to be an entrance to the drift has been filled in. The newer buildings have Danger - Keep out signs, however in the area occupied by the older buildings there appear to be no fences or notices from the main footpath. The site has clearly been used by the public in recent years and various buildings are adorned with graffiti.References(General* Long Meg Article on Durham Mining Museum* Carlisle Plaster and Cement Company Ltd. Article on Durham Mining Museum* Visit Cumbria Article* Bowes Railway Article about W.S.T.See alsoGypsum in Cumbria by Ian Tyler (2000) - ISBN 0952302845
8755609
Chinese_industrialization
In the 1960s, about 60% of the Chinese labor force were employed in agriculture. The figure remained more or less constant throughout the early phase of industrialization between the 1960s and 1990s, but in view of the rapid population growth this amounted to a rapid growth of the industrial sector in absolute terms, of up to 8% per year during the 1970s. By 1990, the fraction of the labor force employed in agriculture had fallen to about 30%, and by 2000 still further. Historical precursors of industrialization In the of Wu of China, steel was first made, preceding the Europeans by over 1,000 years. The dynasty saw intensive industry in steel production, and coal mining.Image:Chinese Puddle and Blast Furnace.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The puddling process of smelting iron ore to make iron from iron, with the right illustration displaying men working a furnace, from the Tiangong Kaiwu encyclopedia, 1637.Western historians debate whether bloomin-based ironworking ever spread to China from the Middle East. Around BC, however, metalworkers in the southern state of Wu developed an iron smelting technology that would not be practiced in Europe until late medieval times. In Wu, iron smelters achieved a temperature of 1130C, hot enough to be considered a furnace which could create cast iron.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 2, 544 g)(Woods, 49-50.)(Wagner, 52.) At this temperature, iron combines with 4.3% carbon and melts. As a liquid, iron can be cast into molds, a method far less laborious than individually forging each piece of iron from a bloom.Cast iron is rather brittle and unsuitable for striking implements. It can, however, be decarburized to steel or wrought iron by heating it in air for several days. In China, these ironworking methods spread northward, and by BC, iron was the material of choice throughout China for most tools and weapons. A mass grave in Hebei province, dated to the early third century BC, contains several soldiers buried with their weapons and other equipment. The artifacts recovered from this grave are variously made of wrought iron, cast iron, malleabilized cast iron, and quench-hardened steel, with only a few, probably ornamental, bronze weapons.Image:Yuan Dynasty - waterwheels and smelting.png|thumb|left|260px|An illustration of furnace bellows operated by waterwheels, from the Nong Shu, by Wang Zhen, 1313 AD, during the Dynasty in China.During the Dynasty (BC&ndash;AD 220), the government established ironworking as a state monopoly (yet repealed during the latter half of the dynasty, returned to private entrepreneurship) and built a series of large blast furnaces in Henan province, each capable of producing several tons of iron per day. By this time, Chinese metallurgists had discovered how to puddle molten pig iron, stirring it in the open air until it lost its carbon and became wrought iron. (In Chinese, the process was called chao, literally, frying.) By the 1st century BC, Chinese metallurgists had found that wrought iron and cast iron could be melted together to yield an alloy of intermediate carbon content, that is, steel.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 3, 197.)(Needham, Volume 4, Part 3, 277.)(Needham, Volume 4, Part 3, 563 g) According to legend, the sword of Bang, the first Han emperor, was made in this fashion. Some texts of the era mention harmonizing the hard and the soft in the context of ironworking; the phrase may refer to this process. Also, the ancient city of Wan (Nanyang) from the Han period forward was a major center of the iron and steel industry.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 3, 86.) Along with their original methods of forging steel, the Chinese had also adopted the production methods of creating steel, an idea imported from India to China by the 5th century AD.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 1, 282.) The Chinese during the ancient Han Dynasty were also the first to apply hydraulic power (i.e. a waterwheel) in working the inflatable bellows of the blast furnace. This was recorded in the year 31 AD, an innovation of the engineer Shi, Prefect of Nanyang.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 2, 370) Although Du Shi was the first to apply water power to bellows in metallurgy, the first drawn and printed illustration of its operation with water power came in 1313 AD, in the Dynasty era text called the Nong Shu.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 2, 371.)  In the 11th century, there is evidence of the production of steel in Song China using two techniques: a berganesque method that produced inferior, heterogeneous steel and a precursor to the modern Bessemer process that utilized partial decarbonization via repeated forging under a cold blast.(Robert Hartwell, Markets, Technology and the Structure of Enterprise in the Development of the Eleventh Century Chinese Iron and Steel Industry Journal of Economic History 26 (1966). pp. 53-54) By the 11th century, there was also a large amount of deforestation in China due to the iron industrys demands for charcoal.(Ebrey, 158.) However, by this time the Chinese had figured out how to use bituminous coke to replace the use of charcoal, and with this switch in resources many acres of prime timberland in China were spared.( This switch in resources from charcoal to coal was later used in Europe by the 17th century.The economy  of the Song Dynasty was one of the most prosperous and advanced economies in the medieval world. Song Chinese invested their funds in joint stock companies and in multiple sailing vessels at a time when monetary gain was assured from the vigorous overseas trade and indigenous trade along the Grand Canal and Yangzi River.(Ebrey et al., 157.) Prominent merchant families and private businesses were allowed to occupy industries that were not already government-operated monopolies.(Ebrey et al., 164.)( Both private and government-controlled industries met the needs of a growing Chinese population in the Song.((Needham, Volume 4, Part 2, 23.) Both artisans and merchants formed guilds which the state had to deal with when assessing taxes, requisitioning goods, and setting standard workers wages and prices on goods.((Gernet, 88, 94.)The industry was pursued by both private entrepreneurs who owned their own smelters as well as government-supervised smelting facilities.(Wagner, 178179.)(Wagner, 181183.)  The Song economy was stable enough to produce over a hundred million kg (over two hundred million lb) of iron product a year.(Ebrey et al., 158.)  Large scale deforestation in China would have continued if not for the 11th century innovation of the use of coal instead of charcoal in  furnaces for smelting iron.(Ebrey, 158.)  Much of this iron was reserved for  military  use in crafting weapons and armoring troops, but some was used to fashion the many  iron products needed to fill the demands of the growing indigenous market. The iron trade within China was furthered by the building of new canals which aided the flow of iron products from production centers to the large market found in the capital city.(Embree 339.)Image:Song Dynasty Porcelain.jpg|thumb|right|Left item: A Northern Song qingbai-ware vase with a transparent blue-toned glaze, from Jingdezhen, 11th century; Center item: A Northern or Southern Song qingbai-ware bowl with incised lotus decorations, a metal rim, and a transparent blue-toned glaze, from Jingdezhen, 12th or 13th century; Right item: A Southern Song miniature model of a storage granary with removable top lid and doorway, qingbai porcelain with transparent blue-toned glaze, Jingdezhen, 13th century.The annual output of minted copper currency in 1085 alone reached roughly six billion coins.(Ebrey et al., 156.) The most notable advancement in the Song economy was the establishment of the worlds first government issued paper-printed money, known as Jiaozi (see also Huizi).(  For the printing of paper money alone, the Song court established several government-run factories in the cities of Huizhou, Chengdu, Hangzhou, and Anqi.(Needham, Volume 5, Part 1, 48.)  The size of the workforce employed in  paper money factories was large; it was recorded in 1175 that the factory at Hangzhou employed more than a thousand workers a day.(The economic power of Song China heavily influenced foreign economies abroad. The Moroccan geographer al-Idrisi wrote in 1154 of the prowess of Chinese merchant ships in the Indian Ocean and of their annual voyages that brought iron, swords, silk, velvet, porcelain, and various textiles to places such as Aden (Yemen), the River, and the Euphrates in modern-day Iraq.(Shen, 159161.)  Foreigners, in turn, had an impact on the Chinese economy. For example, many West Asian and Central Asian Muslims went to China to trade, becoming a preeminent force in the import and export industry, while some were even appointed as officers supervising economic affairs.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 3, 465.)()  Sea trade with the Southeast Pacific, the Hindu world, the Islamic world, and the East African world brought merchants great fortune and spurred an enormous growth in the shipbuilding industry of Song-era Fujian province.()  However, there was risk involved in such long overseas ventures. To reduce the risk of losing money  on maritime trade missions abroad, the historians Ebrey, Walthall, and Palais write:era investors usually divided their investment among many ships, and each ship had many investors behind it. One observer thought eagerness to invest in overseas trade was leading to an outflow of copper cash. He wrote, People along the coast are on intimate terms with the merchants who engage in overseas trade, either because they are fellow-countrymen or personal acquaintances...give the merchants money to take with them on their ships for purchase and return conveyance of foreign goods. They invest from ten to a hundred strings of cash, and regularly make profits of several hundred percent.(Ebrey et al., 159.)Reasons for the delay in industrializationSome historians such as Landes and Weber credit the different belief systems in China and Europe with dictating where the revolution occurred. The religion and beliefs of Europe were largely products of Judaeo-Christianity, Socrates, Plato, and Aristotle. Conversely, Chinese society was founded on men like Confucius, Mencius, Feizi (Legalism), Tzu (Taoism), and Buddha (Buddhism). The key difference between these belief systems was that those from Europe focused on the individual, while Chinese beliefs centered around relationships between people. The family unit was more important than the individual for the large majority of Chinese history, and this may have played a role in why the Revolution took much longer to occur in China. There was the additional difference as to whether people looked backwards to a reputedly glorious past for answers to their questions or looked hopefully to the future. The English school By contrast, there is a historical school which Goldstone has dubbed the English school which argues that China was not essentially different from Europe, and that many of the assertions that it was are based on bad historical evidence.Elvin argues that China was in a level equilibrium trap in which the non-industrial methods were efficient enough to prevent use of industrial methods with high initial capital. Pomeranz, in the Great Divergence, argues that Europe and China were remarkably similar in 1700, and that the crucial differences which created the Industrial Revolution in Europe were sources of coal near manufacturing centers, and raw materials such as food and wood from the World, which allowed Europe to expand economically in a way that China could not.(Immanuel Chung-Yueh Hsu. The Rise of Modern China, Oxford University Press US. ISBN 0-19-512504-5 Read it)Some have compared England directly to China, but the comparison between England and China has been viewed as a faulty one, since China is so much larger than England.  A more relevant comparison would be between Chinas Yangtze Delta region, Chinas most advanced region, the location of Hangzhou, Nanjing and contemporary Shanghai, and England.  This region of China is said to have had similar labor costs to England.(Andre Gunder Frank reORIENT University of England Press, 1998.  p. 312)  Moreover, an overall look at economic data from 1750 is somewhat staggering for a person used to Eurocentric conceptions.  According to Andre Gunder Frank, Particularly significant is the comparison of Asias 66 percent share of world population, confirmed above all by estimates for 1750, with its 80 percent share of production in the world at the same time.  So, two thirds of the worlds people in Asia produced four-fifths of total world output, while one-fifth of world population in Europe produced only a part of the remaining one-fifth share of world production, to which Europeans and Americans also contributed.(Andre Gunder Frank reORIENT University of England Press, 1998.  p. 173)  China was clearly Asias most advanced economy at the time and was in the middle of its 18th century boom brought on by a long period of stability under the Dynasty. Industrialization of the Peoples Republic of ChinaIndustrialization of China did occur on a significant scale only from the 1950s, in the Maoist Leap Forward  (). This was the plan used from 1958 to 1961 to transform the  Republic of China from a primarily agrarian economy by peasant farmers into a modern communist society through the process of agriculturalization and industrialization. Zedong based this program on the of Productive Forces. It ended in catastrophe as it triggered a widespread famine that resulted in millions of deaths.(Dennis Tao Yang. Chinas Agricultural Crisis and Famine of 19591961: A Survey and Comparison to Soviet Famines. MacMillan, Comparatrive economic Studies (2008) 50, 129.)As political stability was gradually restored following the Revolution of the late 1960s, a renewed drive for coordinated, balanced development was set in motion under the leadership of Premier Enlai. To revive efficiency in industry, Communist Party of China committees were returned to positions of leadership over the revolutionary committees, and a campaign was carried out to return skilled and highly educated personnel to the jobs from which they had been displaced during the Cultural Revolution. Universities began to reopen, and foreign contacts were expanded. Once again the economy suffered from imbalances in the capacities of different industrial sectors and an urgent need for increased supplies of modern inputs for agriculture. In response to these problems, there was a significant increase in investment, including the signing of contracts with foreign firms for the construction of major facilities for chemical fertilizer production, steel finishing, and oil extraction and refining. The most notable of these contracts was for thirteen of the worlds largest and most modern chemical fertilizer plants. During this period, industrial output grew at an average rate of 8 percent a year.At the milestone Third Plenum of the National Party Congresss 11th Central Committee which opened on December 22, 1978, the party leaders decided to undertake a program of gradual but fundamental reform of the economic system.() They concluded that the Maoist version of the centrally planned economy had failed to produce efficient economic growth and had caused China to fall far behind not only the industrialized nations of the West but also the new industrial powers of Asia: Japan, the of Korea, Singapore, Taiwan, and Kong. In the late 1970s, while Japan and Hong Kong rivaled European countries in modern technology, Chinas citizens had to make do with barely sufficient food supplies, rationed clothing, inadequate housing, and a service sector that was inadequate and inefficient. All of these shortcomings embarrassed China internationally.The purpose of the reform program was not to abandon communism but to make it work better by substantially increasing the role of mechanisms in the system and by reducingnot eliminatinggovernment planning and direct control. The process of reform was incremental. New measures were first introduced experimentally in a few localities and then were popularized and disseminated nationally if they proved successful. By 1987 the program had achieved remarkable results in increasing supplies of food and other consumer goods and had created a new climate of dynamism and opportunity in the economy. At the same time, however, the reforms also had created new problems and tensions, leading to intense questioning and political struggles over the programs future.The first few years of the reform program were designated the period of readjustment, during which key imbalances in the economy were to be corrected and a foundation was to be laid for a well-planned modernization drive. The schedule of Hua Guofengs ten-year plan was discarded, although many of its elements were retained. The major goals of the readjustment process were to expand exports rapidly; overcome key deficiencies in transportation, communications, coal, iron, steel, building materials, and electric power; and redress the imbalance between light and heavy industry by increasing the growth rate of light industry and reducing investment in heavy industry.In 1984, the fourteen largest coastal cities were designated as economic development zones, including Dalian, Tianjin, Shanghai, and Guangzhou, all of which were major commercial and industrial centers. These zones were to create productive exchanges between foreign firms with advanced technology and major Chinese economic networks.See also*in China*theory* of the Peoples Republic of China* history of China (Pre-1911)* history of Modern China*Divergence*of China*history of China*Revolution*Industrialization*inequality*Modernization*and technology in China*Movement 18611895*cooperation (19111941)Further reading*Adshead, S.A.M. (2004). Tang China: The Rise of the East in World History. New York: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 1403934568 (hardback).* Anderson, James A. (2008). Treacherous Factions: Shifting Frontier Alliances in the Breakdown of Sino-Vietnamese Relations on the Eve of the 1075 Border War, in Battlefronts Real and Imagined: War, Border, and Identity in the Chinese Middle Period, 191&ndash;226. Edited by Don J. Wyatt. New York: Palgrave MacMillan. ISBN 9781403960849.*Bol, Peter K. The Rise of Local History: History, Geography, and Culture in Southern Song and Yuan Wuzhou, Harvard Journal of Asiatic Studies (Volume 61, Number 1, 2001): 3776.*Brook, Timothy (1998). Confusions of Pleasure: Commerce and Culture in Ming China. Berkeley: University of England Press. ISBN 978-0-520-22154-3*Brose, Michael C. (2008). People in the Middle: Uyghurs in the Northwest Frontier Zone, in Battlefronts Real and Imagined: War, Border, and Identity in the Chinese Middle Period, 253&ndash;289. Edited by Don J. Wyatt. New York: Palgrave MacMillan. ISBN 9781403960849.*Ebrey, Patricia Buckley, Anne Walthall, Palais. (2006). East Asia: A Cultural, Social, and Political History. Boston: Mifflin Company. ISBN 0-618-13384-4.*__________. (1999). The Cambridge Illustrated History of China. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-66991-X (paperback).*Embree, Ainslie Thomas (1997). Asia in Western and World History: A Guide for Teaching. Armonk: ME Sharpe, Inc.*Chan, Alan Kam-leung and Gregory K. Clancey, Hui-Chieh Loy (2002). Historical Perspectives on East Asian Science, Technology and Medicine. Singapore: Singapore University Press. ISBN 9971692597*Fairbank, John King and Merle Goldman (1992). China: A New History; Second Enlarged Edition (2006). Cambridge; London: The Belknap Press of Harvard University Press. ISBN 0-674-01828-1*Fraser, Julius Thomas and Francis C. Haber. (1986). Time, Science, and Society in China and the West. Amherst: University of Massachusetts Press. ISBN 0-87023-495-1.*Gernet, Jacques (1962). Daily Life in China on the Eve of the Mongol Invasion, 1250-1276. Translated by H.M. Wright. Stanford: Stanford University Press. ISBN 0-8047-0720-0*Graff, David Andrew and Robin Higham (2002). A Military History of China. Boulder: Westview Press.*Guo, Qinghua. Yingzao Fashi: Twelfth-Century Chinese Building Manual, History: Journal of the of Architectural Historians of Great Britain (Volume 41 1998): 113.**Hansen, Valerie. (2000). The Open Empire: A History of China to 1600. New York & London: W.W. Norton & Company. ISBN 0393973743.*Hargett, James M. Some Preliminary Remarks on the Travel Records of the Song Dynasty (960&ndash;1279), Chinese Literature: Essays, Articles, Reviews (CLEAR) (July 1985): 6793.*Hargett, James M. Song Dynasty Local Gazetteers and Their Place in The History of Difangzhi Writing, Harvard Journal of Asiatic Studies (Volume 56, Number 2, 1996): 405442.*Hartwell, Robert M. Demographic, Political, and Social Transformations of China, 750-1550, Harvard Journal of Asiatic Studies (Volume 42, Number 2, 1982): 365442.*Hymes, Robert P. (1986). Statesmen and Gentlemen: The Elite of Fu-Chou, Chiang-Hsi, in Northern and Southern Sung. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521306310.*Hsu, Mei-ling. The Qin Maps: A Clue to Later Chinese Cartographic Development, Imago Mundi (Volume 45, 1993): 90-100.**Lorge, Peter (2005). War, Politics and Society in Early Modern China, 900&ndash;1795: 1st Edition. New York: Routledge.*McKnight, Brian E. (1992). Law and Order in Sung China. Cambridge: University Press.*Mohn, Peter (2003). Magnetism in the Solid State: An Introduction. New York: Springer-Verlag Inc. ISBN 3540431837*Mote, F.W. (1999). Imperial China: 900&ndash;1800. Harvard: Harvard University Press.*Needham, Joseph and Wang Ling. Horners Method in Chinese Mathematics: Its Origins in the Root-Extraction Procedures of the Han Dynasty, Toung Pao, Second Series, Vol. 43, No. 5 (1955): 345-401.*_________. (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 1, Introductory Orientations. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.*Needham, Joseph (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 3, Mathematics and the Sciences of the Heavens and the Earth. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.*__________. (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 4, Part 1. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.*__________. (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 4, Physics and Physical Technology, Part 2: Mechanical Engineering. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.*__________. (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 4, Physics and Physical Technology, Part 3: Civil Engineering and Nautics. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.*__________. (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 5, Chemistry and Chemical Technology, Part 7: Military Technology; The Gunpowder Epic. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.**Peers, C.J. (2006). Soldiers of the Dragon: Chinese Armies 1500 BC-AD 1840. Oxford: Osprey Publishing.*Pleiner, R. (2000) Iron in Archaeology. The European Bloomery Smelters, Praha, Archeologick stav Av Cr.*Rossabi, Morris (1988). Khubilai Khan: His Life and Times. Berkeley: University of England Press. ISBN 0-520-05913-1.*Rudolph, R.C. Preliminary Notes on Sung Archaeology, The Journal of Asian Studies (Volume 22, Number 2, 1963): 169177.*Sastri, Nilakanta, K.A. The Cas, University of Madras, Madras, 1935 (Reprinted 1984).*Schafer, Edward H. War Elephants in Ancient and Medieval China, Oriens (Volume 10, Number 2, 1957): 289&ndash;291.*Sen, Tansen. (2003). Buddhism, Diplomacy, and Trade: The Realignment of Sino-Indian Relations, 6001400. Manoa: Asian Interactions and Comparisons, a joint publication of the University of Hawaii Press and the Association for Asian Studies. ISBN 0824825934.*Shen, Fuwei (1996). Cultural flow between China and the outside world. Beijing: Foreign Languages Press. ISBN 7-119-00431-X.*Sivin, Nathan. (1995). Science in Ancient China. Brookfield, Vermont: VARIORUM, Ashgate Publishing.*Steinhardt, Nancy Shatzman. The Tangut Royal Tombs near Yinchuan, Muqarnas: An Annual on Islamic Art and Architecture (Volume X, 1993): 369-381.*Sung, Tzu, translated by Brian E. McKnight (1981). The Washing Away of Wrongs: Forensic Medicine in Thirteenth-Century China. Ann Arbor: of Michigan Press. ISBN 0892648007*Temple, Robert. (1986). The Genius of China: 3,000 Years of Science, Discovery, and Invention. With a forward by Joseph Needham. New York: Simon and Schuster, Inc. ISBN 0671620282.*Wagner, Donald B. The Administration of the Iron Industry in Eleventh-Century China, Journal of the Economic and Social History of the Orient (Volume 44 2001): 175197.*Wang, Lianmao (2000). Return to the City of Light: Quanzhou, an eastern city shining with the splendour of medieval culture. Fujian Peoples Publishing House.*West, Stephen H. Playing With Food: Performance, Food, and The Aesthetics of Artificiality in The Sung and Yuan, Harvard Journal of Asiatic Studies (Volume 57, Number 1, 1997): 67106.*Woods, Michael and Mary B. Woods (2000). Ancient Machines: From Wedges to Waterwheels. Minneapolis: Twenty-First Century Books.*Wright, Arthur F. (1959). Buddhism in Chinese History. Stanford: Stanford University Press.*Yuan, Zheng. Local Government Schools in Sung China: A Reassessment, History of Education Quarterly (Volume 34, Number 2; Summer 1994): 193213.ReferencesExternal links*China in midway of industrialization gov.cn (Oct 2007)*President: China to follow path of new type of industrialization gov.cn (Sept 2007)*CASS: China to realize full industrialization by 2021 gov.cn (Aug 2007)*Research on Chinas New Industrialization*China Hi-Tech Industrialization Association*China Net for Modernization Research*China and Europe, 1500-2000 and beyond: What is modern? with Ken Pomeranz and Bin Wong*http://www.hartford-hwp.com/archives/10/114.html, The Rise of the West or Not*Needham Puzzle, Weber Question, and Chinas Miracle: Long Term Performance since the Sung Dynasty (pdf file)* http://www.historycooperative.org/journals/whc/2.2/duchesne.html
8769104
Birley_Collieries
The Birley Collieries were a group of coal mines set in the Brook Valley in south east Sheffield, Yorkshire, England. They were connected to the railway system by a branch line from the Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railway at Woodhouse East Junction, about 800 yards east of Woodhouse station. The collieries The Birley collieries were owned by the Coal Company who also owned nearby Brookhouse and North Staveley collieries. These collieries stood either side of the M.S.& L.R. line less than a mile to the east of Woodhouse East Junction.In 1866 the Sheffield Coal Company, which had been founded in 1805, signed an agreement with the Manvers to work below his lands in the Frecheville, Woodhouse and Hackenthorpe area, just outside the then Sheffield boundary. Over the following ten years they sunk and developed Birley West Colliery on a site in the Shirebrook Valley between Woodhouse and Hackenthorpe.A further 10 year plan followed in which more land was acquired and a new shaft sunk, however, it was not until spring 1887 that work commenced on this new sinking. The following year the part completed colliery gained the name Birley East Colliery. Although a small amount of coal was being cut from the new colliery, brought to the surface at Birley West, it was not until 1890 when a new engine was installed that it fully came on stream. Later expansion came with mining rights being obtained from the Duke of Norfolk to mine below Handsworth Common. The end - not quite but nearly Birley West drew its last coal in 1908 and production then concentrated on the East pit.The last coal was drawn at Birley East on 15 October 1943 but the life of the pit was not quite at an end. In December 1943 Bevin, the Minister of Labour announced to the House of Commons at a ballot was to be held, from time to time, in which those men whose National Service Registration Certificates end with the chosen number would be transferred to the mines. This gave rise to the term Boy. Many colliers had the new trainees alongside the production unit but at Birley they were able to use the recently closed facilities. Accommodation was provided in Nissen huts on Beighton Road, the first occupants arriving in early 1944.Following the end of War II and the demobilisation of the Boys, came new trainees, this time men from our allies in Europe wanting to make their home in England, particularly a large contingent from Poland. Even after the last trainee moved on the end was not quite in site, a new borehole topped with a pumping house was constructed on the site to help solve the water table problems at Brookhouse. This operated until the closure of Brookhouse Colliery in 1986 when it was finally switched off  the end for Birley had arrived.  The Birley Branch In 1851 the Manchester, Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railway proposed to construct a series of short branch lines with the objective of increasing the railways coal carrying. Parliamentary permission for these lines was granted under the M.S.& L.R. (Coal Branches) Act, 1852 but only one of the lines was built, that from Woodhouse East Junction to Birley (West) Colliery.The Birley Coal Branch was 2.75 miles in length and came into use in June 1855, having being built by Thomas Waring and Company for the sum of 9989.00. The line was single track and operated under One engine in steam principle. The line was worked by the M.S.& L.R. (later Central Railway and & North Eastern Railway) until 1934 when the colliery company took over operations. It was at this time that the colliery changed from a production unit to a training centre. The Birley Paddy Mail accident, 1920 This accident took place on the section between Woodhouse and  Birley West colliery. The Paddy Mail was topped and tailed by colliery locomotives, BIRLEY No.3 at the front and ORIENT at the rear. The driver on the front locomotive, Mr. A. Brammer, should have been in possession of the single line staff for the section, but he did not have it and the train was involved in a head on accident with a light locomotive coming in the opposite direction. The two coaches were so badly damaged that they were replaced with a rake, bought second-hand, from the Great Northern Railway.Didnt we have a lovely day.....The Paddy Mails were not the only passenger trains to use the branch. On an annual basis, from the mid-1890s to the outbreak of World War One, the branch was used by the Pitmens Family Outing  a trip, on which the workers voted for the destination from a selection of seaside resorts. The workers contributed 2d (less than 1p) per week to the trip fund.  The trains were run on Saturdays and started as early as 3.00 a.m. from the colliery yard, passengers boarding by ladder into coaches which could only be described as basic- compartment stock with no toilets. The return train, depending on destination, could arrive back well into the early hours of the Sunday morning.On 15 June 1907 three trains were run, in the working timetable, No.15 from Beighton at 5.00 a.m., No.14 and No.16 from Birley Colliery yard at 4.35 a.m. and 5.10 a.m. to Bridlington and Scarborough. All trains also called at Woodhouse. The trains arrived back just after midnight.In total these trains were shown as carrying 50 Committee, 2,500 adults and 350 children.In 1913 the excursion ran to Blackpool with a departure time from the colliery yard around 3.00 a.m. and an arrival back at 5.00 a.m. on the Sunday. Locomotives All the locomotives, except those shown, passed to the Coal Board on nationalisation. The locomotives could be found working at either Birley or Brookhouse collieries as required, although some were allocated specific workings.Abbreviations:Cylinders: * IC:Inside Frames * OC:Outside Frames.Builders: * AB:Barclay & Sons Co.* HC:Hudswell Clarke & Co* MW:Manning Wardle & Co.* P :Peckett & Sons, Bristol References * East of Sheffield, by Roger Milnes, Forward  The Journal of the Great Central Railway Society, No.16, March 1978. ISSN 0141-4488. * Great Central Railway  Original Working Timetables. Further Reading and Listening * Winding Up  the History of Birley East Colliery by Alan Rowles. Published by the author with assistance from Rotherham Metropolitan Borough Libraries. 1992. ISBN O 903666-61-8* The Victorians  Cyril and Walter Hare. BBC Radio Sheffield / South Yorkshire Sound Archive.
8787654
Yukon_general_election,_1917
The 1917 Yukon general election was held on March 15, 1917 to elect the ten members to the the Yukon Legislative Council. This election was contested between the Liberals and Conservatives.CampaignThis campaign was contested by the Yukon and Liberal parties. The Liberals platform was primarily focused on improving working conditions, while the Conservative platform focused on infrastructure development. Both parties pledged to allow women to vote and stayed neutral on prohibition.()()Liberal platformThe Liberals campaigned on a platform of progressive legislation. They pledged to introduce if elected to bring in suffrage, reducing public works employee work days to 8 hours a day without reducing wages, a new workers compensation act, a pledge to experiment with farming in the Yukon and lowering the cost of medical services and legal fees.(In addition to powers covered under territorial jurisdiction, the party pledged to lobby the federal government to put an exemption limit of $1000.00 for royalty payments paid by prospectors and miners. They planned to do this by establishing a memorial to send prayers to Ottawa.( The party also decided to take no stand on the question of liquor prohibition which had been voted on a few months prior to the election.(Conservative platformThe Yukon Territorial Conservative Association pledged to bring in womans suffrage, establish an old peoples home, limit the time that mining claims can be registered under the Yukon Placer Mining Act and establish a road network, and wireless telegraph network with rural yukon and southern Canada. The Conservatives also took a neutral stance regarding the question of prohibition.(ResultsThe electoral districts of North Dawson and South Dawson returned two members each.ReferencesExternal links*Elections Yukon
8798530
Rio_Puerco_(Rio_Grande)
 map1_locator  The Rio Puerco is a tributary of the Grande in the state of Mexico. From its source on the west side of the Mountains, it flows about ,(Calculated in Earth) generally south to join the Rio Grande about  south of Belen and about  south of Albuquerque. Its basin is about  large, of which probably about  are noncontributing.(The Rio Puerco is ephemeral, with no streamflow for part of the year. Its discharge averages . The maximum officially recorded discharge was , in 1941. The greatest flood since about 1880 occurred on September 23, 1929, with an estimated discharge of . Another flood, on August 12, 1929, reached an estimated .()CourseThe Rio Puerco arises in the San Pedro Peaks area of the Mountains, in the Pedro Parks Wilderness area of the Fe National Forest. It flows generally south and southwest, leaving the mountains and national forest near the village of Cuba. From there the river flows generally south. It flows along the west side of the Indian Reservation. Arroyo Chico joins from the west, between Mesa San Luis and Mesa Chiuato. The Rio Puerco continues south, passing west of Mesa Prieta, then through the Laguna Indian Reservation and the Indian Reservation. Near the BernalilloValencia county line and the Isleta Indian Reservation the river is joined by the San Jose, which flows from the west near Grants through the Laguna Reservation. The Rio Puerco continues south to the Rio Grande about  south of Belen and about  south of Albuquerque.(USGS maps)HistoryThe Rio Puerco Valley is notable for once hosting a significant numbers of Anasazi (Basketmaker II) people, many of them fleeing the collapse of the civilization.In the 1860s the US Army moved strongly against Native American raiding west of the Rio Grande. By the late 1860s the Navajo were no longer a chronic threat and the Apache had been pushed back into the high mountains. The Hispanos living along the Rio Grande were able to move west with some security for the first time. Hispano colonists from Albuquerque and Bernalillo quickly occupied every irrigable patch of land along the Rio Puerco. By the middle of the 20th century decades of overgrazing and flooding had rendered the Rio Puerco country virtually uninhabitable and it was abandoned.()Nuclear ContaminationThe Puerco River once was known among local Navajos as T Nizhn or, beautiful water. Between the early 1950s and 1986, the stream received discharges of both treated and untreated uranium mine dewatering effluents.The largest expulsion of radioactive material in the United States occurred July 16, 1979, at 5 a.m. on the Navajo Nation, less than 12 hours after President Carter had proposed plans to use more nuclear power and fossil fuels. Over 1,100 tons of uranium mining waste cracked through a packed-mud dam near Church Rock, New Mexico. With the tailings, 100 million gallons of radioactive water gushed through the dam before the crack was repaired. By 8 am, radioactivity was monitored in Gallup, N.M., nearly 50 miles away. The Rio Puerco river showed 7,000 times the allowable standard of radioactivity for drinking water below the broken dam shortly after the breach was repaired, according to the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. Several surface water samples were collected and analyzed by a variety by state and federal agencies between July 16, 1979 and 1985. Regulatory concern for the long-term impacts of the tailings spill and chronic dewatering releases waned in the mid-1980s after New Mexico environmental officials reported that surface waters in the Puerco had returned to pre-spill conditions. (NMEID 1982)Subsequent surface water sampling and analyses by the Arizona Department of Health Services (ADHS) in 1985 and by Southwest Research and Information Center (SRIC) in 1986 and 1987 confirmed the continued presence of high concentrations of gross alpha radioactivity and radium-226 in stream flows. ADHS reported exceedances of state surface-water quality limits for gross alpha radioactivity and radium-226. (ADHS 1985) Similarly, SRIC, reporting on analytical results of samples it collected in runoff waters in the Puerco in July 1986 and July 1987, documented the highest gross alpha and gross beta particle activities and radium-226 concentrations recorded since the days immediately following the tailings spill. (Shuey and Morgan 1988) Radium-226 (total) concentrations, for example, were 180 pCi/I and 130 pCi/I in samples collected from the Puerco at Lupton, Arizona, on July 16, 1986, and on July 31, 1987, respectively. Those radium concentrations exceeded applicable stream water standards in both New Mexico and Arizona. They were accompanied by high levels of suspended sediments: 82,100 milligrams per liter (mg/1) and 92,100 mg/l in July 1986 and July 1987, respectively. Particle-size analyses conducted by the U.S. Geological Survey on the SRIC samples collected in 1987 suggested that the radium is attached to fine-grained clays and is transported farther down stream with each successive runoff event. (Shuey and Morgan 1988)Radioactive mill tailings have been dispersed by the wind throughout desert ecosystems in the Southwest at Laguna Pueblo and the Navajo Nation. The radioactive waste water spewed into the Rio Puerco River and the Rio Puerco Watershed was never cleaned up.Recently, the United States Department of Energy has issued permits to allow uranium mining at the Grand Canyon. On March 15, U.S. Secretary of Energy Steven Chu stated the disaster in Japan is not a reason to delay an expanded use of nuclear energy in the United States. President Obama commented on March 17, 2011 that nuclear power is also an important part of our own energy future. Sediment and erosionAs it carries high levels of sediment, the Rio Puerco is a major source of suspended particulate matter.(Aby S, Gellis A, Pavich M. The Rio Puerco Arroyo Cycle and the History of Landscape Changes. USGS Earth Surface Dynamics Program.)  Overgrazing has made the Rio Puerco Basin of central New Mexico one of the most eroded river basins of the western United States and has increased the high sediment content of the river.(Desertification, United States Geological Survey (1997)) The USGS collects suspended-sediment samples at its stream gage three miles (5 km) above the rivers mouth. A maximum daily mean of sediment concentration of 41,700 mg/L was recorded on July 25, 2008. The maximum recorded daily sediment load was 2,240,000 tons, recorded on August 7, 1957.(See also* of rivers of New Mexico* of tributaries of the Rio GrandeReferences
8804998
Conchita_Carpio-Morales
footnotes    Conchita Carpio-Morales (born June 19, 1941) is the newly-appointed and current of the Philippines. She was previously an Justice of the Supreme Court of the Philippines. Carpio-Morales is married to Eugenio T. Morales, Jr., with whom she has two sons, Eugenio III and Umberto.() Profile She was born on June 19, 1941 in Paoay, Norte. She is the daughter of Lucas D. Carpio, a judge, and Maria Claudio Carpio.In 1964, Carpio-Morales earned a degree in Economics at the of the Philippines.( In 1968, she earned a of Laws at the of the Philippines College of Law.( From 1968 to 1971, she started her career in a Manila firm where she was an Assistant Attorney.( In 1971, a former of the Philippines professor of Carpio-Morales, of Justice Abad Santos, took her in as a Special Assistant at the Department of Justice.( From 1971 to 1983, Carpio-Morales worked at the Department of Justice as assistant, lawyer, researcher, assistant special lawyer and senior state counsel before she became a judge.(Between 1983 to 1986, President Marcos appointed Carpio-Morales as a court judge in Camarines Sur.( On November 4, 1986, President Aquino appointed Carpio-Morales as court judge in City.(In 1994, President V. Ramos appointed her to the Court of Appeals. She headed the 7th Division of the Court of Appeals.(In 2000, Carpio-Morales was a bar examiner in ethics. She also conferred the Ulirang Ina Award for Law and the Judiciary by the National Mothers Day & Fathers Day Foundation, Inc.(On September 3, 2002, upon the unanimous endorsement of the members of the and Bar Council, Carpio-Morales was appointed to the high court by former President Gloria Macapagal Arroyo.()Traditionally, it is the Justice of the Supreme Court of the Philippines who administers the of office to the incoming President and the Vice President, however, incoming President Aquino III refused to allow Chief Justice Corona to swear him into office, due to Aquinos opposition to the midnight appointment of Corona by outgoing President Macapagal-Arroyo on May 12, 2010, two days after the 2010 elections and a month before Arroyos term expires.() Instead, Aquino formally requested Associate Justice Carpio-Morales, who opposed the midnight appointment of Corona, to swear him into office.( On June 30, 2010, President Aquino III and Vice President Binay took the oath of office at the Grandstand in Park, Manila.()() The oath of office was administered by Associate Justice Carpio-Morales, who officially accepted Aquinos request to swear him into office,()( reminiscent of the decision of Aquinos mother, President Aquino, who in 1986, was sworn into the presidency by Associate Justice Teehankee.()On July 25, 2011, during his State of the Nation Address, President Aquino announced the appointment of Carpio-Morales as Ombudsman of the Philippines.(http://www.gov.ph/2011/07/25/benigno-s-aquino-iii-second-state-of-the-nation-address-july-25-2011-en/) Some notable opinions * John Hay Peoples Alternative Coalition v. Lim (2003)  on authority of the President to grant tax exemptions without congressional authorization* Francisco v. House of Representatives (2003)  on the impeachment resolution against Chief Justice Davide, Jr.* La Bugal- BLaan Tribal Association, Inc. v. Ramos I (2004) and II (2004) - Dissenting  on the constitutionality of the Mining Act of 1995 (Dissent joined by J. Ynares-Santiago)* Tecson v. COMELEC (2004) - Dissenting  on the nationality of presidential candidate Poe, Jr. (joined by J. Quisumbing and Corona)* Central Bank Employees v. BSP (2004) - Dissenting  on claims for wage increases of government employees in accordance with protection clause even absent enabling legislation* CSC v. DBM (2005)  on fiscal autonomy of Civil Service Commission* Yuchengco v. Sandiganbayan (2006)  on the recovery of shares of stock in PLDT as part of the ill-gotten wealth of Marcos* Senate v. Ermita (2006)  on validity of presidential ban prohibiting executive officials testifying before legislative inquiries without presidential consent* Santos-Concio v. Department of Justice (2008)  on the DOJs conduct of preliminary investigation of the Wowoweee stampede incident* Trillanes IV v. Pimentel, Sr. (2008)  on the general and blanket request of Senator Antonio Trillanes IV, who is detained for rebellion charges, to attend Senate Sessions* The Province of North Cotabato v. Republic (2008) - on the unconstitutionality of  the of Agreement on the Ancestral Domain Aspect (MOA-AD) of the Government of the Republic of the Philippines (GRP)-Islamic Liberation Front (MILF) Agreement on Peace of 2001* Topacio v. Ong (2008) - on the qualification status of Justice Gregory Ong as Associate Justice of the Sandiganbayan* Strategic Alliance Development Corporation v. Radstock Securities Ltd. (2009) - Concurring  on the multi-billion peso compromise agreement between Radstock Securities Limited and Philippine National Construction Corporation* De Castro v. Judicial and Bar Council - Dissenting(March 2010) and - Dissenting(April 2010)   on the Presidents power to appoint the Chief Justice vis-a-vis the Constitutional prohibition against appointments during the presidential election period. External links * Justice Conchita Carpio-Morales (Official Supreme Court Webpage)*  Abs-Cbn Interactive, The boundaries of presidential secrecyReferences       Carpio-Morales
8816329
Horace_F._Page
Horace Francis Page (October 20, 1833-August 23, 1890) was an American politician that represented a Californian district in the States House of Representatives. He was born near Medina, Orleans County, York. He attended public schools and Millville Academy and then taught school in La Porte County, Indiana until 1854. Then, he moved to California and engaged in the sawmill business near Colfax. He moved to Placerville and engaged in the livery-stable business. He became engaged in mining, as a mail contractor, and as a stage proprietor.Horace Page studied law, was admitted to the bar, and commenced practice in California. He was an unsuccessful Republican candidate for state senate in 1869. He served as a major in the California Militia. He was elected as a Republican to the United States Congress and the four succeeding Congresses. He served from March 4, 1873 to March 3, 1883. During the United States Congress, he was the chairman of the Committee on Commerce. In 1882, he was an unsuccessful candidate for re-election to the United States Congress.In 1884, Horace Page was a delegate to the National Convention. He resumed the practice of law in D.C. He died in San Francisco, California and was interred in Mountain View Cemetery, California. References  External links * 
8832902
Rock_Creek_Gold_Rush
The Rock Creek Gold Rush was a rush in the Country region of the of British Columbia (now part of a province). The rush was touched off in 1859 when two US soldiers  were driven across the border to escape pursuing Indians and chanced on gold only three miles into British territory, on the banks of the Kettle River where it is met by Rock Creek, and both streams turn east to where in times since developed the city of Grand Forks (so-named because of its location at the confluence of the Kettle and Granby). The first claim was filed by an Adam Beam (or Beame) in 1860, and the rush was on, composed mostly of Americans and some Chinese, all of whom had come overland from other workings, either at Colville or Oregon or all the way from California. At its peak, an estimated 5,000 men were in the area, where the new town of Rock Creek had grown to a population of about 300, when trouble broke out between American and Chinese miners, and the efforts of the colonys Commissioner OReilly to end the disturbances, as well as to collect the Queens mining licenses, resulted in him being driven from the mining camp by a hail of stones in what has become known to history as the Rock Creek War, as it was dubbed at the time by the Victoria newspapers.End of Rock Creek WarOReilly fled to Victoria and reported to Governor Douglas, who after a trip to Lillooet via Port Douglas and the Lakes Route, went on into Princeton (which on the way he named Princetown, in honour of the Prince of Wales, visiting distant Canada at the time; also during this visit to Lillooet the Governor approved its residents new name for the former Cayoosh Flat). Douglas, accompanied by W.G. Cox, who was to be new commissioner, and Bushby, most well-known for being clerk and companion to Judge Begbie, proceeded to Rock Creek. Once he arrived, he admonished a meeting of 200 miners and told them if they didnt follow his orders, he would come back with 500 marines. As he had at Yale two seasons earlier, he also instructed them the Chinese had the same rights to the gold workings as any other, and further molestation of them would not be permitted.  At the end of the meeting, he insisted on shaking each mans hand and looking them in the eye as they left the tent as a way of ingraining his personal expectations on each of them.The workings on Rock Creek did not last many years, and when the Gold Rush began soon after, many Americans went on to the new diggings and Rock Creeks gold-mining heyday became a memory. The troubles of this goldfield were a critical demonstration of Douglas awareness communication between the Coast and the Interior was vital to the security of the colony, underscoring his contracting of Dewdney to build a trail from Hope to the Kootenay (where similar troubles had broken out). The purpose of the Dewdney Trail was to prevent draining the Interiors gold and other resources from to the United States, as well as to be able to deploy troops should trouble break out and either Indian war or outright annexationist uprising should arise in areas where access to and through the United States was far easier than from the Coast.See also*rush*War*of British Columbia*Columbia Gold Rushes (index)*Canyon Gold Rush*Canyon War*Colville Gold Rush*Trail*Country*Ellice Bridge DisasterReferences*McGowans War, Donald J. Hauka, New Star Books, Vancouver (2000) ISBN 1-55420-001-6*British Columbias Highway 3: The Dewdney Trail - Hope to Fort Steele, Garnet Basque, Heritage House Publishing, Surrey BC (1967).*British Columbia Chronicle, 1847-1871: Gold & colonists, Helen and G.P.V. Akrigg, Discovery Press, Vancouver (1977) ISBN 0-919624-03-0External links*Crowsnest Highway history site (excellent detailed history of the Rock Creek Gold Rush) 
8838379
Pandabeswar_(community_development_block)
footnotes               Pandabeswar (community development block) (also spelt Pandaveswar) () is an administrative division in subdivision of district in the Indian state of Bengal. Andal and Pandabeswar police stations serve this block. Headquarters of this block is at Pandabeswar.  Khottamdi, Ramnagar, Dalurband, Bilpahari, Nabgram, Sankarpur, Haripur, Konardihi, Bahula and Chhora are  urban areas in this block. The census towns Bankola and Parashkol are both partly in Andal block and partly in Pandabeswar block.()()  HistoryDuring World War II there was an American airbase at Pandabeswar. ( War Birds of India ) The airbase still exists, people visit the place for its historical value and to enjoying evening walks.Geography Pandabeswar is located at .  Pandabeswar community development block has an area of 97.89   km2.( The Asansol-Durgapur region is composed of undulating latterite soil. This area lies between two mighty rivers  the Damodar and the Ajay. They flow almost parallel to each other in the region  the average distance between the two rivers is around 30 km. For ages the area was heavily forested and infested with plunderers and marauders. The discovery of coal led to industrialisation of the area and most of the forests have been cleared.(Chattopadhyay, Akkori, Bardhaman Jelar Itihas O Lok Sanskriti (History and Folk lore of Bardhaman District.), , Vol I, pp 14-15, Radical Impression. ISBN 81-85459-36-3)  Gram panchayatspanchayats of Pandabeswar block/samiti are: Bahula, Baidyanathpur, Chhora, Haripur, Kendra and Nabagram.()DemographicsAs per 2001 census, Pandabeswar block had a total population of 146,445, out of which 79,992 were males and 66,453 were females. Pandabeswar block registered a population growth of 9.37 per cent during the 1991-2001 decade. Decadal growth for Bardhaman district was 14.36 per cent.(Decadal growth in West Bengal was 17.84 per cent.()						Scheduled castes at 55,511 formed around one-third the population. Scheduled tribes numbered 14,508.()EconomyPandabeswar is a coal mining area.( Chattopadhyay, Akkori, Bardhaman Jelar Itihas O Lok Sanskriti (History and Folk lore of Bardhaman District.),  , Vol I, p 48, Radical Impression. ISBN 81-85459-36-3 ) One of the area headquarters of Coalfields Limited., a subsidiary of India Limited is located here. ( ECL website - see under head Corporate  Geographic location and area ) Transport Pandabeswar is 20 km from Andal on the Andal-Sainthia line of Eastern Railway.(Eastern Railway rime table)There is an all-weather rail bridge and fair weather road bridge across the Ajay at Pandabeswar.LiteracyAs per 2001 census, Pandabeswar block had a total literacy of 63.73 per cent for the 6+ age group. While male literacy was 73.56 per cent female literacy was 51.65 per cent. Bardhaman district had a total literacy of 70.18 per cent, male literacy being 78.63 per cent and female literacy being 60.95 per cent.()External links* District map showing blocksReferences
8850815
Peter_Crerar
Peter Crerar (1785 Breadalbane, Scotland  5 November 1856 Pictou, Scotia) was a Scottish-Nova Scotian engineer. He designed the first railway in British North America, and the first gauge railroad in North America, at Stellarton, near Pictou, Nova Scotia.The 1836 Albion Mines RailwaySamson on the Albion Mines Railway, designed by Peter Crerar.jpg|thumb|250px|right|The Samson locomotive on the Albion Mines Railway.Crerar had shown an early interest in railways as early as 3 February 1836 when he wrote a lengthy letter concerning a proposed railway between Halifax and Windsor. Later in 1836 the Mining Association of London, England, owners of the Mines, now Stellarton, decided to build a railway from the Albion Mines to its loading grounds on the East River. At that time there were few construction engineers in the area. Peter Crerar, a government land surveyor, was given the task. The plans were sent to the head office of the Mining Association in London, with the request that an engineer be sent out to execute them. When the plans were submitted to Stephenson, builder of the locomotive who had engineered the construction of the and Darlington, Englands first railroad, he reported to the Mining Association that, in his opinion, the person who prepared the drawings was capable of executing them. The railway was then built under the supervision of Peter Crerar.Seven original maps and charts drawn by Crerar for the project between August 1837 and December 1838 were unearthed in a building being vacated by the Department of Mines in Stellarton. They are now preserved in the Scotia Museum of Industry.	The building of the Mines Railway began in 1836 and the road was opened for traffic in 1839. The line,  in length, was so nearly straight that the least radius of its curves was 1 -- . The estimated quantity of excavations was 400,000 cubic yards. At the water terminus there was a wharf  long by  wide, commanding a fall of  above high water level at the shoots. The masonry, bridges, culverts, etc., were of cut freestone, from a nearby quarry. The total cost of construction was $160,000.	While the railroad was being constructed, three locomotives were being built in England by Hackworth. They were landed at Pictou in May 1839 and brought up the East River in lighters, towed by a Mining Company steamship. The locomotives were Samson, Hercules, and Buddle. The three locomotives were accompanied by John Stubbs, Hackworths shop foreman, who directed their assembly before returning to England. Two locomotive engineers also came with the engines, George Greathead (whose name does not appear in the Nova Scotia record) and George Davidson. Davidson served as Samsons driver throughout the engines working life and accompanied the locomotive to railway exhibits in Chicago in 1883 and 1893.	As George Patterson reports, the ceremonial opening in 1839 was celebrated province-wide:The opening of the railroad was made the occasion of general rejoicing. The two steamers, Pocahontas and Albion, with lighters attached, each carried from Pictou about 1,000 persons to New Glasgow, whence they were taken by train to the mines. Crowds of people on horseback and on foot were there assembled from all parts of the country. Here a procession was formed of the various trades, the Masonic lodges, the Pictou Volunteer Artillery Company, as visitors mounted, with bands of music and pipers at intervals, and various banners, marched to New Glasgow and back again, when the Artillery Company fired a salute. A train of waggons, fitted up to receive passengers, had been attached to each engine, and, being filled with the crowd, now made the first trip to New Glasgow and back again, giving a new sensation to multitudes.On their return, a feast was given to the employees of the Company, for which . of beef and mutton, with corresponding quantities of other articles, were provided; a dinner was given to invited guests, and the night was spent in general festivityHerb MacDonald similarly recounts the celebrations:The Observer September 1839 reported:Today the Albion Mines Railway is commemorated by the Samson Trail following the route of the old railway from the Scotia Museum of Industry along the East River towards Abercrombie. The railways locomotive Samson is preserved at the museum and is the oldest surviving locomotive in Canada.Other engineering projectsCrerars earliest recorded work was the drawing up plans for James Anglican Church, Pictou in 1824. The main figure behind this churchs construction was Henry Hatton, later to be Crerars sons father-in-law.Throughout his life he served as a surveyor on roads and projects in the Pictou area, including the road between Mount Thom and Pictou, the Fishers Grant Road, the French River, Huggins, and Sutherland Bridges, the pier at Arisaig, the Wallace Bridge, and the road from West Chester to Amherst.In 1845 he was a member of a local committee in Pictou County formed to support the proposed Halifax and Quebec Railway project. In 1851, as part of the first phase of planning for the Nova Scotia Railway, he carried out surveys for a proposed route north from Truro to Pictou. When built, the Pictou Branch followed another route selected by Sandford Fleming.Crerar served as Deputy Registrar General of Pictou County. He was later made Commissioner for Improvements to the Pictou section of the Main Post Road of Pictou.Emigration to CanadaHis only known residence in Scotland was the farm of Cuiltrannich, in Lawers, Kenmore Parish, on the north shore of Tay. His family departed for Canada in July 1817, probably aboard the Hope, which sailed from Greenock to Pictou in 1817. He first gained employment as a schoolteacher.Family	His wife was Anne Clarke (born circa 1791 Nessintully, Laggan, Invernesshire - died  15 April 1865 Pictou, Nova Scotia), daughter of Ewan Clarke. Peter and Anne had eight children: Crerar (born 18 August 1815, Cuiltrannich, Lawers, Kenmore - died 26 December 1889 Glenalmond, Pictou); May Crerar (born on a passage to North America upon the Banks of Newfoundland, 19 July 1817; died Grant, Nova Scotia, 8 June 1818); Captain Clarke Crerar (born 18 July 1819, Fishers Grant - drowned 19 January 1857, on wreck of the Lord Ashburton at Manan Island); Capt. William Grant Crerar (born 12 August, 1821 Pictou - died 2 April 1898 Glenalmond, Pictou); James Peter Crerar (born 15 September 1823 Pictou - died 23 April 1885, Military Asylum, Chelsea, England); Capt. Daniel Crerar (born 19 January 1826 Pictou  died circa 18 January 1859 Shanghai, China); Capt. Peter Crerar (born 10 July 1828 Pictou - died 4 May 1868 Cardiff, Wales); Capt. David Stewart Crerar (born 13 August 1830 Pictou - died 2 June 1893 Pictou).Death			His Pictou obituary reads as follows:	DiedAt Pictou, on Wednesday, 5th inst., Peter Crerar, Esq., a native of Breadalbane, Perthshire, Scotland, First Deputy Surveyor and Registrar of Deeds for the County of Pictou, aged 71. But few men have passed from our midst whose loss will be more generally or so extensively regretted. He has left a widow and seven sons to mourn their loss. His catholic spirit, his clear judgment, and his honest disposition, made him one of the most respected members of the community, as was evinced by one of the largest funeral processions ever witnessed at that place. He was connected with the Church of Scotland from his youth, and clung to her standards through all her trials and difficulties, and was Chairman of St. Andrews Church Pictou for many years previous to his death, in which capacity he made entire satisfaction. Among his last expressions were these words, I have unwavering confidence in Christ Jesus my Saviour.	He is buried in the Hill Cemetery, Pictou.	Sources	* The Novascotian, 1 June 1836* The Pictou Observer, 24 September 1839* Journal and Proceedings of the House of Assembly of the Province of Nova Scotia, 20 February 1846, p. 448* Presbyterian Witness, 22 Nov. 1856, 187* Eastern Chronicle, 13 Nov. 1856, p. 3* Perth Courier, 22 January 1857, p. 2, col.5* George Patterson, A History of the County of Pictou, Nova Scotia (Dawson Brothers: Montreal, 1877)* C.W. Lunn, Macleanss, October 1936; quoted in George MacLaren, The Pictou Book, 1st ed., (New Glasgow, N.S. : Hector, 1954), pp. 245-47* Collections of the Nova Scotia Historical Society, vol.34, 1963* Edwin T. Bliss, Albion Mines, Pictou County, Nova Scotia, Nova Scotia Historical Society, Vol.#39 (1977)* St. James Centennial Committee, A Lion in Thistle : A History of St. James Anglican Church, Pictou, Nova Scotia (Pictou, 1979)* S.E. Woods, Cinders & Saltwater (Nimbus, Halifax, 1992)* D.A. Crerar, The Crerar Compendium (Vancouver, 2nd ed., 1996)* Herb MacDonald, The Albion Mines Railway of 1839-40, in Andy Guy and Jim Rees (eds), Early Railways, (The Newcomen Society, London, 2001), pp. 266-77* Herb MacDonald, Peter Crerar, in M. Chrimes at al (eds),Biographical Dictionary of Civil Engineers, vol 2, 1830-1890, (Thomas Telford, London, 2008), pp. 207-08External links* Nova Scotia Railway Hall of Fame* Railways of Canada Archives
8864989
Morwellham_Quay
Image:Waterwheel at Morwellham Quay.jpg|thumb|right|The  overshot wheel, which once powered a mill for crushing locally-mined manganese.Image:Morwellham quay dock.jpg|thumb|right|The Great Dock and the restored Tamar sailing ship Garlandstone.Morwellham Quay is a historic river port in Devon, England that developed to support the local mines. The port had its peak in the era and is now run as a tourist attraction and museum. It is the terminus of the Canal, and has its own copper mine.The air museum includes the restored 19th century village, the docks and quays, a restored ship, the George and Charlotte copper mine which is toured by a small train, a Victorian farm and a nature reserve with trails.In July 2006, UNESCO (the cultural arm of the United Nations) awarded World Heritage Site status to the and West Devon Mining Landscape area. Morwellham is strategically sited at the centre of the Tamar Valley Mining District which, together with nearby Tavistock, forms the easternmost gateway area to the rest of the Heritage Site. The Heritage museum is an Anchor Point of ERIH, The Route of Industrial Heritage.HistoryMorwellham Quay was originally set up by the Benedictine monks of Abbey, which was founded in 961, to carry goods to and from Plymouth on the Tamar, since the Tavy was unnavigable. By the 12th century, tin ore was being transported through the quay, followed by lead and silver ores in the 13th century.(History) Later, copper deposits were also discovered at the Quay itself and the and Charlotte Mine opened in the 18th century. In addition, by 1800, manganese deposits were being extracted from the northern and western edges of Dartmoor and being brought to Morwellham.By the end of the 18th century, the trail of pack horses across the rugged terrain was too much, and in 1817 the 4.5 mile long Canal was opened. The canal included a 1.5 mile tunnel which ended 237 feet above the quay at Morwellham. From here an inclined plane was constructed to bring the iron barges down to the quay, powered by a water wheel. The heyday for Morwellham Quay came when the largest and richest copper deposits ever were discovered at the Great Consols just 4 miles to the north in 1844.(Copper Mine) 1 shares were soon worth 800 as the rush to extract the ore started. This gave rise to Morwellhams fame as the richest Copper port in Victorias Empire, and the queen herself visited in 1856. Another inclined plane was built to transport the ore down the hill and a new quay was added to handle the 30,000 tons of ore that were exported each year. Arsenic was also extracted and it became the worlds largest supplier of the mineral in the latter part of the century. However by 1903 the Consols wealth was exhausted and the mines closed.By this stage, the railways had taken over and Morwellhams usefulness was also ended. The canal tunnel was used as a water supply for a hydroelectric plant and the inclined planes were abandoned.In 2009 County Council withdrew funding for the mining museum, which as a direct result was placed into administration.(http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/england/devon/8279630.stm) In April 2010 the site was purchased by the owners of Park, and it reopened to the public later in the year.(http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/england/devon/8622449.stm)Industrial HeritageThe site has been imaginatively preserved to give an impression of Victorian industrial and rural life.  The assayers offices have been carefully preserved and Victorian cottages, farm and schoolrooms presented. The ore crushing plants driven by a 32 foot overhead waterwheel can be seen. A battery electric powered tramway, constructed as part of the tourist attraction in the 1970s, takes visitors for tours on a single level of the copper mine. There is also an extensive ecological programme of visits to explore the valley by water and land. Old kilns can also be seen. Edwardian Farm The BBC television series Farm was filmed at Morwellham Quay during 2009/2010. See also *Quay (Devon)  A similar port slightly downstream, now abandoned.ReferencesFurther reading*Booker, Frank (1967) The Industrial Archaeology of the Tamar Valley. Newton Abbot: David & Charles; Revised impression 1971External links*Morwellham Quay Official website*BBC Devon website*Cornish Mining websiteQuayQuay
8887422
Serge_Karlow
Serge Peter Karlow was born circa 1921 in  York, NY and died November 3, 2005 in NJHe was a CIA Technical Officer from 1947-1963 who was falsely accused of treason and forced to resign. The allegations against Karlow were made by KGB defector Golitsyn who described a CIA Officer of Slavic background who had bugged a building in Europe. Golitsyn said that he thought that the Moles name began with a K. In 1988, of Central Intelligence William Webster determined that the charges against Karlow had no merit. He was given an apology, medal and compensation.Karlow served with distinction as a U.S. Navy Intelligence officer in War II where he lost a leg in a mining explosion.Karlow authored, Targeted by the C.I.A.: An Intelligence Professional Speaks Out on theScandal that Turned the C.I.A. Upside down.External links* Amazon.com* Pipermail
8894529
Arvid_Pardo
Arvid Pardo (February 12, 1914  June 19, 1999) was a Maltese diplomat, scholar, and university professor. He is known as the Father of the Law of the Sea Conference.Pardo was born in Rome. His Maltese father died of typhus while on a relief mission in the Union in 1922. His Swedish mother died a year later during an appendectomy and his brother was killed in an automobile accident.  He became the ward of his uncle, Italian diplomat Attolico, who served as Ambassador to Brazil, the Soviet Union, Germany and the Vatican. Attolico sent him to school at Collegio Mondragone, Frascati, and the young Pardo spent his vacations with Attolico at the latters various diplomatic posts.Pardo spoke Italian, English, French, Swedish and Spanish fluently, and knew German fairly well. As a student in pre-war Rome, he met Margit Claeson, a Swedish textile designer.  In 1947, once his finances were secure, he went to Sweden to find her (they had lost touch during the war) and married her. They had three children: Christina (1949, m. Menez), Lars (1950) and David (1951), all educated in England. His wife and children all outlived him.Pardo received a degree in diplomatic history from the University of Tours, France in 1938 and a doctorate in international law from the University of Rome in 1939. When War II began, he commenced underground activities as an anti-Fascist organizer but was arrested by the Italian authorities in 1940. After the fall of Mussolinis government, he was freed in September 1943, but was re-arrested at once by the Gestapo and kept in Alexanderplatz Prison, Berlin under a sentence of death. In 1945, as the Army approached Berlin, the Swiss officials and the Committee of the Red Cross arranged his release. After the Soviets entered Berlin, Pardo was arrested again and interrogated. Once released, he crossed the Elbe, walking to the Allied lines, and made contact with British and American forces. He was sent to London, where he arrived penniless.(Both New York Times articles)At first Pardo worked as a dishwasher and waiter in a London restaurant chain until he sought out a friend of his fathers, David Owen, who was then helping to set up the Nations in London. Owen hired him as an assistant in the documentary section, and despite holding a doctorate, he worked as a junior clerk in charge of archives in 19456. He then served in the Department of Trusteeship and Non-Self-Governing Territories until 1960. He then joined the Secretariat of the Technical Assistance Board (forerunner of the UNDP) and served as deputy representative in Nigeria and Ecuador, where he was stationed before being selected in 1964 as the first Permanent Representative of Malta to the United Nations by the newly-independent country that he had visited only briefly during his life.During his time as UN delegate, which ended in 1971 after Mintoffs return to office, Pardos lasting achievement was his work to reform the law of the sea. On 1 November 1967, he made an electrifying speech before the General Assembly calling for international regulations to ensure peace at sea, to prevent further pollution and to protect ocean resources. He proposed that the seabed constitutes part of the heritage of mankind, a phrase that appears in Article 136 of the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea,(Arvid Pardo Commemorative Evening) and asked that some of the seas wealth be used to bankroll a fund that would help close the gap between rich and poor nations.(USC death notice.) It was Pardo who initiated the fifteen-year process that would culminate in 1982, when the Convention was opened for signatures, and in the early years, he continued a dedicated effort to promote the issue, for instance helping achieve near-unanimous passage of GA Resolution 2749 on December 17, 1970. This resolution embodied principles regarding the seabed and its resources that would later be incorporated into the Convention.(Deep Sea-Bed Mining Under Customary International Law.) Pardo was unhappy with the final instruments provision for an Economic Zone, lamenting that the common heritage of mankind had been whittled down to a few fish and a little seaweed.(Center for War/Peace Studies Global Report.)From 1967 to 1971, Pardo was also Maltas Ambassador to the United States. During the same period served as Ambassador to the USSR and was High Commissioner to Canada from 1969 to 1971. He was Maltas representative at the Preparatory Commission of the Law of the Sea conference in 1972 and led the Maltese delegation to the UN Seabed Committee from 1971 to 1973.From 1972 to 1975 Pardo was coordinator of the ocean studies program at the Wilson International Center for Scholars in D.C. From 1975 to 1990 he was on the USC faculty, teaching political science (197581) and international relations (198190). For those fifteen years, he was a senior fellow at the Institute of Marine and Coastal Studies.Pardo was made a Knight of Malta in 1992. He was resident in Seattle when he died there in 1999(In Memoriam.) (some sources claim he was living in Houston and died there(Death notice.)(International Seabed Authority Press Release.)(Foreign Affairs Diary.)).NotesReferences* Maltese at U.N. a Rare Diplomat, New York Times, January 24, 1965, p. 21.* Maltas Imaginative and Erudite U.N. Delegate, The New York Times, December 10, 1969, p. 5.* In Memoriam, by Carl Q. Christol, Political Science and Politics, 1999, pp. 7778.Pardo
8918423
Harriet_Doerr
Harriet Huntington Doerr (April 8, 1910 &ndash; November 24, 2002) was an American author who published her first novel at the age of 74.Early life A granddaughter of California railroad magnate and noted collector of art and rare books, Edwards Huntington, Harriet Green Huntington grew up in a California, family that encouraged intellectual endeavors. She attended high school at Westridge School, in Pasadena. She then enrolled in College in 1927, but transferred to University the following year. In 1930, after her junior year, she left school and married Albert Doerr, Jr., a Stanford 30 graduate whom she had known in Pasadena.() The Doerrs spent the next 25 years in Pasadena, where they raised a son, Michael (d. 1995), and a daughter, Martha.MexicoAlbert Doerrs family owned a copper mine in the Mexican state of Aguascalientes, and in the late 1950s, the Doerrs moved to Mexico where Albert was engaged in restoring the mine. Harriet had accompanied Albert to Mexico when he had business there many times, beginning in 1935, but this time, they remained until 1972, when Albert died ten years after being diagnosed with leukemia. The time she spent in this small Mexican mining town would later provide Harriet Doerr with the both subject matter and the settings for much of her writing. ()Literary careerFollowing her husbands death, Harriet Doerr returned to California. At the suggestion of her son Michael, a 1953 Stanford graduate, she decided to finish the education which had been interrupted so long before by her marriage. She enrolled once again at Stanford, and in 1977, took her BA degree in European history. While at Stanford, she began writing, with sufficient success to earn a Fellowship in 1979, and she soon began publishing short stories. Her first novel for Ibarra, was published in 1984 and won that years Book Award for first work of fiction.(Stanford Special Collections)  Her second novel, Consider this, Senora, was published in 1993, and a collection of short stories and essays, Tiger in the Grass: Stories and other Inventions followed in 1995. A television adaptation of Stones for Ibarra was presented by Hall of Fame in 1988.Doerr died in Pasadena in 2002.(ReferencesExternal links* 1997 interview with Harriet Doerr in Stanford Magazine* Harriet Doerr Papers, 1976-2003 (33 linear ft.) are housed in the Department of Special Collections and University Archives at Stanford University Libraries
8926701
Thomas_Kierans
Thomas William Kierans, FCSCE, P. Eng. is an engineer and innovator. He is the originator and principal proponent of the Recycling and Northern Development Canal or GRAND Canal.Kierans is a Montreal native and 1939 University Mining Engineering graduate. As a student he prospected by canoe and bush aircraft across Canadas northlands. From graduation to 1967 he lived in Sudbury, Ontario working for eighteen years at Inco mines, smelters, and refineries and specializing in industrial safety and rock mechanics. From 1957 to 1967 he was mining and water resources consulting engineer and visited most mines in Canada twice each year. That experience led him to decide that his eventual home would be in Johns, Newfoundland.Kierans recognized the increasing greenhouse effects since the 1930s dust bowl were a clear indication that fast-growing Canadian and United States populations would require a new, large, controllable, environment-friendly source of fresh water to stabilize shared Lakes and Lawrence River water levels and flows and end widespread and worsening water deficits and flooding in both nations. To meet this need, Kierans used proven Netherlands and California experience to design his Recycling and Northern Development Canal concept in the 1950s. This would recycle (not divert) some of the now huge and harmful run-off to Canadas Bay to the Great Lakes from a new sea-level freshwater dike-enclosure in James Bay. This should substantially increase Canadas freshwater supply and improve Hudson Bay and east coast environments, fisheries and shipping. However, despite Quebecs past Bourassas and prominent engineering groups endorsement of detailed study of his concept, as well as an invitation to outline it to the American Society of Civil Engineers in 2001, some Canadian authorities unfortunately fail to understand basic differences between run-off recycling as opposed to potentially harmful headwater diversions or simply fear any joint water management with the U.S.  In 1967, he was invited by project owner CFLCo to be Mining Engineer responsible for underground design at the 5500MW Churchill Falls Hydropower Project in Labrador. His duties were expanded to include project safety and environment protection. He organized detailed studies on the environmental impacts of diverting some of the Naskaupi River headwaters to the projects Smallwood Reservoir.In 1973, he was appointed Professor of Engineering at University of Newfoundland. While at MUN he worked with and Labrador Hydro on the 1975 attempt at a hydropower only crossing of the of Belle Isle, chaired the Environmental Committee on Brincos Kitts-Michelin uranium project, and was on the Editorial Board of the American Society Of Civil Engineers Manual on Nuclear Structures And Materials.  In 1978 he proposed comprehensive underground and surface development of St. Johns Southside Hills and founded Friends Of St. Johns Harbour, the first public group to promote much-needed clean-up of that historic Canadian seaport.  He was the founding Chairman of the Newfoundland and Labrador Peat Association and worked with MUN and several industry representatives to initiate the Universitys Seabright Corporation cooperation with industry. In 1978, he retired from MUN to be the Director of the Alexander Graham Bell Institute at the College of Cape Breton. In 1983 he founded Deltaport Limited to create a very large, mid-ocean, floating, sea and air base using tetrahedral space frames. A floating dock built for such research on the MUN side of St. Johns Long Pond is still in use for recreational purposes. From 1989 to 91 he was technical advisor to Canadas Environment Department for the Fixed Link to Edward Island. He is a life member of the Professional Engineers and Geoscientists of Newfoundland and Labrador (PEG-NL), Canadian Society Of Civil Engineers (CSCE), the Canadian Institute of Mining and Metallurgy, and other professional groups. He was awarded PEG-NLs Order Of Merit for 2000 and in 2001 received a CSCE fellowship.  He currently authors three websites that reflect his interest in large-scale joint North American water management, floating mid-ocean sea-air bases, and the proposed Newfoundland-Labrador fixed link. PersonalHe is the father of nine children and a citizen of both Canada and Ireland.References*Wordpress- Grand Canal Project*ZoomInfo Bio*Canspiracy
8943134
Talkeetna_Mountains
Image:Talkeetna Mountains 3.jpg| thumb | right | 300px | Talkeetna Mountains, from the Highway The Talkeetna Mountains (Dghelaay tahwtaene in Ahtna) () are a mountain range in Alaska. The Matanuska and Susitna River valleys, with towns such as Creek, Talkeetna, Wasilla, Palmer, Sutton, and Chickaloon, roughly bound the Talkeetnas in the westerly parts of the range. Sovereign Mountain rises to 8849 feet in the remote and heavily glaciated central part of the range. The east side of the range fronts a broad, about 100-miles wide, lake-studded lowland of forests and swamps, across which rises the gigantic Wrangell (13,804 ft) volcanic edifice. Alaska Highway 4 runs northward through this lowland. Hundreds of miles to the west Highway 3 runs along the western side of the Talkeetna range, with the Alaska Range directly west. Alaska Highway 1, running along the southern front of the Talkeetna Mountains, lies mainly in a valley marking a tectonic divide between the Jurassic and Cretaceous rocks of the wedge, island-arc, and basement rocks in the terrane (and other terranes forming the Talkeetna Mountains), and the Mountains in the terrane to the south.  The range stretches as much as a hundred miles north to south.(Talkeenta Mountains. Peakbagger.com. Retrieved 26 December 2009.) Highway 8, seasonal and unpaved, passes over highlands rising to above 4000 feet, north of the Talkeetnas.Pass, a seasonal highway pass across the southwestern corner of the range, provides views into the glaciated interior of the range, and is the location of Mine State Historical Park.The majority of the land is state-owned, and it is home to many large mammal including grizzly/brown bear, black bear, moose, caribou, wolves, wolverine, and Dall sheep.(Talkeetna Mountains Subregion. Alaska Department of Natural Resources Division of Mining, Land and Water. Retrieved 26 December 2009.)See also* FormationReferencesMountainsmrj:
8955206
1918_in_Wales
This article is about the particular significance of the year 1918 to Wales and its people.Incumbents*of Wales - Edward, Prince of Wales, son of King V of the United Kingdom *of Wales - vacant*Archdruid of the Eisteddfod of Wales - DyfedEvents*The beginning of an influenza epidemic which lasts into the following year and kills about 10,000 people in Wales.*January - An Irish steamship, the Cork, is torpedoed by a U-boat off Point Lynas in Anglesey.  Twelve crew are killed.*January - The steamship Ethelinda is torpedoed by a U-boat off Skerries.  Twenty-six crew are killed.*February - The steamship Treveal is torpedoed by a U-boat off Skerries.  Thirty-three people are killed.*February - The steamship Mexico City is torpedoed by a U-boat off Stack, Holyhead.  Twenty-nine crew are killed.*March - The steamship Kenmare is torpedoed by a U-boat off Skerries.  Twenty-six crew are killed.*April - The steamship Boscastle is torpedoed by a U-boat off Head.  Eighteen crew are killed.*April - The steamship Landonia is torpedoed by a U-boat off Strumble Head.  Twenty-one crew are killed.*May - The steamships Baron Ailsa and Wileysike are torpedoed by a U-boat off Pembrokeshire.  Fourteen crew are killed.*May - The German U-boat U-B 119 is sunk off Island.*June - The steamship Strathnairn is torpedoed by a U-boat off and Clerks, Pembrokeshire.  Twenty-one crew are killed.*August - August is fixed as the annual month of the Eisteddfod of Wales.*August - The steamship Palmelia is torpedoed by a U-boat off Stack, Holyhead.  Twenty-eight people are killed.*September - The steamship Serula is torpedoed by a U-boat off Strumble Head.  Seventeen crew are killed.*September - The (Welsh) Division is involved in the of Ephy.*October - Three seamen are killed while returning to their ship by boat at Haven.*October - The steamship Dundalk is torpedoed by a U-boat off Skerries.  Twenty-one crew are killed.*November - Armistice Day. Able Seaman Richard Morgan, serving aboard Garland, is the last Welshman &ndash; and the last Briton &ndash; to be killed in action in the World War, in the course of which over 40,000 Welsh people have lost their lives.*December - United Kingdom general election:**For the first time, a woman stands as a  parliamentary candidate stands in Wales: Mackenzie stands unsuccessfully for the of Wales, itself a new parliamentary seat.**Home Rule for Wales is included as a policy in the manifesto of the Labour Party.**Brace becomes Labour MP for Abertillery.**Onions becomes Labour MP for Caerphilly.**Hugh Edwards becomes Liberal MP for Neath, his previous constituency of Mid Glamorgan having been abolished.**Robert Thomas, 1st Baronet, becomes Liberal MP for Wrexham.*T. John (Liberal MP for East Denbighshire) defects to the Labour Party.*Alfred Thomas is created Rhondda.Arts and literature*Morris-Jones is knighted for his services to literature.Awards*Eisteddfod of Wales (held in Neath) *National Eisteddfod of Wales: Chair - Thomas Job*National Eisteddfod of Wales: Crown - Emrys LewisNew books*Delta Evans - The Rosicrucian*Moelona - Rhamant y RhosMusic*Davies is appointed director of music to the Air Force.Film*The Life Story of Lloyd George (drama, not shown publicly until 1996)Sport*Baseball - First records of the Grange Gasworks Ladies team playing in Cardiff.Births*January - Lucas, international footballer (d.1998)*May - Robert Davies, politician (died 1967)*May - Sir Williams, artist (died 2006)*May - David Ormsby-Gore, 5th Baron Harlech (died 1985)*June - Williams-Ellis, founder of Pottery*September - Mortimer, writer (died 1999)*November - Glyn Williams, international footballer*date unknown - Elwyn Edwards, composerDeaths*February - William Evans, judge*April**Tannatt Pryce, VC recipient, 32 (killed in action)**Ffrangcon Davies, baritone, 62*July - Alfred Thomas, 1st Viscount Rhondda, industrialist and politician, 62*September - Thomas Evans, MP, 59*September - Charlotte Talbot, heiress, 78 *September - Llwyn-Owen, composer, 26 *October - David Phillips, Wales international rugby player, 63*November - Owen, poet from the Welsh borders, 25 (killed in action)*November - William Griffith, mining engineer (with Cecil Rhodes) *December - John Griffiths, artist*December - Perrett, Welsh international rugby union, 27 (died of wounds received in action)
8966592
Cosine_similarity
Cosine similarity is a measure of similarity between two vectors by measuring the cosine of the angle between them. The cosine of 0 is 1, and less than 1 for any other angle.  The cosine of the angle between two vectors thus determines whether two vectors are pointing in roughly the same direction.This is often used to compare documents in mining. In addition, it is used to measure cohesion within clusters in the field of Mining(P.-N. Tan, M. Steinbach & V. Kumar, Introduction to Data Mining, , Addison-Wesley (2005), ISBN 0-321-32136-7, chapter 8; page 500).  Math The cosine of two vectors can be easily derived by using the Euclidean Dot Product formula::\mathbf{a}\cdot\mathbf{b}\left\|\mathbf{a}\right\|\left\|\mathbf{b}\right\|\cos\thetaGiven two vectors of attributes, A and B, the cosine similarity, , is represented using a product and magnitude as: \text{similarity}  \cos(\theta)  {A \cdot B \over \|A\| \|B\|}  \frac{ \sum_{i1}^{n}{A_i \times B_i} }{ \sqrt{\sum_{i1}^{n}{(A_i)^2}} \times \sqrt{\sum_{i1}^{n}{(B_i)^2}} }The resulting similarity ranges from &minus;1 meaning exactly opposite, to 1 meaning exactly the same, with 0 usually indicating independence, and in-between values indicating intermediate similarity or dissimilarity.For text matching, the attribute vectors A and B are usually the term frequency vectors of the documents.  The cosine similarity can be seen as a method of normalizing document length during comparison.In the case of retrieval, the cosine similarity of two documents will range from 0 to 1, since the term frequencies (tf-idf weights) cannot be negative. The angle between two term frequency vectors cannot be greater than 90.This cosine similarity metric may be extended such that it yields the coefficient in the case of binary attributes.  This is the Tanimoto coefficient, T(A, B), represented as: T(A,B)  {A \cdot B \over \|A\|^2 +\|B\|^2 - A \cdot B} See also * Srensens quotient of similarity* distance* Correlation* coefficient* index* SimRank* retrieval External links * Weighted cosine measure* http://www.miislita.com/information-retrieval-tutorial/cosine-similarity-tutorial.html#CosimReferencescosinusdi similitudine
8976534
Revenue_management
Revenue Management is the application of disciplined analytics that predict behavior at the micro-market level and optimize product availability  and price to maximize revenue growth. The primary aim of Revenue Management is selling the right product to the right customer at the right time for the right price. The essence of this discipline is in understanding customers perception of product value and accurately aligning product prices, placement and availability with each customer segment.(Cross, R. (1997) Revenue Management: Hard-Core Tactics for Market Domination. New York, NY: Broadway Books.)OverviewBusinesses face important decisions regarding what to sell, when to sell, to whom to sell, and for how much.  Revenue Management uses data-driven tactics and strategy to answer these questions in order to increase revenue.(Talluri, K., and van Ryzin, G. (1999) Revenue Management: Research Overview and Prospects. Transportation Science 33:233-256.) The discipline of revenue management combines data mining and operations research with strategy, understanding of customer behavior, and partnering with the sales force. Today, the revenue management practitioner must be analytical and detail oriented, yet capable of thinking strategically and managing the relationship with sales.(Chase, Nicole. 2007. Revenue management redefined. Hotels, February 1, 2007.)HistoryBefore the emergence of Revenue Management, BOAC (now Airways) experimented with differentiated fare products by offering capacity controlled Earlybird discounts to stimulate demand for seats that would otherwise fly empty.(McGill, J. and van Ryzin, G. (1999) Revenue management: research overview and prospects. Transportation Science 33: 233256.) Taking it a step further, Crandall, former Chairman and CEO ofAirlines, pioneered a practice he called Management, which focused primarily maximizing revenue through analytics-based control. Under Crandalls leadership, American continued to invest in Yield Managements forecasting, inventory control and overbooking capabilities. By the early 1980s, the combination of a mild recession and new competition spawned by deregulation posed an additional threat. Low-cost, low-fare airlines like PeoplExpress were growing rapidly because of their ability to charge even less than Americans Super Saver fares.  After investing millions in the next generation capability which they would call DINAMO (Dynamic Inventory Optimization and Maintenance Optimizer), American announced Ultimate Super Saver Fares in 1985 that were priced lower than the PeoplExpress. These fares were non-refundable in addition to being advance-purchase restricted and capacity controlled. This Yield Management system targeted those discounts to only those situations where they had a surplus of empty seats. The system and analysts engaged in continual re-evaluation of the placement of the discounts to maximize their use. Over the next year, Americans revenue increased 14.5% and its profits were up 47.8%.(Other industries took note of Americans success and implemented similar systems.  Robert Crandall discussed his success with Yield Management with Marriott, CEO of International. Marriott International had many of the same issues that airlines did: perishable inventory, customers booking in advance, lower cost competition and wide swings with regard to balancing supply and demand. Since yield was an airline term and did not necessarily pertain to hotels, Marriott International and others began calling the practice Revenue Management.( The company created a Revenue Management organization and invested in automated Revenue Management systems that would provide daily forecasts of demand and make inventory recommendations for each of its 160,000 rooms at its Marriott, Marriott and Inn brands.(Marriott, Jr., J. and Cross, R. (2000) Room at the revenue inn. In Book of Management Wisdom: Classic Writings by Legendary Managers, ed., Peter Krass, 199-208, New York, NY: Wiley.) They also created fenced rate logic similar to airlines, which would allow them to offer targeted discounts to price sensitive market segments based on demand.(Hanks, R., Cross, R. and Noland, R. (1992) Discounting in the hotel industry: a new approach. Cornell Hotel and Restaurant Administration Quarterly 33(1): 1523.)  To address the additional complexity created by variable lengths-of-stay, Marriotts Demand Forecast System (DFS) was built to forecast guest booking patterns and optimize room availability by price and length of stay. By the mid-1990s, Marriotts successful execution of Revenue Management was adding between $150 million and $200 million in annual revenue.(A natural extension of hotel Revenue Management was to rental car firms, which experienced similar issues of discount availability and duration control. In 1994, Revenue Management saved Car Rental from bankruptcy. Their revival from near collapse to making profits served as an indicator of Revenue Managements potential.(Geraghty, M. and Johnson, E. (1997) Revenue management saves national car rental. Interfaces 27(1): 107127.)Up to this point, Revenue Management had focused on driving revenue from Business to Consumer (B2C) relationships. In the early 1990s UPS developed Revenue Management further by revitalizing their Business to Business (B2B) pricing strategy.(Cross, R., Higbie, J. and Cross, Z. (2010) Milestones in the Application of Analytical Pricing and Revenue Management. Journal of Revenue and Pricing Management) Faced with the need for volume growth in a competitive market, UPS began building a pricing organization that focused on discounting. Prices began to erode rapidly, however, as they began offering greater discounts to win business. The executive team at UPS prioritized specific targeting of their discounts but could not strictly follow the example set by airlines and hotels. Rather than optimizing the revenue for a discrete event such as the purchase of an airline seat or a hotel room, UPS was negotiating annual rates for large-volume customers using a multitude of services over the course of a year.  To alleviate the discounting issue, they formulated the problem as a customized bid-response model, which used historical data to predict the probability of winning at different price points. They called the system Target Pricing. With this system, they were able to forecast the outcomes of any contractual bid at various net prices and identify where they could command a price premium over competitors and where deeper discounts were required to land deals. In the first year of thes Revenue Management system, UPS reported increased profits of over $100 million.(Agrawal, V. and Ferguson, M. (2007) Optimal customized pricing in competitive settings. Journal of Revenue and Pricing Management 6: 212-228.) The concept of maximizing revenue on negotiated deals found its way back to the hospitality industry.  Marriotts original application of Revenue Management was limited to individual bookings, not groups or other negotiated deals. In 2007, Marriott introduced a Group Price Optimizer that used a competitive bid-response model to predict the probability of winning at any price point, thus providing accurate price guidance to the sales force. The initial system generated an incremental $46 million in profit. This led to an Honorable Mention for the Edelman Award for Achievement in Operations Research and the Management Sciences in 2009.(Hormby, S., Morrison, J., Prashant, D, Meyers, M. and Tensa, T. (2010) Marriott International increases revenue by implementing a group pricing optimizer. Interfaces 40(1): 47-57.) By the early 1990s Revenue Management also began to influence television ad sales. Companies like Broadcast Corporation, ABC,(Mandese, J. (1998).  Taking hint from travel world, ABC goes up against ritual: Aeronomics system expected to help troubled net set prices to fill seats.  Advertising Age, 11 May.) and NBC(Bollapragada, S., Cheng, H., Phillips, M. and Garbiras. M. (2002) NBCs optimization systems increase revenues and productivity. Interfaces 32(1): 47-60.) developed systems that automated the placement of ads in proposals based on total forecasted demand and forecasted ratings by program.  Today, many television networks around the globe have Revenue Management Systems.(Bell, P. (2005) Revenue Management.  Plenary presentation at Vision 2020, Ahmedabad, India. 8 January.  Retrieved September 21, 2010.)Revenue Management to this point had been utilized in the pricing of perishable products. In the 1990s, however, the Motor Company began adopting Revenue Management to maximize profitability of its vehicles by segmenting customers into micro-markets and creating a differentiated and targeted price structure.(Hansen, L. (2005) Follow the money: high margin growth focused on the customer.  Presentation to Revenue Management & Price Optimization Conference; 21 April, Atlanta, GA.) Pricing for vehicles and options packages had been set based upon annual volume estimates and profitability projections. The company found that certain products were overpriced and some were underpriced.(Coy, P. (2000) The power of smart pricing, BusinessWeek, 10 April pp.160-163.)  Understanding the range of customer preferences across a product line and geographical market, Ford leadership created a Revenue Management organization to measure the price-responsiveness of different customer segments for each incentive type and to develop an approach that would target the optimal incentive by product and region.  By the end of the decade, Ford estimated that roughly $3 billion in additional profits came from Revenue Management initiatives.(Leibs, S. (2000) Ford heeds the profits. CFO Magazine, August.)The public success of Pricing and Revenue Management at Ford solidified the ability of the discipline to address the revenue generation issues of virtually any company. Many auto manufacturers have adopted the practice for both vehicle sales and the sale of parts. Retailers have leveraged the concepts pioneered at Ford to create more dynamic, targeted pricing in the form of discounts and promotions to more accurately match supply with demand. Promotions planning and optimization assisted retailers with the timing and prediction of the incremental lift of a promotion for targeted products and customer sets. Companies have rapidly adopted markdown optimization to maximize revenue from end-of-season or end-of-life items. Furthermore, strategies driving promotion roll-offs and discount expirations have allowed companies to increase revenue from newly acquired customers.(Phillips, R. (2005) Pricing and Revenue Optimization, Stanford, CA: Stanford Business Books.)  By 2000, virtually all major airlines, hotel firms, cruise lines and rental car firms had implemented Revenue Management Systems to predict customer demand and optimize available price. These Revenue Management Systems had limited optimize to imply managing the availability of pre-defined prices in pre-established price categories. The objective function was to select the best blends of predicted demand given existing prices. The sophisticated technology and optimization algorithms had been focused on selling the right amount of inventory at a given price, not on the price itself. Realizing that controlling inventory was no longer sufficient, Hotels Group (IHG) launched an initiative to better understand the sensitivity of customer demand.  IHG determined that calculating elasticity at very granular levels to a high degree of accuracy still was not enough. Rate transparency had elevated the importance of incorporating market positioning against substitutable alternatives. IHG recognized that when a competitor changes its rate, the consumers perception of IHGs rate also changes.(Cross, R., Higbie, J. and Cross, D. (2009) Revenue managements renaissance: a rebirth of the art and science of profitable revenue generation. Cornell Hospitality Quarterly 50: 56-81.)  Working with third party competitive data, the IHG team was able to analyze historical price, volume and share data to accurately measure price elasticity in every local market for multiple lengths of stay. These elements were incorporated into a system that also measured differences in customer elasticity based upon how far in advance the booking is being made relative to the arrival date. The incremental revenue from the system was significant as this new Price Optimization capability increased Revenue per Available Room (RevPAR) by 2.7%.(InterContinental Hotels Group (2009) Annual Review and Summary Financial Statement, accessed 22 September 2010.)The Revenue Management LeversWhereas yield management involves specific actions to generate yield through perishable inventory management, Revenue Management encompasses a wide range of opportunities to increase revenue.  A company can utilize these different categories like a series of levers in the sense that all are usually available, but only one or two may drive revenue in a given situation.  The primary levers are:PricingThis category of Revenue Management involves redefining pricing strategy and developing disciplined pricing tactics. The key objective of a pricing strategy is anticipating the value created for customers and then setting specific prices to capture that value. A company may decide to price against their competitors or even their own products, but the most value comes from pricing strategies that closely follow market conditions and demand, especially at a segment level.  Once a pricing strategy dictates what a company wants to do, pricing tactics determine how a company actually captures the value.  Tactics involve creating pricing tools that change dynamically, in order to react to changes and continually capture value and gain revenue.  Price Optimization, for example, involves constantly optimizing multiple variables such as price sensitivity, price ratios, and inventory to maximize revenues.  A successful pricing strategy, supported by analytically-based pricing tactics, can drastically improve a firms profitability.(Hogan, J. and Nagel, T. The Strategy and Tactics of Pricing: A Guide to Growing More Profitably.)InventoryWhen focused on controlling inventory, Revenue Management is mainly concerned with how best to price or allocate capacity. First, a company can discount products in order to increase volume.  By lowering prices on products, a company can overcome weak demand and gain market share, which ultimately increases revenue so long as each product sells for more than its cost. On the other hand, in situations where demand is strong for a product but the threat of cancellations looms (e.g. hotel rooms or airline seats), firms often overbook in order to maximize revenue from full capacity.  Overbookings focus is increasing the total volume of sales in the presence of cancellations rather than optimizing customer mix.(MarketingPrice promotion allow companies to sell higher volumes by temporarily decreasing the price of their products.  Revenue Management techniques measure customer responsiveness to promotions in order to strike a balance between volume growth and profitability.  An effective promotion helps maximize revenue when there is uncertainty about the distribution of customer willingness to pay. When a companys products are sold in the form of long-term commitments, such as internet or service, promotions help attract customers who will then commit to contracts and produce revenue over a long time horizon.  When this occurs, companies must also strategize their promotion roll-off policies; they must decide when to begin increasing the contract fees and by what magnitude to raise the fees in order to avoid losing customers.  Revenue Management optimization proves useful in balancing promotion roll-off variables in order to maximize revenue while minimizing churn.(ChannelsRevenue Management through channels involves strategically driving revenue through different channels. Different channels may represent customers with different price sensitivities.  For example, customers who shop online are usually more price sensitive than customers who shop in a physical store.  Different channels often have different costs and margins associated with those channels. When faced with multiple channels to retailers and distributors, Revenue Management techniques can calculate appropriate levels of discounts for companies to offer distributors through opaque channels to push more products without losing integrity with respect to public perception of quality.(The Revenue Management ProcessData CollectionThe Revenue Management process begins with collection.  Relevant data are paramount to a Revenue Management Systems capability to provide accurate, actionable information. A system must collect and store historical data for inventory, prices, demand, and other causal factors. Any data that reflects the details of products offered, their prices, competition, and customer behavior must be collected, stored, and analyzed. Information about customer behavior is a valuable asset that can reveal consumer behavioral patterns, the impact of competitors actions, and other important market information. This information is crucial to starting the Revenue Management process.(SegmentationAfter collecting the relevant data, segmentation is the key to market-based pricing and revenue maximization. Success hinges on the ability to segment customers into similar groups based on a calculation of price responsiveness of customers to certain products based upon the circumstances of time and place. Revenue Management strives to determine the value of a product to a very narrow micro-market at a specific moment in time and then chart customer behavior at the margin to determine the maximum obtainable revenue from those micro-markets.( Useful tools such as Analysis allow Revenue Managers to create a set of data-driven partitioning techniques gather interpretable groups of objects together for consideration.  Market segmentation based upon customer behavior is essential to the next step, which is forecasting demand associated with the clustered segments.ForecastingRevenue Management requires forecasting various elements such as demand, inventory availability, share, and total market. Its performance depends critically on the quality of these forecasts.  Forecasting is a critical task of Revenue Management and takes much time to develop, maintain, and implement. Quantity-based forecasts, which use time-series models, booking curves, cancellation curves, etc., project future quantities of demand, such as reservations or products bought. Price-based forecasts seek to forecast demand as a function of marketing variables, such as price or promotion. These involve building specialized forecasts such as market response models or cross-price elasticity estimates to predict customer behavior at certain price points.(  By combining these forecasts with calculated price sensitivities and price ratios, a Revenue Management System can then quantify these benefits and develop price optimization strategies to maximize revenue.OptimizationWhile forecasting suggests what customers are likely to do, optimization suggests how a firm should respond.  Often considered the pinnacle of the Revenue Management process, optimization is about evaluating multiple options on how to sell your product and to whom to sell your product.( Optimization involves solving two important problems in order to achieve the highest possible revenue. The first is determining which objective function to optimize.  A business must decide between optimizing prices, total sales, margins, or even lifetime values.  Secondly, the business must decide which optimization technique to utilize. For example, many firms utilize programming, a complex technique for determining the best outcome from a set of linear relationships, to set prices in order to maximize revenue.  analysis, another statistical tool, involves finding the ideal relationship between several variables through complex models and analysis. Discrete choice models can serve to predict customer behavior in order to target them with the right products for the right price.(  Tools such as these allow a firm to optimize its product offerings, inventory levels, and pricing points in order to achieve the highest revenue possible.Dynamic Re-evaluationRevenue Management requires that a firm must continually re-evaluate their prices, products, and processes in order to maximize revenue. In a dynamic market, an effective Revenue Management System constantly re-evaluates the variables involved in order to move dynamically with the market. As micro-markets evolve, so must the strategy and tactics of Revenue Management adjust.(Revenue Management in an OrganizationRevenue Managements fit within the organizational structure depends on the type of industry and the company itself. Some companies place Revenue Management teams within Marketing because marketing initiatives typically focus on attracting and selling to customers.  Other firms dedicate a section of Finance to handle Revenue Management responsibilities because of the tremendous bottom line implications.  Some companies have elevated the position of Chief Revenue Officer, or CRO, to the senior management level.  This position typically oversees functions like sales, pricing, new product development, and advertising and promotions. A CRO in this sense would be responsible for all activities that generate revenue and directing the company to become more revenue-focused.(Chain Management and Revenue Management have many natural synergies.  Supply chain management (SCM) is a vital process in many companies today and several are integrating this process with a Revenue Management System. On one hand, supply chain management often focuses on filling current and anticipated orders at the lowest cost, while assuming that demand is primarily exogenous.  Conversely, Revenue Management generally assumes costs and sometimes capacity are fixed and instead looks to set prices and customer allocations that maximize revenue given these constraints.  A company that has achieved excellence in Supply Chain Management and Revenue Management individually may have many opportunities to increase profitability by linking their respective operational focus and customer-facing focus together.(Intelligence platforms have also become increasingly integrated with the Revenue Management process. These platforms, driven by mining processes, offer a centralized data and technology environment that delivers business intelligence by combining historical reporting and advanced analytics to explain and evaluate past events, deliver recommended actions and eventually optimize decision-making. Not synonymous with Relationship Management (CRM), Business intelligence generates proactive forecasts, whereas CRM strategies track and document a companys current and past interactions with customers. Data mining this CRM information, however, can help drive a business intelligence platform and provide actionable information to aid decision-making.Developing IndustriesThe ability for Revenue Management to optimize price based on forecasted demand, price elasticity and competitive rates has incredible benefits, and many companies are rushing to develop their own Revenue Management capabilities.(Peyton, J. (2009) Mobilizing global resources to transform the revenue management discipline. Presentation to 5th Annual Revenue Management & Price Optimization Conference; 6 October, Atlanta, GA.) Many industries are beginning to embrace Revenue Management and apply its principles to their business processes:* Services  offer a wide range of products to a wide range of customers. Banks have applied segmented pricing tactics to loan holders, often utilizing heavy amounts of data and modeling to project interest rates based on how much a customer is willing to pay.(Kadet, A. (2008) Price Profiling. SmartMoney 17(5): 80-85.)* Media/Telecom  a promotion-driven industry often focused on attracting customers with discounted plans and then retaining them at higher price points.  Businesses in this industry often face regulatory constraints, demand volatility, and sales through multiple channels to both business and consumer segments.Revenue Management can help these companies understand micro-markets and forecast demand in order to optimize advertising sales and long-term contracts.(Kimms, A. and Mller-Bungart, M. (2006) Revenue management for broadcasting commercials: the channels problem of selecting and scheduling ads to be aired, Int. J. Revenue Management, Vol. 1.)	* Distributors  face a complex environment that often includes thousands of individual SKUs with several different product lifecycles. Each distributor must account for factors such as channel conflict, cross-product cannibalization, and competitive actions.  Revenue Management has proved useful to distributors in promotion analysis and negotiated contracts.(Bippert, D. (2009) Simultaneously maximizing consumer value and company profit from beginning to end. Presentation to 5th Annual Revenue Management & Price Optimization Conference; 6 October, Atlanta, GA.)* Medical Products and Services  deal with large fluctuations in demand depending on time of day and day of week. Hospital surgeries are often overflowing on weekday mornings but sit empty and underutilized on the weekend. Hospitals may experiment with optimizing their inventory of services and products based on different demand points. Additionally, Revenue Management techniques allow hospitals to mitigate claim underpayments and denials, thus preventing significant revenue leakage.(Lieberman, W.H. (2004b) Revenue management in the health care industry, In I. Yeoman and U. Mcmahon-Beattie (Eds), Revenue Management and Pricing: Case Studies and Applications (pp.137142). London: Thomson.)See also* Forecasting* theory* programming* Research* Optimization* Analysis* ManagementReferencesExternal links*The Basics of Revenue Management
8988888
Association_in_Scotland_to_Research_into_Astronautics
The Association in Scotland to Research into Astronautics (ASTRA), is a spaceflight and astronomical society which adopted its constitution on November 20, 1963, when originally called the Association in Scotland for Technology and Research in Astronautics, and later changed: to Research into Astronautics at the insistence of the House.ASTRA registered as a company limited by guarantee (registration number SC005527()) in 1976 during which process Companies House forced the name-change.ASTRA holds meetings, events, invited guest speaker lectures, and more, in Glasgow, Scotland. Catering for complete beginners, interested amateurs and those with a more academic slant, the membership is wide-ranging across age (from schoolchildren to coffin dodgers!), gender and expertise.ASTRAs aims are, from Article 3 of the of Association, to promote the advancement of knowledge and the spread of education and particularly the dissemination of knowledge on space activities and all branches of science pertaining to such activities, and to stimulate public interest therein.In 2006 the National Lottery gave a grant for an outreach project, free to schools, or any public body, for 3 months on the subject of Astronomy, concentrating on Earth & Space with particular regard to the curriculum in Scotland. This was accessed by a large number of Primary Schools in North Lanarkshire.The National Lottery repeated this grant in 2007.WaveriderThe Waverider reentry vehicle was devised by Professor Nonweiler of Queens College, Belfast, and was intended to be the manned spacecraft in the space programme based on the Streak missile. The programme was cancelled by the Macmillan government, but work on Waverider continued at the Aircraft Establishment, Farnborough - mainly with a view to establishing Waveriders potential as a Mach 6 airliner. During this period (196065) at least one Waverider was tested at the Test Range. There were rumours that free-flight tests were also conducted at this time. The nearest thing to it seems to have been tests of X and Y-winged projectiles - in effect, four or three Waveriders mounted back-to-back - at NASAs Research Center.Professor Nonweiler became a member of the precursor to ASTRA just after he became Professor of Aerodynamics and Fluid Mechanics at Glasgow University, and kept his membership after ASTRAs independence. He moved to New Zealand in July 1975 to become Professor of Applied Mathematics at the of Wellington. At the ASTRA AGM in 1974 Professor Nonweiler was nominated for Honorary Membership by Ian Downie, and he accepted from New Zealand.When Lunan spoke on Man and the Planets at the View from Earth symposium in California in 1984, it attracted the attention of the Propulsion Laboratory, Pasadena, whose Dr. Jim Randolph attended the first ever rocket launch of a Waverider to free flight, at Brisbane Glen outside Largs, in September 1985 shortly after ASTRA member Gordon Ross solved the problem of subsonic flight stability.In May 1988 Professor Nonweiler came back to Glasgow for a two-day conference with Jim Randolph, because by that time Waverider was a serious contender to be the carrier vehicle for the NASA/JPL mission to send an instrumented vehicle to within four solar radii (3 million km) of the surface of the Sun. In theory the mission could be accomplished by Jupiter slingshot, but the radiation hazards and the very long flight time made that unpromising. Aerogravity manoeuvres in the atmospheres of the inner planets could put the probe into a trajectory giving solar encounters every two to three months, but would require a carrier with a very high lift-to-drag ratio at high Mach numbers - for which Waverider seemed the best candidate, as Jim Randolph confirmed on his third visit to Scotland in April 1990.In 1989 Gordon Ross completed a radio-controlled flying model, test-flown (another first for ASTRA) by Richard Newlands until it was crippled in a hard landing. It was rebuilt as an exhibition model, and it and the other surviving models from the 1980s are now in the care of Glasgows Museum of Transport.HistoryASTRA traces its roots back to 1953 when Schwiglhofer, a member of the Interplanetary Society (BIS) (and a former student of Oberth, who was ASTRAs first honorary member), started a Scottish branch, leading to great success. This success was met with resistance from BIS London.In 1963 the society formally became ASTRA as the members had had enough of the BIS in London. Although no such animosity lives today!In the 1970s, ASTRA was holding discussion meetings concerning how best to use the resources within the System, for example by mining the asteroids. Out of these discussions, three books were written by Lunan, part of their sales proceeds going to ASTRA. In order to receive the sales proceeds it was decided to make ASTRA a registered charity, which in those days meant you had also to become a company, which ASTRA still is. Although these books are now out of print, they were translated into numerous languages and sold well in their day.In 1976 ASTRA registered as a charitable company limited by guarantee.In 1977 the Waverider shape was incorporated into a new ASTRA logo.In 1978, ASTRA saved Public Observatory, atop Airdrie Public Library, from being scrapped &ndash; the previous curators had not taken great care of the observatory and it had suffered badly in a storm. ASTRA offered to repair the telescope and drive if the then Monklands District Council would repair the dome. This they duly did() and ASTRA had been running the observatory, on behalf of North Lanarkshire Council, until 2008().In 2003 the 25th anniversary of ASTRA managing Public Observatory was celebrated, and the 50th anniversary of the founding of the Society.In 2008 ASTRA stopped managing Public ObservatoryIn 2008/2009 Airdrie Astronomical Association (A.A.A) was formed after the ASTRA Airdrie branch agreed to dissolve its membership of ASTRA and the new local group began running the Observatory at the invite of North Lanarkshire council in 2009 http://www.airdrieobservatory.comReferences(External links* ASTRA official site* Airdrie Astronomical Association* North Lanarkshire Council * Airdrie Public Library 
9005363
Langmuir_Laboratory_for_Atmospheric_Research
The Langmuir Laboratory for Atmospheric Research is a scientific laboratory studying the cloud processes that produce lightning, hail, and rain, located in the Mountains of central Mexico in the States. The lab is operated by the Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology (NM Tech) with funding from the Science Foundation. The lab was founded in 1963, following pioneering research by E. J. Workman, former president of Mexico Tech (then the New Mexico School of Mines), and others, including Langmuir, the namesake of the laboratory. The earlier studies took place on the of San Agustin and the San Mateo Mountains. The laboratory is located just south of South Baldy, the highest peak of the Magdalena mountains, at the southern end of the main ridge crest of the range, at an elevation of 10,679 ft (3,255 m). It occupies the Langmuir Research Site, a congressionally designated area within the National Forest, and operates under a Special Use Permit from the Forest Service. The Ridge Observatory Interferometer is under construction (as of 2007) nearby.References* Langmuir Lab official site* New Mexico Tech web site
9013241
North_Fork_John_Day_Wilderness
 governing_body  States Forest ServiceThe North Fork John Day Wilderness is a wilderness area within the Umatilla and Wallowa-Whitman National Forests, in the Blue Mountains of northeastern Oregon.The Wilderness consists of four separate units: the main  unit of the North Fork John Day drainage; the Greenhorn Unit to the south; the Tower Mountain Unit to the north; and the Baldy Creek Unit to the east.  Approximately  of the Hill-Indian Rock Scenic Area also lie within the Wilderness.(North Fork John Day Wilderness - Wilderness.net)The North Fork John Day Wilderness is located within the larger Elkhorn Fire Management Area, and the areas fire plan allows for the use of Prescribed Natural Fire under certain circumstances.(Wallowa-Whitman National Forest - North Fork John Day Wilderness)TopographyThe North Fork John Day Wilderness is composed of rolling benchlands, steep ridges, alpine lake basins, and the granite outcrops of the Greenhorn Mountains at an elevation of .  It encompasses two entire subranges of the Blue Mountains - the Greenhorn Mountains and the ragged Elkhorn Mountains.(  A continuous vegetative canopy covers most of the land, including dense virgin stands of conifer species like Douglas-fir, fir, larch and pine.(  The headwaters of several waterways are located in the Wilderness, including Bull Creek, Baldy Creek, and Crawfish Creek, as well as the Fork John Day River,  of which is designated wild and scenic.((GeologyThe granite and sedimentary rock that makes up much of the North Fork John Day Wilderness reflect the Blue Mountains history as a volcanic island archipelago in the Ocean some 250 million years ago.  As the crust of the earth shifted, the archipelago collided with the advancing American Plate approximately 200 million years ago.  Later, bubbles of less dense granitic rock, or batholiths, rose through the sediment to form the granite cores of the Elkhorn and Greenhorn Ranges.  Columbia River basalt flows buried the region some 15 million years ago, the remains of which can be seen today in the rimrock on the benchlands in the western portion of the Wilderness.()HistoryThe North Fork John Day drainage bustled with gold and silver mining operations in the mid-19th century, and traces of the thousands of miners who labored here are still visible. Old mining structures, building foundations, and dredged ditches and trash dumps left behind by the miners are all visible.  Many of these features are being left in place to naturally disappear over time, consistent with Wilderness Act direction to have no permanent human works in Wilderness.((  The Valley Gold Dredge once excavated the riverbeds in the area, and is now restored as a state heritage site in Oregon.(WildlifeNorth Fork John Day Wilderness is known for its big game and anadromous fish habitat.  Dominant wildlife species include Mountain elk and deer.(North Fork John Day Wilderness, Oregon - GORP)  There is currently an elk herd estimated to number beyond 50,000 and a herd of mule deer that reportedly exceeds 150,000.(  Bull elk here sometimes weigh more than 800 pounds and sport antlers spreading beyond five feet.  There are over  of perennial streams in the Wilderness,  of which provide spawning habitat for salmon and trout.(  Other wildlife in the North Fork John Day Wilderness include goats.RecreationPrimary recreational activities in the North Fork John Day Wilderness include hiking, camping, horseback riding, hunting, fishing, cross country skiing, rafting, kayaking, wildlife watching, and rock climbing the granite cliffs of the Elhorn Mountains.  There are roughly  of hiking trails in the Wilderness, three of which are Recreation Trails.(See also* Act* of Oregon Wildernesses* of U.S. Wilderness AreasReferencesExternal links* Wallowa-Whitman National Forest - North Fork John Day Wilderness - US Forest Service* Umatilla National Forest - Wilderness - US Forest Service* North Fork John Day Wild and Scenic River Management Plan - US Forest Service* North Fork of the John Day Wild and Scenic River - National Wild and Scenic Rivers System
9034334
China_university_of_mining_and_technology_(Beijing)
#REDIRECT University of Mining and Technology
9050945
Appin,_New_South_Wales
Stanwell TopsAppin is a town in the Macarthur Region of South Wales, Australia in Shire. It is situated about 16 kilometres south of Campbelltown and 35 kilometres north west of Wollongong.History of the DistrictEarly historyAppin is in the lands of the Dharawal people.During the Dreaming a great fire swept through the land. Wiritjiribin led the people to sanctuary in a cool green gullywhich had been missed by the fire, under the rocky cliffs of a gorge south of Appin. Thosewho had perished in the fire were reincarnated as animals and Wiritjiribin appeared as alyrebird, which became the clans totem, a symbol of peace and caretaker of the Land ofGawaigl, an area which became a meeting place for Peoples from all over the east coast ofAustralia(Register of Historic Places and Objects)European settlement in the Appin district was prohibited for some years; Appin was part of the Cowpastures where a small herd of cattle had established themselves, having escaped from the Sydney Cove settlement. To protect these and help feed the colony, Governor Macquarie ordered No person to hunt or travel into the Cowpastures without licence under penalty of death.(Cattle escape from Sydney Cove)(Proclamations by Governer Macquarie)Naturalist George Caley had visited the area in 1807 exploring from Prospect to the upper waters of Georges River and the Cataract and Cordeaux Rivers and reporting his findings.(ADB Online George Caley) Settlement began in 1811 with a  land grant by Governor Macquarie to William Broughton, who had arrived with the First Fleet.(Deputy Commissary General W. Broughton: in tribute to the Governor, Broughton named his grant Lachlan Vale; it is now known as Northhamptondale.) For the next five years, smaller grants of 40 to  were made to a score or so of others, former soldiers,  emancipated convicts. Governor Macquarie was pleased to give The District of Appin its name, after Appin, in the Scottish West Highlands where his wife, Elizabeth, was born.(Whitaker, Appin: the story of a Macquarie Town)Mrs Allan McPherson, visiting circa 1856, wrote:The next morning was fine and bright, and with somewhat better spirits we set out again, but the roads were heavy, and our progress consequently not very rapid, so that it was one or two oclock before we reached Appin, a small village, the last resting place on the Sydney side of Mount Keera. As it was too late to attempt crossing the mountain--at all times a formidable undertaking--that evening, we were obliged to make up our minds to stay here. We were not by this time very difficult to please in the way of accommodation, but it seemed doubtful if we should meet with any in this out-of-the-way little place. At last the landlord of a little inn took compassion on us, and let us in, though giving us to understand it was quite as a favour, for he was giving up his business that week, and his house was in a great state of confusion. I afterwards learnt we owed the accommodation, such as it was, to the compassion of the landlords wife, who chose to weave a little romance about us to the effect that we were a newly married couple, and who was not a little disappointed when I informed her I had been married several years, and had three children! I must be excused if my recollections of Appin are not very favourable, for at this half-dismantled little inn we were detained three days by incessant torrents of rain, such as I had hardly ever witnessed before, even in the colony. What to do with ourselves we really hardly knew. We had neither writing nor drawing materials, nor were they procurable(My Experiences in Australia. Being Recollections of a Visit to the Australian Colonies in 1856-7. by A Lady. LONDON: J. F. HOPE, 16 GREAT MARLBOROUGH STREET. 1860. Available from Project Gutenberg)The Appin MassacreDharawal people made friendships among several Appin settlers, but others came into conflict. In 1814, both Aborigines and Europeans died in skirmishes, usually over stolen crops. After further deaths at Bringelly(The killings of Europeans were possibly by Gandangara intruders hunting during a time of drought. See Whitaker, p. 11) Macquarie sent a punitive expedition to round up all Aborigines in the area. Those who resisted were to be shot. On 16 April, at least 14 were killed by shooting; others were driven  to jump to their deaths into a rocky gorge, near Broughtons Pass.(Appin Massacre)Notable CitizensAmong Appins free settlers was one Andrew Hamilton Hume, father of the explorer Hume. Hamilton Hume and his brother John were tireless investigators of the local countryside, often journeying in the company of Duall, a Dharawal man. Hamilton Hume became an expert bushman, and was well-prepared for major exploration when he set out in 1824 from Humewood,(Humewood, home of the Humes. Retrieved 24 June 2010) in the company of Hovell, to explore the land between the Sydney settlements and Phillip, at the request of Governor Brisbane. (A stone monument to this event stands on Campbelltown Road, erected by the Royal Australian Historical Society in 1924. Stone was obtained from the ruins of Hamilton Humes house.)Appin is the birthplace of John Fuller, better known as the bushranger Dan Mad Dog Morgan.Henning spent several months at Elladale Cottage in Appin. Of the area, she wrote:I am glad Biddulph is going to leave Appin, however, for I am sure he willnever make any money on this farm. Do you remember our saying that theremust certainly be something the matter with it, when he wrote word of howlow the rent was, that there must be a want of water or that nothingwould grow? There are both these drawbacks here. The soil is wretchedly poor, and this is said to be the very driest part of Australia. Frequently, when there have been torrents of rain atWollongong and Sydney, on each side of us, we have not had a drop here.There are no springs on the farm, only a waterhole, and that was dry fornearly six weeks in the summer, and then we had to fetch water from theriver three miles off. It is a pity Biddulph ever took this farm; still,he has gained some experience here, and, as his expenditure was chieflyin cattle and furniture, he has not lost much.(The Letters of Rachel Henning 29 March 1855.)Agriculture and IndustryAppin was for decades a major wheat-growing, and dairy-farming area, but wheat rust, and new railways reaching other primary producing areas of the State, reduced its importance. From 1869, however, the district became the major supplier of Sydneys water, when construction commenced on the Nepean Scheme: four major dams and an associated  of canals and tunnels supplying  Prospect Reservoir.(Whitaker, Chapter Nine) The Appin Colliery, exploiting the Bulli Seam by mining opened in 1962. The West Cliff Colliery opened in 1976.InfrastructureA town plan was completed in 1834. Several of the proposed street names are in use today, including Toggerai, the Dharawal name for the Upper reaches of the Georges River. A track from Campbelltown was in use from 1815; as settlement advanced along coastal Illawarra, routes to Sydney found their way up the escarpment, and through Appin; the resulting traffic increased the towns prosperity.(Whitaker, Chapter V)Appin had a permanent Post Office by 1841, and a telephone line was connected to it in 1888. Appin had to wait until 1945 for an electricity supply. Despite its proximity to several large dams, Appin did not receive a reticulated water supply until 1961.(Whitaker, Chapter 13) As of 2010, a town sewerage scheme is in its planning stages.(Appin Wilton and Douglas Park Sewerage Scheme)Several examples of early sandstone buildings remain  in Appins commercial centre on Appin Road. These include the former Courthouse and Gaol (1860s), the derelict Appin Inn (1826), a stone cottage used as offices, built circa 1840, the Headmasters residence at the primary school, and St. Bedes Roman Catholic Church, 1834-7. Other buildings of heritage value include the disused motor garage at Darcys Corner (1955), the Appin Hotel (1840), and St Mark The Evangelist Church (1843)The Town TodayOn Census Night 2006, Appin had a population of 1,756 people.(Australian Bureau of Statistics, SSC 16065. Report generated 24 June 2010)Community FacilitiesThe Wollondilly Mobile Library visits the township weekly.(Mobile Library) Appin has a Playgroup; a Mobile PreSchool; a Community Hall, two sportsgrounds, and an off-leash area for companion animals near Wonson Oval. The Appin Volunteer Bush Fire Brigade (now known as the Appin Rural Fire Service) was formed in 1944; Joe DArcy was its first Captain. The current Fire Shed was opened in 2002.In the Surrounding AreaThe World Scout Jamboree was held at the Cataract Scout Camp,(Cataract Scout Camp) the first such Jamboree held in the Hemisphere. The Dharawal State Recreation Area and Nature Reserve(Dharawal State Conservation Area) is located to the east. Appin is part of the Upper Georges River Catchment.(Catchment Notes) The Bureau of Meteorology operates a Weather Watch radar station at Bulli, known as the Sydney (Appin) radar . Its coverage extends to Newcastle, Bathurst, Lake George and Ulladulla.(Appin Radar)Industries, EmploymentThe coal mines continue to be a major employer. Inghams Enterprises operate several factory farms. An industrial area has been established to the south of Appin. Here also is the Macarthur Water Treatment Plant. Completed in 1995, which supplies the Camden, Campbelltown and Wollondilly areas.(Macarthur Water Treatment Plant)EducationAppin Public School was opened in 1867. Before this, Catholic and Anglican Denominational Schools had been conducted in the district, but both had closed by 1870.Secondary school students today attend High Schools in Campbelltown and other areas. Tertiary education is available from institutions in adjacent towns: the University of Western Sydney at Campbelltown, the of Wollongong and Campbelltown College of TAFE.SportNorth of town lie the Appin Greyhound Track and the Appin Motocross Circuit Motocross. Tennis courts and a sportsground are located within the township (Wonson Oval). Appin is home to the Appin Dogs Rugby League Football Teams: a womens rugby team was established in 2010. Appin United Soccer Club have their home ground at the Gordon Lewis Oval.Appin alsohave their own Netball team:Appin Netball Club.Notes and references;Notes(;ReferencesExternal linksAppin Massacre* Appin Massacre* Appin Massacre* Appin MassacreHeritage Links* Appin history* Sykes Family history* St. Bedes Church graveyard listing* St. Bedes history* Heritage Listing, Upper Canal System* Kilbride Nursing Home, Rosemeadow* Beulah HomesteadOther Links* Appin Canal collapse 2007* Appin sewerage proposal* Upper Nepean Dams* Appin Power Plant 1996* Power Plant controversy* Appin Aeromodellers Club* Unofficial History of Illawarra Coal* Methane Gas Power Generation* Methane Gas Power Generation* Leafs Gully Power PlantBibliography and Further Reading* Appin Public School centenary.  1968.  Appin Public School Centenary Committee.* Butler, B. N. 1988.  St Mark the Evangelist Anglican Church, Appin : 150 years of ministry, 1838-1988.* Fowler, L.R. (ed.) 1989. A History of the forbidden land  Wollondilly Shire. ISBN 0-7316-3746-1* Hume, Emma. Diaries. Emma Hume of Beulah, Appin Road, Appin, NSW. 1893-1917.* The Letters of Rachel Henning, 29 March 1855* Holmes, Marie. 1997. St Bedes Church, Appin Campbelltown & Airds Historical Society. ISBN 0-9586776-3-8* McGill, Ruth. 1994. The Appin massacre by Ruth McGill. Campbelltown, N.S.W.* Percival, Syd. 1992. Chronicles of Appin, NSW / by Syd Percival. Campbelltown and Airds Historical Society. ISBN 0959172971* Proudfoot, Helen. 1977. Colonial buildings : Macarthur Growth Centre, Campbelltown, Camden, Appin Macarthur Development Board.* Whitaker, Anne-Maree. 2005. Appin: the story of a Macquarie town. Kingsclear Books, Sydney. ISBN 0-908272-84-7* Selections from Appin: the story of a Macquarie town are available from Google BooksAppin GalleryFile: Former Appin Post Office.jpg|Former Post Office, 1835File: Appin Public School NSW.jpg|Appin Public School, 1867File: Appin Inn NSW.jpg|Derelict Appin Inn, 1826File: Apping NSW Stone Shop.jpg|Colonial era stone building in main streetFile: Appin Rectory NSW Australia.jpg|Former Anglican Rectory, 1843File: Appin St Bedes Church.jpg|St Bedes Catholic Church, 1837-43File: Appin St Marks Church NSW.jpg|St Mark the EvangelistAnglican Church, 1843File: Darcys Corner Appin NSW.jpg|Darcys Corner, c. 1955.File: Broughton Pass Weir.jpg|Broughtons Pass WeirFile: Appin Canal NSW.jpg|Upper Canalwest of AppinFile: Appin Hotel NSW.jpg|Appin HotelFile: Appin Fire Shed NSW.jpg|Rural Fire Brigade ShedFile: Appin NSW Colliery Entrance.jpg|Entrance, Appin CollieryFile: Appin Methane Power Plant.jpg|Methane Gas Power PlantFile: Appin Ingham Broilers NSW.jpg|Inghams Broilers factory farmFile: Appin Industry NSW.jpg|Industrial Area, south of town(Australie)New South Wales()
